

ECONOMIC & PHILOSOPHIC MANUSCRIPTS OF 1844[1] 


Written: Between April and August 1844;
First Published: 1932;
Source: Marx. Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844;
First Published: Progress Publishers, Moscow 1959;
Translated: by Martin Milligan from the German text, revised by Dirk J.
Struik, contained in Marx/Engels, Gesamtausgabe, Abt. 1, Bd. 3.
Corrections were made of typographical errors and the author’s obvious
slips when preparing the Russian edition, 1956;
Transcribed: in 2000 for marxists.org by Andy Blunden;
PROOFED: and corrected by Matthew Carmody, 2009.

Preface

||XXXIX| I have already announced in the _Deutsch-Französische
Jahrbücher_ the critique of jurisprudence and political science in the
form of a critique of the _Hegelian_ philosophy of law. While preparing
it for publication, the intermingling of criticism directed only against
speculation with criticism of the various subjects themselves proved
utterly unsuitable, hampering the development of the argument and
rendering comprehension difficult. Moreover, the wealth and diversity of
the subjects to be treated could have been compressed into _one_ work
only in a purely aphoristic style; whilst an aphoristic presentation of
this kind, for its part, would have given the _impression_ of arbitrary
systematism. I shall therefore publish the critique of law, ethics,
politics, etc., in a series of distinct, independent pamphlets, and
afterwards try in a special work to present them again as a connected
whole showing the interrelationship of the separate parts, and lastly
attempt a critique of the speculative elaboration of that material. For
this reason it will be found that the interconnection between political
economy and the state, law, ethics, civil life, etc., is touched upon in
the present work only to the extent to which political economy itself
expressly touches upon these subjects.

It is hardly necessary to assure the reader conversant with political
economy that my results have been attained by means of a wholly
empirical analysis based on a conscientious critical study of political
economy.

(Whereas the uninformed reviewer who tries to hide his complete
ignorance and intellectual poverty by hurling the “utopian phrase” at
the positive critic’s head, or again such phrases as “quite pure, quite
resolute, quite critical criticism,” the “not merely legal but social –
utterly social – society”, the “compact, massy mass”, the “outspoken
spokesmen of the massy mass”[2] this reviewer has yet to furnish the
first proof that besides his theological family affairs he has anything
to contribute to a discussion of _worldly_ matters.)

It goes without saying that besides the French and English socialists I
have also used German socialist works. The only _original_ German works
of substance in this science, however – other than Weitling’s writings –
are the essays by _Hess_ published in _Einundzwanzig Bogen[3]_ and
_Umrisse zu einer Kritik der Nationalökonomie_ by Engels in the
_Deutsch-Französische Jahrbücher_, where also the basic elements of this
work [_Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_] have been
indicated by me in a very general way.

(Besides being indebted to these authors who have given critical
attention to political economy, positive criticism as a whole – and
therefore also German positive criticism of political economy – owes its
true foundation to the discoveries of Feuerbach, against whose
_Philosophie der Zukunft_ and _Thesen zur Reform der Philosophie_ in
_the Anekdota_, despite the tacit use that is made of them, the petty
envy of some and the veritable wrath of others seem to have instigated a
regular conspiracy of silence.

It is only with _Feuerbach_ that _positive,_ humanistic and naturalistic
criticism begins. The less noise they make, the more certain, profound,
extensive, and enduring is the effect of _Feuerbach’s_ writings, the
only writings since Hegel’s _Phänomenologie_ and _Logik_ to contain a
real theoretical revolution.

In contrast to the _critical theologian_ of our day, I have deemed the
concluding chapter of this work – a critical discussion of _Hegelian
dialectic_ and philosophy as a whole to be absolutely necessary, ||XL| 
a task not yet performed. This lack of thoroughness is not accidental,
since even the _critical_ theologian remains a _theologian_. Hence,
either he has to start from certain presuppositions of philosophy
accepted as authoritative; or, if in the process of criticism and as a
result of other people’s discoveries doubts about these philosophical
presuppositions have arisen in him, he abandons them in a cowardly and
unwarrantable fashion, _abstracts_ from them, thus showing his servile
dependence on these presuppositions and his resentment at this servility
merely in a negative, unconscious and sophistical manner.

(He does this either by constantly repeating assurances concerning the
_purity_ of his own criticism, or by trying to make it seem as though
all that was left for criticism to deal with now was some other limited
form of criticism outside itself – say eighteenth-century criticism –
and also the limitations of the _masses,_ in order to divert the
observer’s attention as well as his own from the _necessary_ task of
settling accounts between _criticism_ and its point of origin – Hegelian
_dialectic_ and German philosophy as a whole – that is, from this
necessary raising of modern criticism above its own limitation and
crudity. Eventually, however, whenever discoveries (such as
_Feuerbach’s_) are made regarding the nature of his own philosophic
presuppositions, the critical theologian partly makes it appear as if
_he_ were the one who had accomplished this, producing that appearance
by taking the results of these discoveries and, without being able to
develop them, hurling them in the form of _catch-phrases_ at writers
still caught in the confines of philosophy. He partly even manages to
acquire a sense of his own superiority to such discoveries by asserting
in a mysterious way and in a veiled, malicious and skeptical fashion
elements of the Hegelian _dialectic_ which he still finds lacking in the
criticism of that dialectic (which have not yet been critically served
up to him for his use) against such criticism – not having tried to
bring such elements into their proper relation or having been capable of
doing so, asserting, say, the category of mediating proof against the
category of positive, self-originating truth, [...] in a way _peculiar_
to Hegelian dialectic. For to the theological critic it seems quite
natural that everything has to be _done_ by philosophy, so that he can
_chatter away_ about purity, resoluteness, and quite critical criticism;
and he fancies himself the true _conqueror of philosophy_ whenever he
happens to _feel_ some element[4] in Hegel to be lacking in Feuerbach –
for however much he practices the spiritual idolatry of
“_self-consciousness_” and “_mind_” the theological critic does not get
beyond feeling to consciousness.)

On close inspection _theological criticism_ – genuinely progressive
though it was at the inception of the movement – is seen in the final
analysis to be nothing but the culmination and consequence of the old
_philosophical_, and especially the _Hegelian_, _transcendentalism_,
twisted into a _theological caricature_. This interesting example of
historical justice, which now assigns to theology, ever philosophy’s
spot of infection, the further role of portraying in itself the negative
dissolution of philosophy, i.e., the process of its decay – this
historical nemesis I shall demonstrate on another occasion.[5]

(How far, on the other hand, _Feuerbach’s_ discoveries about the nature
of philosophy still, for their _proof_ at least, called for a critical
discussion of philosophical dialectic will be seen from my exposition
itself.) |XL||


First Manuscript

Wages of Labor

Wages are determined through the antagonistic struggle between
capitalist and worker. Victory goes necessarily to the capitalist. The
capitalist can live longer without the worker than can the worker
without the capitalist. Combination among the capitalists is customary
and effective; workers’ combination is prohibited and painful in its
consequences for them. Besides, the landowner and the capitalist can
make use of industrial advantages to augment their revenues; the worker
has neither rent nor interest on capital to supplement his industrial
income. Hence the intensity of the competition among the workers. Thus
only for the workers is the separation of capital, landed property, and
labour an inevitable, essential and detrimental separation. Capital and
landed property need not remain fixed in this abstraction, as must the
labor of the workers.

The separation of capital, rent, and labor is thus fatal for the worker.

The lowest and the only necessary wage rate is that providing for the
subsistence of the worker for the duration of his work and as much more
as is necessary for him to support a family and for the race of laborers
not to die out. The ordinary wage, according to Smith, is the lowest
compatible with common humanity[6], that is, with cattle-like existence.

The demand for men necessarily governs the production of men, as of
every other commodity. Should supply greatly exceed demand, a section of
the workers sinks into beggary or starvation. The worker’s existence is
thus brought under the same condition as the existence of every other
commodity. The worker has become a commodity, and it is a bit of luck
for him if he can find a buyer. And the demand on which the life of the
worker depends, depends on the whim of the rich and the capitalists.
Should supply exceed demand, then one of the constituent parts of the
price — profit, rent or wages — is paid below its rate, [a part of
these] factors is therefore withdrawn from this application, and thus
the market price gravitates [towards the] natural price as the
center-point. But (1) where there is considerable division of labor it
is most difficult for the worker to direct his labor into other
channels; (2) because of his subordinate relation to the capitalist, he
is the first to suffer.

Thus in the gravitation of market price to natural price it is the
worker who loses most of all and necessarily. And it is just the
capacity of the capitalist to direct his capital into another channel
which either renders the worker, who is restricted to some particular
branch of labor, destitute, or forces him to submit to every demand of
this capitalist.

The accidental and sudden fluctuations in market price hit rent less
than they do that part of the price which is resolved into profit and
wages; but they hit profit less than they do wages. In most cases, for
every wage that rises, one remains stationary and one falls.

_THE WORKER NEED NOT NECESSARILY GAIN WHEN THE CAPITALIST DOES, BUT HE
NECESSARILY LOSES WHEN THE LATTER LOSES._ Thus, the worker does not gain
if the capitalist keeps the market price above the natural price by
virtue of some manufacturing or trading secret, or by virtue of monopoly
or the favorable situation of his land.

Furthermore, the prices of labor are much more constant than the prices
of provisions. Often they stand in inverse proportion. In a dear year
wages fall on account of the decrease in demand, but rise on account of
the increase in the prices of provisions — and thus balance. In any
case, a number of workers are left without bread. In cheap years wages
rise on account of the rise in demand, but decrease on account of the
fall in the prices of provisions — and thus balance.

Another respect in which the worker is at a disadvantage:

_THE LABOR PRICES OF THE VARIOUS KINDS OF WORKERS SHOW MUCH WIDER
DIFFERENCES THAN THE PROFITS IN THE VARIOUS BRANCHES IN WHICH CAPITAL IS
APPLIED._ In labor all the natural, spiritual, and social variety of
individual activity is manifested and is variously rewarded, whilst dead
capital always keeps the same pace and is indifferent to real individual
activity.

In general we should observe that in those cases where worker and
capitalist equally suffer, the worker suffers in his very existence, the
capitalist in the profit on his dead mammon.

The worker has to struggle not only for his physical means of
subsistence; he has to struggle to get work, i.e., the possibility, the
means, to perform his activity.

Let us take the three chief conditions in which society can find itself
and consider the situation of the worker in them:

(1) If the wealth of society declines the worker suffers most of all,
and for the following reason: although the working class cannot gain so
much as can the class of property owners in a prosperous state of
society, _no one suffers so cruelly from its decline as the working
class_.

(2) Let us now take a society in which wealth is increasing. This
condition is the only one favorable to the worker. Here competition
between the capitalists sets in. The demand for workers exceeds their
supply. But:

_In the first place_, the raising of wages gives rise to overwork among
the workers. The more they wish to earn, the more must they sacrifice
their time and carry out slave-labor, completely losing all their
freedom, in the service of greed. Thereby they shorten their lives. This
shortening of their life-span is a favorable circumstance for the
working class as a whole, for as a result of it an ever-fresh supply of
labor becomes necessary. This class has always to sacrifice a part of
itself in order not to be wholly destroyed.

_FURTHERMORE_: When does a society find itself in a condition of
advancing wealth? When the capitals and the revenues of a country are
growing. But this is only possible:

(a) As the result of the accumulation of much labor, capital being
accumulated labor; as the result, therefore, of the fact that more and
more of his products are being taken away from the worker, that to an
increasing extent his own labor confronts him as another man’s property
and that the means of his existence and his activity are increasingly
concentrated in the hands of the capitalist.

(b) The accumulation of capital increases the division of labor, and the
division of labor increases the number of workers. Conversely, the
number of workers increases the division of labor, just as the division
of labor increases the accumulation of capital. With this division of
labor on the one hand and the accumulation of capital on the other, the
worker becomes ever more exclusively dependent on labor, and on a
particular, very one-sided, machine-like labor at that. Just as he is
thus depressed spiritually and physically to the condition of a machine
and from being a man becomes an abstract activity and a belly, so he
also becomes ever more dependent on every fluctuation in market price,
on the application of capital, and on the whim of the rich. Equally, the
increase in the class of people wholly dependent on work intensifies
competition among the workers, thus lowering their price. In the factory
system this situation of the worker reaches its climax.

(c) In an increasingly prosperous society only the richest of the rich
can continue to live on money interest. Everyone else has to carry on a
business with his capital, or venture it in trade. As a result, the
competition between the capitalists becomes more intense. The
concentration of capital increases, the big capitalists ruin the small,
and a section of the erstwhile capitalists sinks into the working class,
which as a result of this supply again suffers to some extent a
depression of wages and passes into a still greater dependence on the
few big capitalists. The number of capitalists having been diminished,
their competition with respect to the workers scarcely exists any
longer; and the number of workers having been increased, their
competition among themselves has become all the more intense, unnatural,
and violent. Consequently, a section of the working class falls into
beggary or starvation just as necessarily as a section of the middle
capitalists falls into the working class.

Hence even in the condition of society most favorable to the worker, the
inevitable result for the worker is overwork and premature death,
decline to a mere machine, a bond servant of capital, which piles up
dangerously over and against him, more competition, and starvation or
beggary for a section of the workers.

The raising of wages excites in the worker the capitalist’s mania to get
rich, which he, however, can only satisfy by the sacrifice of his mind
and body. The raising of wages presupposes and entails the accumulation
of capital, and thus sets the product of labor against the worker as
something ever more alien to him. Similarly, the division of labor
renders him ever more one-sided and dependent, bringing with it the
competition not only of men but also of machines. Since the worker has
sunk to the level of a machine, he can be confronted by the machine as a
competitor. Finally, as the amassing of capital increases the amount of
industry and therefore the number of workers, it causes the same amount
of industry to manufacture _a larger amount of products,_ which leads to
over-production and thus either ends by throwing a large section of
workers out of work or by reducing their wages to the most miserable
minimum.

Such are the consequences of a state of society most favorable to the
worker — namely, of a state of growing, advancing wealth.

Eventually, however, this state of growth must sooner or later reach its
peak. What is the worker’s position now?

3) “In a country which had acquired that full complement of riches both
the wages of labor and the profits of stock would probably be very low
the competition for employment would necessarily be so great as to
reduce the wages of labor to what was barely sufficient to keep up the
number of laborers, and, the country being already fully peopled, that
number could never be augmented.” [Adam Smith, Wealth of Nations, Vol.
I, p. 84.]

The surplus would have to die.

Thus in a declining state of society — increasing misery of the worker;
in an advancing state — misery with complications; and in a fully
developed state of society — static misery.

Since, however, according to Smith, a society is not happy, of which the
greater part suffers — yet even the wealthiest state of society leads to
this suffering of the majority — and since the economic system[7] (and
in general a society based on private interest) leads to this wealthiest
condition, it follows that the goal of the economic system is the
_unhappiness_ of society.

Concerning the relationship between worker and capitalist we should add
that the capitalist is more than compensated for rising wages by the
reduction in the amount of labor time, and that rising wages and rising
interest on capital operate on the price of commodities like simple and
compound interest respectively.

Let us put ourselves now wholly at the standpoint of the political
economist, and follow him in comparing the theoretical and practical
claims of the workers.

He tells us that originally and in theory the whole product of labor
belongs to the worker. But at the same time he tells us that in actual
fact what the worker gets is the smallest and utterly indispensable part
of the product — as much, only, as is necessary for his existence, not
as a human being, but as a worker, and for the propagation, not of
humanity, but of the slave class of workers.

The political economist tells us that everything is bought with labor
and that capital is nothing but accumulated labor; but at the same time
he tells us that the worker, far from being able to buy everything, must
sell himself and his humanity.

Whilst the rent of the idle landowner usually amounts to a third of the
product of the soil, and the profit of the busy capitalist to as much as
twice the interest on money, the “something more” which the worker
himself earns at the best of times amounts to so little that of four
children of his, two must starve and die.

Whilst according to the political economists it is solely through labor
that man enhances the value of the products of nature, whilst labor is
man’s active possession, according to this same political economy the
landowner and the capitalist, who _qua_ landowner and capitalist are
merely privileged and idle gods, are everywhere superior to the worker
and lay down the law to him.

Whilst according to the political economists labor is the sole
unchanging price of things, there is nothing more fortuitous than the
price of labor, nothing exposed to greater fluctuations.

Whilst the division of labor raises the productive power of labor and
increases the wealth and refinement of society, it impoverishes the
worker and reduces him to a machine. Whilst labor brings about the
accumulation of capital and with this the increasing prosperity of
society, it renders the worker ever more dependent on the capitalist,
leads him into competition of a new intensity, and drives him into the
headlong rush of overproduction, with its subsequent corresponding
slump.

Whilst the interest of the worker, according to the political
economists, never stands opposed to the interest of society, society
always and necessarily stands opposed to the interest of the worker.

According to the political economists, the interest of the worker is
never opposed to that of society: (1) because the rising wages are more
than compensated by the reduction in the amount of labor time, together
with the other consequences set forth above; and (2) because in relation
to society the whole gross product is the net product, and only in
relation to the private individual has the net product any significance.

But that labor itself, not merely in present conditions but insofar as
its purpose in general is the mere increase of wealth — that labor
itself, I say, is harmful and pernicious — follows from the political
economist’s line of argument, without his being aware of it.

In theory, rent of land and profit on capital are _deductions_ suffered
by wages. In actual fact, however, wages are a deduction which land and
capital allow to go to the worker, a concession from the product of
labor to the workers, to labor.

When society is in a state of decline, the worker suffers most severely.
The specific severity of his burden he owes to his position as a worker,
but the burden as such to the position of society.

But when society is in a state of progress, the ruin and impoverishment
of the worker is the product of his labor and of the wealth produced by
him. The misery results, therefore, from the _essence_ of present-day
labor itself.

Society in a state of maximum wealth — an ideal, but one which is
approximately attained, and which at least is the aim of political
economy as of civil society — means for the workers _static_ misery.

It goes without saying that the _proletarian_, i.e., the man who, being
without capital and rent, lives purely by labor, and by a one-sided,
abstract labor, is considered by political economy only as a _worker_.
Political economy can therefore advance the proposition that the
proletarian, the same as any horse, must get as much as will enable him
to work. It does not consider him when he is not working, as a human
being; but leaves such consideration to criminal law, to doctors, to
religion, to the statistical tables, to politics and to the poor-house
overseer.

Let us now rise above the level of political economy and try to answer
two questions on the basis of the above exposition, which has been
presented almost in the words of the political economists:

(1) What in the evolution of mankind is the meaning of this reduction of
the greater part of mankind to abstract labor?

(2) What are the mistakes committed by the piecemeal reformers, who
either want to raise wages and in this way to improve the situation of
the working class, or regard equality of wages (as Proudhon does) as the
goal of social revolution?

In political economy _labor_ occurs only in the form of _activity_ as a
_source of livelihood_.

“It can be asserted that those occupations which presuppose specific
talents or longer training have become on the whole more lucrative;
whilst the proportionate reward for mechanically monotonous activity in
which one person can be trained as easily and quickly as another has
fallen with growing competition, and was inevitably bound to fall. And
it is just _this_ sort of work which in the present state of the
organization of labor is still by far the commonest. If therefore a
worker in the first category now earns seven times as much as he did,
say, fifty years ago, whilst the earnings of another in the second
category have remained unchanged, then of course both are earning _on
the average_ four times as much. But if the first category comprises
only a thousand workers in a particular country, and the second a
million, then 999,000 are no better off than fifty years ago — and they
are _worse off_ if at the same time the prices of the necessaries of
life have risen. With such superficial _calculations of averages_ people
try to deceive themselves about the most numerous class of the
population. Moreover, the size of the _wage_ is only one factor in the
estimation of the _worker’s income_, because it is essential for the
measurement of the latter to take into account the certainty of its
_duration_ — which is obviously out of the question in the anarchy of
so-called free competition, with its ever-recurring fluctuations and
periods of stagnation. Finally, _the hours of work_ customary formerly
and now have to be considered. And for the English cotton-workers these
have been increased, as a result of the entrepreneurs’ mania for profit.
to between twelve and sixteen hours a day during the past twenty-five
years or so — that is to say, precisely during the period of the
introduction of labor-saving machines; and this increase in one country
and in one branch of industry inevitably asserted itself elsewhere to a
greater or lesser degree, for the right of the unlimited exploitation of
the poor by the rich is still universally recognised.” (Wilhelm Schulz,
Die Bewegung der Production, p. 65)

“But even if it were as true as it is false that the average income of
_every_ class of society has increased, the income-differences and
_relative_ income-distances may nevertheless have become greater and the
contrasts between wealth and poverty accordingly stand out more sharply.
For just _because_ total production rises — and in the same measure as
it rises — needs, desires and claims also multiply and thus _relative_
poverty can increase whilst absolute poverty diminishes. The Samoyed
living on fish oil and rancid fish is not poor because in his secluded
society all have the same needs. But in a state _that is forging ahead_,
which in the course of a decade, say, increased by a third its total
production in proportion to the population, the worker who is getting as
much at the end of ten years as at the beginning has not remained as
well off, but has become poorer by a third.” (Ibid. pp. 65-66)

But political economy knows the worker only as a working animal — as a
beast reduced to the strictest bodily needs.

“To develop in greater spiritual freedom, a people must break their
bondage to their bodily needs — they must cease to be the slaves of the
body. They must, above all, have _time_ at their disposal for spiritual
creative activity and spiritual enjoyment. The developments in the labor
organism gain this time. Indeed, with new motive forces and improved
machinery, a single worker in the cotton mills now often performs the
work formerly requiring a hundred, or even 250 to 350 workers. Similar
results can be observed in all branches of production, because external
natural forces are being compelled to participate to an ever-greater
degree in human labor. If the satisfaction of a given amount of material
needs formerly required a certain expenditure of time and human effort
which has later been reduced by half, then without any loss of material
comfort the scope for spiritual activity and enjoyment has been
simultaneously extended by as much.... But again the way in which the
booty, that we win from old Kronos himself in his most private domain,
is shared out is still decided by the dice-throw of blind, unjust
Chance. In France it has been calculated that at the present stage in
the development of production an average working period of five hours a
day by every person capable of work could suffice for the satisfaction
of all the material interests of society.... Notwithstanding the time
saved by the perfecting of machinery. the duration of the slave-labor
performed by a large population in the factories has only increased.”
(Schulz, op. cit., pp. 67, 68.)

“The transition from compound manual labor rests on a break-down of the
latter into its simple operations. At first, however, only some of the
uniformly-recurring operations will devolve on machines, while some will
devolve on men. From the nature of things, and from confirmatory
experience, it is clear that unendingly monotonous activity of this kind
is as harmful to the mind as to the body; thus this combination of
machinery with mere division of labor among a greater number of hands
must inevitably show all the disadvantages of the latter. These
disadvantages appear, among other things, in the greater mortality of
factory workers.... Consideration has not been given ... to this big
distinction as to how far men work through machines or how far as
machines.” (Ibid. p. 69)

“In the future life of the peoples, however, the inanimate forces of
nature working in machines will be our slaves and serfs.” (Ibid. p. 74)

“The English spinning mills employ 196,818 women and only 158,818 men.
For every 100 male workers in the cotton mills of Lancashire there are
103 female workers, and in Scotland as many as 209. In the English flax
mills of Leeds, for every 100 male workers there were found to be 147
female workers. In Dundee and on the east coast of Scotland as many as
280. In the English silk mills ... many female workers; male workers
predominate in the wool-mills where the work requires greater physical
strength. In 1833, no fewer than 38,927 women were employed alongside
18,593 men in the North American cotton mills. As a result of the
changes in the labor organism, a wider sphere of gainful employment has
thus fallen to the share of the female sex.... Women now occupying an
economically more independent position ... the two sexes are drawn
closer together in their social conditions.” (Ibid. pp. 71, 72)

“Working in the English steam- and water-driven spinning mills in 1835
were: 20,558 children between the ages of eight and twelve; 35,867
between the ages of twelve and thirteen; and, lastly, 108,208 children
between the ages of thirteen and eighteen.... Admittedly, further
advances in mechanization, by more and more removing all monotonous work
from human hands, are operating in the direction of a gradual
elimination of this evil. But standing in the way of these more rapid
advances is the very circumstance that the capitalists can, in the
easiest and cheapest fashion, appropriate the energies of the lower
classes down to the children, to be used instead of mechanical devices.”
(Ibid. pp. 70-71)

“Lord Brougham’s call to the workers — ‘Become capitalists’. ... This is
the evil that millions are able to earn a bare subsistence for
themselves only by strenuous labor which shatters the body and cripples
them morally and intellectually; that they are even obliged to consider
the misfortune of finding such work a piece of good fortune.” (Ibid. p.
60)

“In order to live, then, the non-owners are obliged to place themselves,
directly or indirectly, at the service of the owners — to put
themselves, that is to say, into a position of dependence upon them.”
(Pecqueur, _Théorie nouvelle d’économie soc._, etc., p. 409)

“Servants — pay: workers — wages; employees — salary or emoluments.”
(Ibid. pp. 409-410)

“To hire out one’s labor”, “to lend one’s labor at interest”, “to work
in another’s place.”

“To hire out the materials of labor”, “to lend the materials of labor at
interest”, “to make others work in one’s place.” (Ibid. p. 411)

“Such an economic order condemns men to occupations so mean, to a
degradation so devastating and bitter, that by comparison savagery seems
like a kingly condition.... (Ibid. pp. 417, 418) “Prostitution of the
non-owning class in all its forms.” (Ibid. p. 421f) “Ragmen.”

Charles Loudon in the book _Solution du problème de la population,
etc_., Paris, 1842[8], declares the number of prostitutes in England to
be between sixty and seventy thousand. The number of women of doubtful
virtue is said to be equally large (p. 228).

“The average life of these unfortunate creatures on the streets, after
they have embarked on their career of vice, is about six or seven years.
To maintain the number of sixty to seventy thousand prostitutes, there
must be in the three kingdoms at least eight to nine thousand women who
commit themselves to this abject profession each year, or about
twenty-four new victims each day — an average of _one_ per hour; and it
follows that if the same proportion holds good over the whole surface of
the globe, there must constantly be in existence one and a half million
unfortunate women of this kind”. (Ibid. p. 229)

“The numbers of the poverty-stricken grow with their poverty, and at the
extreme limit of destitution human beings are crowded together in the
greatest numbers contending with each other for the right to suffer....
In 1821 the population of Ireland was 6,801,827. In 1831 it had risen to
7,764,010 — an increase of 14 per cent in ten years. In Leinster, the
wealthiest province, the population increased by only 8 per cent; whilst
in Connaught, the most poverty-stricken province, the increase reached
21 per cent. (_Extract from the Enquiries Published in England on
Ireland,_ Vienna, 1840.)” (Buret, _De la misère_, _etc_., t. 1, pp. 36,
37)

Political economy considers labor in the abstract as a thing; “labor is
a commodity.” If the price is high, then the commodity is in great
demand; if the price is low, then the commodity is in great supply: “the
price of labor as a commodity must fall lower and lower.” (Buret, op.
cit.) This is made inevitable partly by the competition between
capitalist and worker, partly by the competition amongst the workers.
“The working population, the seller of labor, is necessarily reduced to
accepting the most meager part of the product.... Is the theory of labor
as a commodity anything other than a theory of disguised bondage?”
(Ibid. p. 43) “Why then has nothing but an exchange-value been seen in
labor?” (Ibid. p. 44)

The large workshops prefer to buy the labor of women and children,
because this costs less than that of men. (Op. cit.) “The worker is not
at all in the position of a _free seller vis-à-vis_ the one who employs
him.... The capitalist is always free to employ labor, and the worker is
always forced to sell it. The value of labor is completely destroyed if
it is not sold every instant. Labor can neither be accumulated nor even
be saved, unlike true [commodities].

“Labor is life, and if life is not each day exchanged for food, it
suffers and soon perishes. To claim that human life is a commodity, one
must, therefore, admit slavery.” (Ibid. pp. 49, 50) If then labor is a
commodity, it is a commodity with the most unfortunate attributes. But
even by the principles of political economy it is no commodity, for it
is not the _“free result of a free transaction_.” The present economic
regime “simultaneously lowers the price and the remuneration of labor;
it perfects the worker and degrades the man.” (Ibid. pp. 52, 53)
“Industry has become a war, and commerce a gamble.” (Ibid. p. 62)

The cotton-working machines (in England) alone represent 84,000,000
manual workers. (Ibid. p. 193)

Up to the present, industry has been in a state of war, a war of
conquest: “It has squandered the lives of the men who made up its army
with the same indifference as the great conquerors. Its aim was the
possession of wealth, not the happiness of men.” (Buret, op. cit., p.
20) “These interests” (that is, economic interests), “freely left to
themselves ... must necessarily come into conflict; they have no other
arbiter but war, and the decisions of war assign defeat and death to
some, in order to give victory to the others.... It is in the conflict
of opposed forces that science seeks order and equilibrium: _perpetual
war_, according to it, is the sole means of obtaining peace; that war is
called competition.” (Ibid. p. 23)

“The industrial war, to be conducted with success, demands large armies
which it can amass on one spot and profusely decimate. And it is neither
from devotion nor from duty that the soldiers of this army bear the
exertions imposed on them, but only to escape the hard necessity of
hunger. They feel neither attachment nor gratitude towards their bosses,
nor are these bound to their subordinates by any feeling of benevolence.
They do not know them as men, but only as instruments of production
which have to yield as much as possible with as little cost as possible.
These populations of workers, ever more crowded together, have not even
the assurance of always being employed. Industry, which has called them
together, only lets them live while it needs them, and as soon as it can
get rid of them it abandons them without the slightest scruple; and the
workers are compelled to offer their persons and their powers for
whatever price they can get. The longer, more painful and more
disgusting the work they are given, the less they are paid. There are
those who, with sixteen hours’ work a day and unremitting exertion,
scarcely buy the right not to die.” (Ibid. pp. 68-69)

“We are convinced ... as are the commissioners charged with the inquiry
into the condition of the hand-loom weavers, that the large industrial
towns would in a short time lose their population of workers if they
were not all the time receiving from the neighboring rural areas
constant recruitments of healthy men, a constant flow of fresh blood.”
(Ibid. p. 362)

Profit of Capital

1. Capital

What is the basis of capital, that is, of private property in the
products of other men’s labor?

“Even if capital itself does not merely amount to theft or fraud, it
still requires the cooperation of legislation to sanctify inheritance.”
(Say, Traité d’economie politique, t. I. P. 136, footnote)[9]

How does one become a proprietor of productive stock? How does one
become owner of the products created by means of this stock?

By virtue of positive law. (Say, t. II, p. 4 )

What does one acquire with capital, with the inheritance of a large
fortune, for instance?

“The person who [either acquires, or] succeeds to a great fortune, does
not necessarily [acquire or] succeed to any political power [.... ] The
power which that possession immediately and directly conveys to him, is
the power of purchasing; a certain command over all the labor, or over
all the produce of labor, which is then in the market.” (Wealth of
Nations, by Adam Smith, Vol. I, pp. 26-27.)[10]

Capital is thus the governing power over labor and its products. The
capitalist possesses this power, not on account of his personal or human
qualities, but inasmuch as he is an owner of capital. His power is the
purchasing power of his capital, which nothing can withstand.

Later we shall see first how the capitalist, by means of capital,
exercises his governing power over labor, then, however, we shall see
the governing power of capital over the capitalist himself.

What is capital?

“A certain quantity of _labor stocked_ and stored up to be employed.”
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 295.)

Capital is _stored-up labor_.

(2) _Funds_, or stock, is any accumulation of products of the soil or of
manufacture. Stock is called _capital_ only when it yields to its owner
a revenue or profit. (Adam Smith, op. cit., p. 243)

2. The Profit of Capital

The _profit or gain of capital_ is altogether different from the wages
of labor. This difference is manifested in two ways: in the first place,
the profits of capital are regulated altogether by the value of the
capital employed, although the labor of inspection and direction
associated with different capitals may be the same. Moreover in large
works the whole of this labor is committed to some principal clerk,
whose salary bears no regular proportion to the capital of which he
oversees the management. And although the labor of the proprietor is
here reduced almost to nothing, he still demands profits in proportion
to his capital. (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 43)[11]

Why does the capitalist demand this proportion between profit and
capital?

He would have no _interest_ in employing the workers, unless he expected
from the sale of their work something more than is necessary to replace
the stock advanced by him as wages and he would have no _interest_ to
employ a great stock rather than a small one, unless his profits were to
bear some proportion to the extent of his stock. (Adam Smith, op. cit.,
Vol. I, p. 42)

The capitalist thus makes a profit, first, on the wages, and secondly on
the raw materials advanced by him.

What proportion, then, does profit bear to capital?

If it is already difficult to determine the usual average level of wages
at a particular place and at a particular time, it is even more
difficult to determine the profit on capitals. A change in the price of
the commodities in which the capitalist deals, the good or bad fortune
of his rivals and customers, a thousand other accidents to which
commodities are exposed both in transit and in the warehouses — all
produce a daily, almost hourly variation in profit. (Adam Smith, op.
cit., Vol. I, pp. 78-79) But though it is impossible to determine with
precision what are the profits on capitals, some notion may be formed of
them from the _interest of_ _money_. Wherever a great deal can be made
by the use of money, a great deal will be given for the use of it;
wherever little can be made by it, little will be given. (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, p. 79) The proportion which the usual market rate of
interest ought to bear to the rate of clear profit, necessarily varies
as profit rises or falls. Double interest is in Great Britain reckoned
what the merchants call a good, moderate, reasonable profit, terms which
mean no more than a _common and usual_ _profit._ (Adam Smith, op. cit.,
Vol. I, p. 87)

What is the _lowest_ rate of profit? And what the _highest_?

The _lowest rate of ordinary profit_ on capital must always be something
more than what is sufficient to compensate the occasional losses to
which every employment of stock is exposed. It is this surplus only
which is neat or clear profit. The same holds for the lowest rate of
interest. (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 86)

The _highest rate_ to which ordinary profits can rise is that which in
the price of the greater part of commodities _eats up the whole of the
rent of the land_, and reduces the wages of labor contained in the
commodity supplied to the _lowest rate_, the bare subsistence of the
laborer during his work. The worker must always be fed in some way or
other while he is required to work; rent can disappear entirely. For
example: the servants of the East India Company in Bengal. (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 86-87)

Besides all the advantages of limited competition which the capitalist
may _exploit_ in this case, he can keep the market price above the
natural price by quite decorous means.

_For one thing_, by keeping _secrets in trade_ if the market is at a
great distance from those who supply it, that is, by concealing a price
change, its rise above the natural level. This concealment has the
effect that other capitalists do not follow him in investing their
capital in this branch of industry or trade.

_Then again_ by keeping _secrets in manufacture_, which enable the
capitalist to reduce the costs of production and supply his commodity at
the same or even at lower prices than his competitors while obtaining a
higher profit. (Deceiving by keeping secrets is not immoral? Dealings on
the Stock Exchange.) _Furthermore_, where production is restricted to a
particular locality (as in the case of a rare wine), and where the
_effective demand_ can never he satisfied_. Finally_, through monopolies
exercised by individuals or companies. Monopoly price is the highest
possible. (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 53-54)

Other fortuitous causes which can raise the profit on capital: the
acquisition of new territories, or of new branches of trade, often
increases the profit on capital even in a wealthy country, because they
withdraw some capital from the old branches of trade, reduce
competition, and cause the market to be supplied with fewer commodities,
the prices of which then rise: those who deal in these commodities can
then afford to borrow at a higher rate of interest. (Adam Smith, op.
cit., Vol. I, p. 83)

The more a commodity comes to be manufactured — the more it becomes an
object of manufacture — the greater becomes that part of the price which
resolves itself into wages and profit in proportion to that which
resolves itself into rent. In the progress of the manufacture of a
commodity, not only the number of profits increases, but every
subsequent profit is greater than the foregoing; because the capital
from which it is derived must always be greater. The capital which
employs the weavers, for example, must always be greater than that which
employs the spinners; because it not only replaces that capital with its
profits, but pays, besides, the wages of weavers; and the profits must
always bear some proportion to the capital. (Op. cit., Vol. I, p. 45)

Thus the advance made by human labor in converting the product of nature
into the manufactured product of nature increases, not the wages of
labor, but in part the number of profitable capital investments, and in
part the size of every subsequent capital in comparison with the
foregoing.

More about the advantages which the capitalist derives from the division
of labor, later.

He profits doubly — first, by the division of labor; and secondly, in
general, by the advance which human labor makes on the natural product.
The greater the human share in a commodity, the greater the profit of
dead capital.

In one and the same society the average rates of profit on capital are
much more nearly on the same level than the wages of the different sorts
of labor. (Op. cit., Vol. I, p. 100.) In the different employments of
capital, the ordinary rate of profit varies with the certainty or
uncertainty of the returns.

The ordinary profit of stock, though it rises with the risk, does not
always seem to rise in proportion to it. (Op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 99-100.)

It goes without saying that profits also rise if the means of
circulation become less expensive or easier available (e.g., paper
money).

3. The Rule of Capital over Labor and the Motives of the Capitalist

The consideration of his own private profit is the sole motive which
determines the owner of any capital to employ it either in agriculture,
in manufactures, or in some particular branch of the wholesale or retail
trade. The different quantities of productive Labor which it may put
into motion, and the different values which it may add to the annual
produce of the land and labor of his country, according as it is
employed in one or other of those different ways, never enter into his
thoughts. (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 335)

The most useful employment of capital for the capitalist is that which,
risks being equal, yields him the greatest profit. This employment is
not always the most useful for society; the most useful employment is
that which utilizes the productive powers of nature. (Say, t. II, pp.
130-31.)

The plans and speculations of the employers of capitals regulate and
direct all the most important operations of labor, and profit is the end
proposed by all those plans and projects. But the rate of profit does
not, like rent and wages, rise with the prosperity and fall with the
decline of the society. On the contrary, it is naturally low in rich and
high in poor countries, and it is always highest in the countries which
are going fastest to ruin. The interest of this class, therefore, has
not the same connection with the general interest of the society as that
of the other two.... The particular interest of the dealers in any
particular branch of trade or manufactures is always in some respects
different from, and frequently even in sharp opposition to, that of the
public. To widen the market and to narrow the sellers’ competition is
always the interest of the dealer.... This is a class of people whose
interest is never exactly the same as that of society, a class of people
who have generally an interest to deceive and to oppress the public.
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 231-32)

4. The Accumulation of Capitals and the Competition among the Capitalists

The increase of stock, which raises wages, tends to lower the
capitalists’ profit, because of the competition amongst the capitalists.
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 78)

If, for example, the capital which is necessary for the grocery trade of
a particular town “is divided between two different grocers, their
competition will tend to make both of them sell cheaper than if it were
in the hands of one only; and if it were divided among twenty, their
competition would be just so much the greater, and the chance of their
combining together, in order to raise the price, just so much the less.”
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 322)

Since we already know that monopoly prices are as high as possible,
since the interest of the capitalists, even from the point of view
commonly held by political economists, stands in hostile opposition to
society, and since a rise of profit operates like compound interest on
the price of the commodity (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 87-88), it
follows that the sole defense against the capitalists is _competition_,
which according to the evidence of political economy acts beneficently
by both raising wages and lowering the prices of commodities to the
advantage of the consuming public.

But competition is only possible if capital multiplies, and is held in
many hands. The formation of many capital investments is only possible
as a result of multilateral accumulation, since capital comes into being
only by accumulation; and multilateral accumulation necessarily turns
into unilateral accumulation. Competition among capitalists increases
the accumulation of capital. Accumulation, where private property
prevails, is the concentration of capital in the hands of a few, it is
in general an inevitable consequence if capital is left to follow its
natural course, and it is precisely through competition that the way is
cleared for this natural disposition of capital.

We have been told that the profit on capital is in proportion to the
size of the capital. A large capital therefore accumulates more quickly
than a small capital in proportion to its size, even if we disregard for
the time being deliberate competition.

[12]Accordingly, the accumulation of large capital proceeds much more
rapidly than that of smaller capital, quite irrespective of competition.
But let us follow this process further.

With the increase of capital the profit on capital diminishes, because
of competition. The first to suffer, therefore, is the small capitalist.

The increase of capitals and a large number of capital investments
presuppose, further, a condition of advancing wealth in the country.

“In a country which had acquired its full complement of riches [ ... ]
the ordinary rate of clear profit would be very small, so the usual
[market] rate of interest which could be afforded out of it would be so
low as to render it impossible for any but the very wealthiest people to
live upon the interest of their money. All people of [...] middling
fortunes would be obliged to superintend themselves the employment of
their own stocks. It would be necessary that almost every man should be
a man of business, or engage in some sort of trade.” (Adam Smith, op.
cit., Vol. I, p. 86)

This is the situation most dear to the heart of political economy.

“The proportion between capital and revenue, therefore, seems everywhere
to regulate the proportion between industry and idleness; wherever
capital predominates, industry prevails; wherever revenue, idleness.”
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 301.)

What about the employment of capital, then, in this condition of
increased competition?

“As stock increases, the quantity of stock to be lent at interest grows
gradually greater and greater. As the quantity of stock to be lent at
interest increases, the interest ... diminishes (i) because the market
price of things commonly diminishes as their quantity increases. ... and
(ii) because with the increase of capitals in any country, “it becomes
gradually more and more difficult to find within the country a
profitable method of employing any new capital. There arises in
consequence a competition between different capitals, the owner of one
endeavoring to get possession of that employment which is occupied by
another. But upon most occasions he can hope to jostle that other out of
this employment by no other means but by dealing upon more reasonable
terms. He must not only sell what he deals in somewhat cheaper, but in
order to get it to sell, he must sometimes, too, buy it dearer. The
demand for productive labor, by the increase of the funds which are
destined for maintaining it, grows every day greater and greater.
Laborers easily find employment, but the owners of capitals find it
difficult to get laborers to employ. Their competition raises the wages
of labor and sinks the profits of stock.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I,
p. 316)

Thus the small capitalist has the choice: (1) either to consume his
capital, since he can no longer live on the interest — and thus cease to
be a capitalist; or (2) to set up a business himself, sell his commodity
cheaper, buy dearer than the wealthier capitalist, and pay higher wages
— thus ruining himself, the market price being already very low as a
result of the intense competition presupposed. If, however, the big
capitalist wants to squeeze out the smaller capitalist, he has all the
advantages over him which the capitalist has as a capitalist over the
worker. The larger size of his capital compensates him for the smaller
profits, and he can even bear temporary losses until the smaller
capitalist is ruined and he finds himself freed from this competition.
In this way, he accumulates the small capitalist’s profits.

Furthermore: the big capitalist always buys cheaper than the small one,
because he buys bigger quantities. He can therefore well afford to sell
cheaper.

But if a fall in the rate of interest turns the middle capitalists from
rentiers into businessmen, the increase in business capital and the
resulting smaller profit produce conversely a fall in the rate of
interest.

“When the profits which can be made by the use of a capital are
diminished the price which can be paid for the use of it [...] must
necessarily be diminished with them.” (Adam Smith, loc. cit., Vol. I, p.
316)

“As riches, improvement, and population have increased, interest has
declined,” and consequently the profits of capitalists, “after these
[profits] are diminished, stock may not only continue to increase, but
to increase much faster than before. [...] A great stock though with
small profits, generally increases faster than a small stock with great
profits. Money, says the proverb, makes money.” (op. cit., Vol. I, p.
83)

When, therefore, this large capital is opposed by small capitals with
small profits, as it is under the presupposed condition of intense
competition, it crushes them completely.

The necessary result of this competition is a general deterioration of
commodities, adulteration, fake production and universal poisoning,
evident in large towns.

An important circumstance in the competition of large and small capital
is, furthermore, the relation between _fixed capital_ and _circulating
capital_.

_Circulating_ capital is a capital which is “employed in raising”
provisions, “manufacturing, or purchasing goods, and selling them again.
[... ] The capital employed in this manner yields no revenue or profit
to its employer, while it either remains in his possession, or continues
in the same shape. [...] His capital is continually going from him in
one shape, and returning to him in another, and it is only by means of
such circulation, or successive exchanges” and transformations “that it
can yield him any profit.” _Fixed capital_ consists of capital invested
“in the improvement of land, in the purchase of useful machines and
instruments of trade, or in such-like things.” (Adam Smith, op. cit.,
Vol. I, pp. 243-44)

“Every saving in the expense of supporting the fixed capital is an
improvement of the net revenue of the society. The whole capital of the
undertaker of every work is necessarily divided between his fixed and
his circulating capital. [Marx uses the French terms _capital fixe_ and
_capital circulant. –_ Ed.] While his whole capital remains the same,
the smaller the one part, the greater must necessarily be the other. It
is the circulating capital which furnishes the materials and wages of
labor, and puts industry into motion. Every saving, therefore, in the
expense of maintaining the fixed capital, which does not diminish the
productive powers of labor, must increase the fund which puts industry
into motion.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 257)

It is clear from the outset that the relation of fixed capital and
circulating capital is much more favorable to the big capitalist than to
the smaller capitalist. The extra fixed capital required by a very big
banker as against a very small one is insignificant. Their fixed capital
amounts to nothing more than the office. The equipment of the bigger
landowner does not increase in proportion to the size of his estate.
Similarly, the credit which a big capitalist enjoys compared with a
smaller one means for him all the greater saving in fixed capital — that
is, in the amount of ready money he must always have at hand. Finally,
it is obvious that where industrial labor has reached a high level, and
where therefore almost all manual labor has become factory labor, the
entire capital of a small capitalist does not suffice to provide him
even with the necessary fixed capital. [_As is well known, large-scale
cultivation usually provides employment only for a small number of
hands_. Note by Marx in French.]

It is generally true that the accumulation of large capital is also
accompanied by a proportional concentration and simplification of fixed
capital, as compared to the smaller capitalists. The big capitalist
introduces for himself some kind of organization of the instruments of
labor.

“Similarly, in the sphere of industry every manufactory and mill is
already a comprehensive combination of a large material fortune with
numerous and varied intellectual capacities and technical skills serving
the common purpose of production.... Where legislation preserves landed
property in large units, the surplus of a growing population flocks into
trades, and it is therefore as in Great Britain in the field of
industry, principally, that proletarians aggregate in great numbers.
Where, however, the law permits the continuous division of the land, the
number of small, debt-encumbered proprietors increases, as in France;
and the continuing process of fragmentation throws them into the class
of the needy and the discontented. When eventually this fragmentation
and indebtedness reaches a higher degree still, big landed property once
more swallows up small property, just as large-scale industry destroys
small industry. And as larger estates are formed again, large numbers of
propertyless workers not required for the cultivation of the soil are
again driven into industry.” (Schulz, Bewegung der Production, pp. 58,
59.)

“Commodities of the same kind change in character as a result of changes
in the method of production, and especially as a result of the use of
machinery. Only by the exclusion of human power has it become possible
to spin from a pound of cotton worth 3 shillings and 8 pence 350 hanks
of a total length of 167 English miles (i.e., 36 German miles), and of a
commercial value of 25 guineas.” (op. cit., p. 62.)

“On the average the prices of cotton-goods have decreased in England
during the past 45 years by eleven-twelfths, and according to Marshall’s
calculations the same amount of manufactured goods for which 16
shillings was still paid in 1814 is now supplied at 1 shilling and 10
pence. The greater cheapness of industrial products expands both
consumption at home and the market abroad, and because of this the
number of workers in cotton has not only not fallen in Great Britain
after the introduction of machines but has risen from forty thousand to
one and a half million. As to the earnings of industrial entrepreneurs
and workers, the growing competition between the factory owners has
resulted in their profits necessarily falling relative to the amount of
products supplied by them. In the years 1820-33 the Manchester
manufacturer’s gross profit on a piece of calico fell from four
shillings 1 1/3 pence to one shilling 9 pence. But to make up for this
loss, the volume of manufacture has been correspondingly increased. The
consequence of this is that separate branches of industry experience
over-production to some extent, that frequent bankruptcies occur causing
property to fluctuate and vacillate unstably within the class of
capitalists and masters of labor, thus throwing into the proletariat
some of those who have been ruined economically; and that, frequently
and suddenly, close-downs or cuts in employment become necessary, the
painful effects of which are always bitterly felt by the class of
wage-laborers.” (Op. cit., p. 63.)

“To hire out one’s labor is to begin one’s enslavement. To hire out the
materials of labor is to establish one’s freedom.... Labor is man; the
materials, on the other hand, contain nothing human.” (Pecqueur, Théorie
sociale, etc.)

“The material element, which is quite incapable of creating wealth
without the other element, labor, acquires the magical virtue of being
fertile for them [who own this material element] as if by their own
action they had placed there this indispensable element.” (Op. cit.)

“Supposing that the daily labor of a worker brings him on the average
400 francs a year and that this sum suffices for every adult to live
some sort of crude life, then any proprietor receiving 2,000 francs in
interest or rent, from a farm, a house, etc., compels indirectly five
men to work for him; an income of 100,000 francs represents the labor of
250 men, and that of 1,000,000 francs the labor of 2,500 individuals
(hence, 300 million [Louis Philippe] therefore the labor of 750,000
workers).” (Op. cit., pp. 412-13.)

‘The human law has given owners the right to use and to abuse — that is
to say, the right to do what they will with the materials of labor....
They are in no way obliged by law to provide work for the propertyless
when required and at all times, or to pay them always an adequate wage,
etc. (Op. cit., p. 413.) “Complete freedom concerning the nature, the
quantity, the quality and the expediency of production; concerning the
use and the disposal of wealth; and full command over the materials of
all labor. Everyone is free to exchange what belongs to him as he thinks
fit, without considering anything other than his own interest as an
individual.” (Op. cit. p. 413.)

“Competition is merely the expression of the freedom to exchange, which
itself is the immediate and logical consequence of the individual’s
right to use and abuse all the instruments of production. The right to
use and abuse, freedom of exchange, and arbitrary competition — these
three economic moments, which form one unit, entail the following
consequences; each produces what he wishes, as he wishes, when he
wishes, where he wishes, produces well or produces badly, produces too
much or not enough, too soon or too late, at too high a price or too low
a price; none knows whether he will sell, to whom he will sell, how he
will sell, when he will sell, where he will sell. And it is the same
with regard to purchases. The producer is ignorant of needs and
resources, of demand and supply. He sells when he wishes, when he can,
where he wishes, to whom he wishes, at the price he wishes. And he buys
in the same way. In all this he is ever the plaything of chance, the
slave of the law of the strongest, of the least harassed, of the
richest.... Whilst at one place there is scarcity, at another there is
glut and waste. Whilst one producer sells a lot or at a very high price,
and at an enormous profit, the other sells nothing or sells at a
loss.... The supply does not know the demand, and the demand does not
know the supply. You produce, trusting to a taste, a fashion, which
prevails amongst the consuming public. But by the time you are ready to
deliver the commodity, the whim has already passed and has settled on
some other kind of product.... The inevitable consequences: bankruptcies
occurring constantly and universally; miscalculations, sudden ruin and
unexpected fortunes, commercial crises, stoppages, periodic gluts or
shortages; instability and depreciation of wages and profits, the loss
or enormous waste of wealth, time and effort in the arena of fierce
competition.” (Op. cit., pp. 414-16.)

Ricardo in his book [_On the Principles of Political Economy and
Taxation (rent of land)_]: Nations are merely production-shops; man is a
machine for consuming and producing; human life is a kind of capital;
economic laws blindly rule the world. For Ricardo men are nothing, the
product everything. In the 26th chapter of the French translation it
says:

“To an individual with a capital of £20,000 whose profits were £2,000
per annum, it would he a matter quite indifferent whether his capital
would employ a hundred or a thousand men.... Is not the real interest of
the nation similar? Provided its net real income, its rent and profits
be the same, it is of no importance whether the nation consists of ten
or twelve millions of inhabitants.” — [t. II, pp. 194, 195.] “In fact,
says M. Sismondi (_Nouveaux principes diconomie politique_, t. II, p.
331), nothing remains to be desired but that the King, living quite
alone on the island, should by continuously turning a crank cause
automatons to do all the work of England.”[13]

“The master who buys the worker’s labor at such a low price that it
scarcely suffices for the worker’s most pressing needs is responsible
neither for the inadequacy of the wage nor for the excessive duration of
the labor: he himself has to submit to the law which he imposes....
Poverty is not so much caused by men as by the power of things.” (Buret,
op. cit., p. 82.)

“The inhabitants of many different parts of Great Britain have not
capital sufficient to improve and cultivate all their lands. The wool of
the southern counties of Scotland is, a great part of it, after a long
land carriage through very bad roads, manufactured in Yorkshire, for
want of capital to manufacture it at home. There are many little
manufacturing towns in Great Britain, of which the inhabitants have not
capital sufficient to transport the produce of their own industry to
those distant markets where there is demand and consumption for it. If
there are any merchants among them, they are properly only the agents of
wealthier merchants who reside in some of the greater commercial
cities.” (Adam Smith, Wealth of Nations, Vol. I, pp. 326-27)

“The annual produce of the land and labor of any nation can be increased
in its value by no other means but by increasing either the number of
its productive laborers, or the productive power of those laborers who
had before been employed.... In either case an additional capital is
almost always required.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 306-07.)

“As the accumulation of stock must, in the nature of things, be previous
to the division of labor, so labor can be more and more subdivided in
proportion only as stock is previously more and more accumulated. The
quantity of materials which the same number of people can work up,
increases in a great proportion as labor comes to be more and more
subdivided; and as the operations of each workman are gradually reduced
to a greater degree of simplicity, a variety of new machines come to be
invented for facilitating and abridging those operations. As the
division of labor advances, therefore, in order to give constant
employment to an equal number of workmen, an equal stock of provisions,
and a greater stock of materials and tools than what would have been
necessary in a ruder state of things, must be accumulated beforehand.
But the number of workmen in every branch of business generally
increases with the division of labor in that branch, or rather it is the
increase of their number which enables them to class and subdivide
themselves in this manner.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 241-42)

“As the accumulation of stock is previously necessary for carrying on
this great improvement in the productive powers of labor, so that
accumulation naturally leads to this improvement. The person who employs
his stock in maintaining labor, necessarily wishes to employ it in such
a manner as to produce as great a quantity of work as possible. He
endeavors, therefore, both to make among his workmen the most proper
distribution of employment, and to furnish them with the best machines
[... ]. His abilities in both these respects are generally in proportion
to the extent of his stock, or to the number of people whom it can
employ. The quantity of industry, therefore, not only increases in every
country with the increase of the stock which employs it, but, in
consequence of that increase, the same quantity of industry produces a
much greater quantity of work.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 242)
Hence _overproduction_.

“More comprehensive combinations of productive forces ... in industry
and trade by uniting more numerous and more diverse human and natural
powers in larger-scale enterprises. Already here and there, closer
association of the chief branches of production. Thus, big manufacturers
will try to acquire also large estates in order to become independent of
others for at least a part of the raw materials required for their
industry; or they will go into trade in conjunction with their
industrial enterprises, not only to sell their own manufactures, but
also to purchase other kinds of products and to sell these to their
workers. In England, where a single factory owner sometimes employs ten
to twelve thousand workers ... it is already not uncommon to find such
combinations of various branches of production controlled by one brain,
such smaller states or provinces within the state. Thus, the mine owners
in the Birmingham area have recently taken over the whole process of
iron production, which was previously distributed among various
entrepreneurs and owners, (See “Der bergmännische Distrikt bei
Birmingham,” Deutsche Vierteljahr-Schrift No. 3, 1838.) Finally in the
large joint-stock enterprises which have become so numerous, we see
far-reaching combinations of the financial resources of many
participants with the scientific and technical knowledge and skills of
others to whom the carrying-out of the work is handed over. The
capitalists are thereby enabled to apply their savings in more diverse
ways and perhaps even to employ them simultaneously in agriculture,
industry and commerce. As a consequence their interest becomes more
comprehensive, and the contradictions between agricultural, industrial,
and commercial interests are reduced and disappear. But this increased
possibility of applying capital profitably in the most diverse ways
cannot but intensify the antagonism between the propertied and the
non-propertied classes.” (Schulz, op. cit., pp. 40-4l.)

The enormous profit which the landlords of houses make out of poverty.
House rent stands in inverse proportion to industrial poverty. So does
the interest obtained from the vices of the ruined proletarians.
(Prostitution, drunkenness, pawnbroking.)

The accumulation of capital increases and the competition between
capitalists decreases, when capital and landed property are united in
the same hand, also when capital is enabled by its size to combine
different branches of production.

Indifference towards men. Smith’s twenty lottery-tickets.[14] Say’s net
and gross revenue. |XVI||

Rent of Land

Landlords’ right has its origin in robbery. (Say, t. 1) The landlords,
like all other men, love to reap where they never sowed, and demand a
rent even for the natural produce of the earth. (Adam Smith, op. cit.,
Vol. I, p. 44.)

“The rent of land, it may be thought, is frequently no more than a
reasonable profit or interest for the stock laid out by the landlord
upon its improvement. This, no doubt, may be partly the case upon some
occasions.... The landlord demands” (1) “a rent even for unimproved
land, and the supposed interest or profit upon the expense of
improvement is generally an addition to this original rent.” (2) “Those
improvements, besides, are not always made by the stock of the landlord,
but sometimes by that of the tenant. When the lease comes to be renewed,
however, the landlord commonly demands the same augmentation of rent as
if they had been all made by his own.” (3) “He sometimes demands rent
for what is altogether incapable of human improvement.” (Adam Smith, op.
cit., Vol. I, p. 131.)

Smith cites as an instance of the last case kelp,

“a species of seaweed, which, when burnt, yields an alkaline salt,
useful for making glass, soap, etc. It grows in several parts of Great
Britain, particularly in Scotland, upon such rocks only as lie within
the high-water mark, which are twice every day covered with the sea, and
of which the produce, therefore, was never augmented by human industry.
The landlord, however, whose estate is bounded by a kelp shore of this
kind, demands a rent for it as much as for his corn fields. The sea in
the neighborhood of the Islands of Shetland is more than commonly
abundant in fish, which make a great part of the subsistence of their
inhabitants. But in order to profit by the produce of the water they
must have a habitation upon the neighboring land. The rent of the
landlord is in proportion, not to what the farmer can make by the land,
but to what he can make both by the land and by the water.” (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, p. 131.)

“This rent may be considered as the produce of those _powers of nature_,
the use of which the landlord lends to the farmer. It is greater or
smaller according to the supposed extent of those powers, or in other
words, according to the supposed natural or improved fertility of the
land. It is the work of nature which remains after deducting or
compensating everything which can be regarded as the work of man.” (Adam
Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 324-25.)

“The _rent of land_, therefore, considered as the price paid for the use
of the land, is naturally a _monopoly price_. It is not at all
proportioned to what the landlord may have laid out upon the improvement
of the land, or to what he can afford to take; but to what the farmer
can afford to give.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., p. 131.)

Of the three original classes, that of the landlords is the one “whose
revenue costs them neither labor nor care, but comes to them, as it
were, of its own accord, and independent of any plan or project of their
own”. (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 230.)

We have already learnt that the size of the rent depends on the degree
of _fertility_ of the land.

Another factor in its determination is situation.

“The rent of land not only varies with its _fertility_, whatever be its
produce, but with its situation whatever be its fertility.” (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, p. 133.)

“The produce of land, mines, and fisheries, when their natural fertility
is equal, is in proportion to the extent and proper application of the
capitals employed about them. When the capitals are equal and equally
well applied, it is in proportion to their natural fertility.” (Op.
cit., Vol. I, p. 249.)

These propositions of Smith are important, because, given equal costs of
production and capital of equal size, they reduce the rent of land to
the greater or lesser fertility of the soil. Thereby showing clearly the
perversion of concepts in political economy, which turns the fertility
of the land into an attribute of the landlord.

Now, however, let us consider the rent of land as it is formed in real
life.

The rent of land is established as a result of _the struggle between
tenant and landlord_. We find that the hostile antagonism of interests,
the struggle, the war is recognised throughout political economy as the
basis of social organization.

Let us see now what the relations are between landlord and tenant.

“In adjusting the terms of the lease, the landlord endeavors to leave
him no greater share of the produce than what is sufficient to keep up
the stock from which he furnishes the seed, pays the labor, and
purchases and maintains the cattle and other instruments of husbandry,
together with the ordinary profits of farming stock in the neighborhood.
This is evidently the smallest share with which the tenant can content
himself without being a loser, and the landlord seldom means to leave
him any more. Whatever part of the produce, or, what is the same thing,
whatever part of its price is over and above this share, he naturally
endeavors to reserve to himself as the rent of his land, which is
evidently the highest the tenant can afford to pay in the actual
circumstances of the land. [.... ] This portion, however, may still be
considered as the natural rent of land, or the rent for which it is
naturally meant that land should for the most part be let.” (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 130-31)

“The landlords,” says Say, “operate a certain kind of monopoly against
the tenants. The demand for their commodity, site and soil, can go on
expanding indefinitely; but there is only a given, limited amount of
their commodity.... The bargain struck between landlord and tenant is
always advantageous to the former in the greatest possible degree....
Besides the advantage he derives from the nature of the case, he derives
a further advantage from his position, his larger fortune and greater
credit and standing. But the first by itself suffices to enable him and
him alone to profit from the favorable circumstances of the land. The
opening of a canal, or a road; the increase of population and of the
prosperity of a district, always raises the rent.... Indeed, the tenant
himself may improve the ground at his own expense; but he only derives
the profit from this capital for the duration of his lease, with the
expiry of which it remains with the proprietor of the land; henceforth
it is the latter who reaps the interest thereon, without having made the
outlay, for there is now a proportionate increase in the rent.” (Say, t.
II.)

“Rent, considered as the price paid for the use of land, is naturally
the highest which the tenant can afford to pay in the actual
circumstances of the land.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 130.)

“The rent of an estate above ground commonly amounts to what is supposed
to be a third of the gross produce; and it is generally a rent certain
and independent of the occasional variations in the crop.” (Adam Smith,
op. cit., Vol. I, p. 153.) This rent “is seldom less than a fourth ...
of the whole produce”. (Op. cit., Vol. I, p. 325.)

_Rent_ cannot be paid on all commodities. For instance, in many
districts no rent is paid for stones.

“Such parts only of the produce of land can commonly be brought to
market of which the ordinary price is sufficient to replace the stock
which must be employed in bringing them thither, together with its
ordinary profits. If the ordinary price is more than this, the surplus
part of it will naturally go to the rent of the land. If it is not more,
though the commodity may be brought to market, it can afford no rent to
the landlord. Whether the price is or is not more depends upon the
demand.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 132.)

“Rent, it is to be observed, therefore, enters into the composition of
the price of commodities in a different way from wages and profit. High
or low wages and profit are the causes of high or low price; high or low
rent is the effect of it.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 132.)

_Food_ belongs to the products which always yield a _rent._

As men, like all other animals, naturally multiply in proportion to the
means of their subsistence, food is always, more or less, in demand. It
can always purchase or command a greater or smaller quantity of labor,
and somebody can always be found who is willing to do something in order
to obtain it. The quantity of labor, indeed, which it can purchase is
not always equal to what it could maintain, if managed in the most
economical manner, on account of the high wages which are sometimes
given to labor. But it can always purchase such a quantity of labor as
it can maintain, according to the rate at which the sort of labor is
commonly maintained in the neighborhood.

“But land, in almost any situation, produces a greater quantity of food
than what is sufficient to maintain all the labor necessary for bringing
it to market [.... ] The surplus, too, is always more than sufficient to
replace the stock which employed that labor, together with its profits.
Something, therefore, always remains for a rent to the landlord.” (Adam
Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 132-33.)

“Food is in this manner not only the original source of rent, but every
other part of the produce of land which afterwards affords rent derives
that part of its value from the improvement of the powers of labor in
producing food by means of the improvement and cultivation of land.”
(Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 150.)

“Human food seems to be the only produce of land which always and
necessarily affords some rent to the landlord.” (Op. cit., Vol. I, p.
147.)

“Countries are populous not in proportion to the number of people whom
their produce can clothe and lodge, but in proportion to that of those
whom it can feed.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 149.)

“After food, clothing and lodging are the two great wants of mankind.”
They usually yield a rent, but not inevitably. (Op. cit., Vol. I, p.
147.)

[15] Let us now see how the landlord exploits everything from which
society benefits.

(1) The rent of land increases with population. (Adam Smith, op. cit.,
Vol. I, p. 146.)

(2) We have already learnt from Say how the rent of land increases with
railways, etc., with the improvement, safety, and multiplication of the
means of communication.

(3) “Every improvement in the circumstances of the society tends either
directly or indirectly to raise the real rent of land, to increase the
real wealth of the landlord, his power of purchasing the labor, or the
produce of the labor of other people.

“The extension of improvement and cultivation tends to raise it
directly. The landlord’s share of the produce necessarily increases with
the increase of the produce.

“That rise in the real price of those parts of the rude produce of land
[...] the rise in the price of cattle, for example, tends too to raise
the rent of land directly, and in a still greater proportion. The real
value of the landlord’s share, his real command of the labor of other
people, not only rises with the real value of the produce, but the
proportion of his share to the whole produce rises with it. That
produce, after the rise in its real price, requires no more labor to
collect it than before. A smaller proportion of it will, therefore, be
sufficient to replace, with the ordinary profit, the stock which employs
that labor. A greater proportion of it must, consequently, belong to the
landlord.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp. 228-29.)

The greater demand for raw produce, and therefore the rise in value, may
in part result from the increase of population and from the increase of
their needs. But every new invention, every new application in
manufacture of a previously unused or little-used raw material, augments
rent. Thus, for example, there was a tremendous rise in the rent of coal
mines with the advent of the railways, steamships, etc.

Besides this advantage which the landlord derives from manufacture,
discoveries, and labor, there is yet another, as we shall presently see.

(4) “All those improvements in the productive powers of labor, which
tend directly to reduce the real price of manufactures, tend indirectly
to raise the real rent of land. The landlord exchanges that part of his
rude produce, which is over and above his own consumption, or what comes
to the same thing, the price of that part of it, for manufactured
produce. Whatever reduces the real price of the latter, raises that of
the former. An equal quantity of the former becomes thereby equivalent
to a greater quantity of the latter; and the landlord is enabled to
purchase a greater quantity of the conveniences, ornaments, or luxuries,
which he has occasion for.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 229)

But it is silly to conclude, as Smith does, that since the landlord
exploits every benefit which comes to society the interest of the
landlord is always identical with that of society. (Op. cit., Vol. I, p.
230.) In the economic system, under the rule of private property, the
interest which an individual has in society is in precisely inverse
proportion to the interest society has in him — just as the interest of
the usurer in the spendthrift is by no means identical with the interest
of the spendthrift.

We shall mention only in passing the landlord’s obsession with monopoly
directed against the landed property of foreign countries, from which
the Corn Laws[16], for instance, originate. Likewise, we shall here pass
over medieval serfdom, the slavery in the colonies, and the miserable
condition of the country folk, the day-laborers, in Great Britain. Let
us confine ourselves to the propositions of political economy itself.

(1) The landlord being interested in the welfare of society means,
according to the principles of political economy, that he is interested
in the growth of its population and manufacture, in the expansion of its
needs — in short, in the increase of wealth; and this increase of wealth
is, as we have already seen, identical with the increase of poverty and
slavery. The relation between increasing house rent and increasing
poverty is an example of the landlord’s interest in society, for the
ground rent, the interest obtained from the land on which the house
stands, goes up with the rent of the house.

(2) According to the political economists themselves, the landlord’s
interest is inimically opposed to the interest of the tenant farmer-and
thus already to a significant section of society.

(3) As the landlord can demand all the more rent from the tenant farmer
the less wages the farmer pays, and as the farmer forces down wages all
the lower the more rent the landlord demands, it follows that the
interest of the landlord is just as hostile to that of the farm workers
as is that of the manufacturers to their workers. He likewise forces
down wages to the minimum.

(4) Since a real reduction in the price of manufactured products raises
the rent of land, the landowner has a direct interest in lowering the
wages of industrial workers, in competition amongst the capitalists, in
over-production, in all the misery associated with industrial
production.

(5) While, thus, the landlord’s interest, far from being identical with
the interest of society, stands inimically opposed to the interest of
tenant farmers, farm laborers, factory workers and capitalists, on the
other hand, the interest of one landlord is not even identical with that
of another, on account of the competition which we will now consider.

In general the relationship of large and small landed property is like
that of big and small capital. But in addition, there are special
circumstances which lead inevitably to the accumulation of large landed
property and to the absorption of small property by it.

(1) Nowhere does the relative number of workers and implements decrease
more with increases in the size of the stock than in landed property.
Likewise, the possibility of all-round exploitation, of economizing
production costs, and of effective division of labor, increases nowhere
more with the size of the stock than in landed property. However small a
field may be, it requires for its working a certain irreducible minimum
of implements (plough, saw, etc.), whilst the size of a piece of landed
property can be reduced far below this minimum.

(2) Big landed property accumulates to itself the interest on the
capital which the tenant farmer has employed to improve the land. Small
landed property has to employ its own capital, and therefore does not
get this profit at all.

(3) While every social improvement benefits the big estate, it harms
small property, because it increases its need for ready cash.

(4) Two important laws concerning this competition remain to be
considered:

(a) The rent of the cultivated land, of which the produce is human food,
regulates the rent of the greater part of other cultivated land. (Adam
Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 144.)

Ultimately, only the big estate can produce such food as cattle, etc.
Therefore it regulates the rent of other land and can force it down to a
minimum.

The small landed proprietor working on his own land stands then to the
big landowner in the same relation as an artisan possessing his own tool
to the factory owner. Small property in land has become a mere
instrument of labor.[17] Rent entirely disappears for the small
proprietor; there remains to him at the most the interest on his
capital, and his wages. For rent can be driven down by competition till
it is nothing more than the interest on capital not invested by the
proprietor.

(b) In addition, we have already learnt that with equal fertility and
equally efficient exploitation of lands, mines and fisheries, the
produce is proportionate to the size of the capital. Hence the victory
of the big landowner. Similarly, where equal capitals are employed the
product is proportionate to the fertility. Hence, where capitals are
equal, victory goes to the proprietor of the more fertile soil.

(c) “A mine of any kind may be said to be either fertile or barren,
according as the quantity of mineral which can be brought from it by a
certain quantity of labor is greater or less than what can be brought by
an equal quantity from the greater part of other mines of the same
kind.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, p. 151.)

“The most fertile coal-mine, too, regulates the price of coal at all the
other mines in its neighborhood. Both the proprietor and the undertaker
of the work find, the one that he can get a greater rent, the other that
he can get a greater profit, by somewhat underselling all their
neighbors. Their neighbors are soon obliged to sell at the same price,
though they cannot so well afford it, and though it always diminishes,
and sometimes takes away altogether both their rent and their profit.
Some works are abandoned altogether; others can afford no rent, and can
be wrought only by the proprietor.” (Adam Smith, op. cit., Vol. I, pp.
152-53.)

“After the discovery of the mines of Peru, the silver mines of Europe
were, the greater part of them, abandoned.... This was the case, too,
with the mines of Cuba and St. Domingo, and even with the ancient mines
of Peru, after the discovery of those of Potosi.” (Op. cit., Vol. I, p.
154.)

What Smith here says of mines applies more or less to landed property
generally:

(d) “The ordinary market price of land, it is to be observed, depends
everywhere upon the ordinary market rate of interest.... If the rent of
land should fall short of the interest of money by a greater difference,
nobody would buy land, which would soon reduce its ordinary price. On
the contrary, if the advantages should much more than compensate the
difference, everybody would buy land, which again would soon raise its
ordinary price.” (Op. cit., Vol. I, p. 320.)

From this relation of rent of land to interest on money it follows that
rent must fall more and more, so that eventually only the wealthiest
people can live on rent. Hence the ever greater competition between
landowners who do not lease their land to tenants. Ruin of some of
these; further accumulation of large landed property.

This competition has the further consequence that a large part of landed
property falls into the hands of the capitalists and that capitalists
thus become simultaneously landowners, just as the smaller landowners
are on the whole already nothing more than capitalists. Similarly, a
section of large landowners become at the same time industrialists.

The final consequence is thus the abolition of the distinction between
capitalist and landowner, so that there remain altogether only two
classes of the population — the working class and the class of
capitalists. This huckstering with landed property, the transformation
of landed property into a commodity, constitutes the final overthrow of
the old and the final establishment of the money aristocracy.

(1) We will not join in the sentimental tears wept over this by
romanticism. Romanticism always confuses the shamefulness of
_huckstering the land_ with the perfectly rational consequence,
inevitable and desirable within the realm of private property, of the
_huckstering of private_ _property_ in land. In the first place, feudal
landed property is already by its very nature huckstered land — the
earth which is estranged from man and hence confronts him in the shape
of a few great lords.

The domination of the land as an alien power over men is already
inherent in feudal landed property. The serf is the adjunct of the land.
Likewise, the lord of an entailed estate, the first-born son, belongs to
the land. It inherits him. Indeed, the dominion of private property
begins with property in land — that is its basis. But in feudal landed
property the lord at least _appears_ as the king of the estate.
Similarly, there still exists the semblance of a more intimate
connection between the proprietor and the land than that of mere
_material_ wealth. The estate is individualized with its lord: it has
his rank, is baronial or ducal with him, has his privileges, his
jurisdiction, his political position, etc. It appears as the inorganic
body of its lord. Hence the proverb _nulle terre_ _sans maître_ [There
is no land without its master. – Ed.], which expresses the fusion of
nobility and landed property. Similarly, the rule of landed property
does not appear directly as the rule of mere capital. For those
belonging to it, the estate is more like their fatherland. It is a
constricted sort of nationality.

In the same way, feudal landed property gives its name to its lord, as
does a kingdom to its king. His family history, the history of his
house, etc. — all this individualizes the estate for him and makes it
literally his house, personifies it. Similarly those working on the
estate have not the position of _day-laborers_; but they are in part
themselves his property, as are serfs; and in part they are bound to him
by ties of respect, allegiance, and duty. His relation to them is
therefore directly political, and has likewise a human, intimate side.
Customs, character, etc., vary from one estate to another and seem to be
one with the land to which they belong; whereas later, it is only his
purse and not his character, his individuals , which connects a man with
an estate. Finally, the feudal lord does not try to extract the utmost
advantage from his land. Rather, he consumes what is there and calmly
leaves the worry of producing to the serfs and the tenants. Such is
_nobility’s_ relationship to landed property, which casts a romantic
glory on its lords.

It is necessary that this appearance be abolished — that landed
property, the root of private property, be dragged completely into the
movement of private property and that it become a commodity; that the
rule of the proprietor appear as the undisguised rule of private
property, of capital, freed of all political tincture; that the
relationship between proprietor and worker be reduced to the economic
relationship of exploiter and exploited; that all [ ... ] a personal
relationship between the proprietor and his property cease, property
becoming merely _objective_, material wealth; that the marriage of
convenience should take the place of the marriage of honor with the
land; and that the land should likewise sink to the status of a
commercial value, like man. It is essential that that which is the root
of landed property — filthy self-interest — make its appearance, too, in
its cynical form. It is essential that the immovable monopoly turn into
the mobile and restless monopoly, into competition; and that the idle
enjoyment of the products of other people’s blood and sweat turn into a
bustling commerce in the same commodity. Lastly, it is essential that in
this competition landed property, in the form of capital, manifest its
dominion over both the working class and the proprietors themselves who
are either being ruined or raised by the laws governing the movement of
capital. The medieval proverb _nulle terre sans seigneur_ [There is no
land without its lord. – Ed.] is thereby replaced by that other proverb,
_l’argent n’a pas_ _de maître_ [Money knows no master. – Ed.], wherein
is expressed the complete domination of dead matter over man.

(2) Concerning the argument of division or non-division of landed
property, the following is to be observed.

The _division of landed property_ negates the _large-scale monopoly_ of
property in land — abolishes it; but only by _generalizing_ this
monopoly. It does not abolish the source of monopoly, private property.
It attacks the existing form, but not the essence, of monopoly. The
consequence is that it falls victim to the laws of private property. For
the division of landed property corresponds to the movement of
competition in the sphere of industry. In addition to the economic
disadvantages of such a dividing-up of the instruments of labor, and the
dispersal of labor (to be clearly distinguished from the division of
labor: in separated labor the work is not shared out amongst many, but
each carries on the same work by himself, it is a multiplication of the
same work), this division [of land], like that competition [in
industry], necessarily turns again into accumulation.

Therefore, where the division of landed property takes place, there
remains nothing for it but to return to monopoly in a still more
malignant form, or to negate, to abolish the division of landed property
itself. To do that, however, is not to return to feudal ownership, but
to abolish private property in the soil altogether. The first abolition
of monopoly is always its generalization, the broadening of its
existence. The abolition of monopoly, once it has come to exist in its
utmost breadth and inclusiveness, is its total annihilation.
Association, applied to land, shares the economic advantage of
large-scale landed property, and first brings to realization the
original tendency inherent in [land] division, namely, equality. In the
same way association also re-establishes, now on a rational basis, no
longer mediated by serfdom, overlordship and the silly mysticism of
property, the intimate ties of man with the earth, since the earth
ceases to be an object of huckstering, and through free labor and free
enjoyment becomes once more a true personal property of man. A great
advantage of the division of landed property is that the masses, which
can no longer resign themselves to servitude, perish through property in
a different way than in industry.

As for large landed property, its defenders have always, sophistically,
identified the economic advantages offered by large-scale agriculture
with large-scale landed property, as if it were not precisely as a
result of the abolition of property that this advantage, for one thing,
would receive its greatest possible extension, and, for another, only
then would be of social benefit. In the same way, they have attacked the
huckstering spirit of small landed property, as if large landed property
did not contain huckstering latent within it, even in its feudal form —
not to speak of the modern English form, which combines the landlord’s
feudalism with the tenant farmer’s huckstering and industry.

Just as large landed property can return the reproach of monopoly
leveled against it by partitioned land, since partitioned land is also
based on the monopoly of private property, so can partitioned landed
property likewise return to large landed property the reproach of
partition, since partition also prevails there, though in a rigid and
frozen form. Indeed, private property rests altogether on partitioning.
Moreover, just as division of the land leads back to large landed
property as a form of capital wealth, so must feudal landed property
necessarily lead to partitioning or at least fall into the hands of the
capitalists, turn and twist as it may.

For large landed property, as in England, drives the overwhelming
majority of the population into the arms of industry and reduces its own
workers to utter wretchedness. Thus, it engenders and enlarges the power
of its enemy, capital, industry, by throwing poor people and an entire
activity of the country on to the other side. It makes the majority of
the people of the country industrial and thus opponents of large landed
property. Where industry has attained to great power, as in England at
the present time, it progressively forces from large landed property its
monopoly against foreign countries and throws it into competition with
landed property abroad. For under the sway of industry landed property
could keep its feudal grandeur secure only by means of monopolies
against foreign countries, thereby protecting itself against the general
laws of trade, which are incompatible with its feudal character. Once
thrown into competition, landed property obeys the laws of competition,
like every other commodity subjected to competition. It begins thus to
fluctuate, to decrease and to increase, to fly from one hand to another;
and no law can keep it any longer in a few predestined hands. The
immediate consequence is the splitting up of the land amongst many
hands, and in any case subjection to the power of industrial capitals.

Finally, large landed property which has been forcibly preserved in this
way and which has begotten by its side a tremendous industry leads to
crisis even more quickly than the partitioning of land, in comparison
with which the power of industry remains constantly of second rank.

Large landed property, as we see in England, has already cast off its
feudal character and adopted an industrial character insofar as it is
aiming to make as much money as possible. To the owner it yields the
utmost possible rent, to the tenant farmer the utmost possible profit on
his capital. The workers on the land, in consequence, have already been
reduced to the minimum, and the class of tenant farmers already
represents within landed property the power of industry and capital. As
a result of foreign competition, rent in most cases can no longer form
an independent income. A large number of landowners are forced to
displace tenant farmers, some of whom in this way [ ...] sink into the
proletariat. On the other hand, many tenant farmers will take over
landed property; for the big proprietors, who with their comfortable
incomes have mostly given themselves over to extravagance and for the
most part are not competent to conduct large-scale agriculture, often
possess neither the capital nor the ability for the exploitation of the
land. Hence a section of this class, too, is completely ruined.
Eventually wages, which have already been reduced to a minimum, must be
reduced yet further, to meet the new competition. This then necessarily
leads to revolution.

Landed property had to develop in each of these two ways so as to
experience in both its necessary downfall, just as industry both in the
form of monopoly and in that of competition had to ruin itself so as to
learn to believe in man. |XXI||

[Estranged Labor]

||XXII| We have proceeded from the premises of political economy. We
have accepted its language and its laws. We presupposed private
property, the separation of labor, capital and land, and of wages,
profit of capital and rent of land – likewise division of labor,
competition, the concept of exchange value, etc. On the basis of
political economy itself, in its own words, we have shown that the
worker sinks to the level of a commodity and becomes indeed the most
wretched of commodities; that the wretchedness of the worker is in
inverse proportion to the power and magnitude of his production; that
the necessary result of competition is the accumulation of capital in a
few hands, and thus the restoration of monopoly in a more terrible form;
and that finally the distinction between capitalist and land rentier,
like that between the tiller of the soil and the factory worker,
disappears and that the whole of society must fall apart into the two
classes – property owners and propertyless workers.

Political economy starts with the fact of private property; it does not
explain it to us. It expresses in general, abstract formulas the
_material_ process through which private property actually passes, and
these formulas it then takes for _laws_. It does not _comprehend_ these
laws – i.e., it does not demonstrate how they arise from the very nature
of private property. Political economy throws no light on the cause of
the division between labor and capital, and between capital and land.
When, for example, it defines the relationship of wages to profit, it
takes the interest of the capitalists to be the ultimate cause, i.e., it
takes for granted what it is supposed to explain. Similarly, competition
comes in everywhere. It is explained from external circumstances. As to
how far these external and apparently accidental circumstances are but
the expression of a necessary course of development, political economy
teaches us nothing. We have seen how exchange itself appears to it as an
accidental fact. The only wheels which political economy sets in motion
are _greed_, and the _war amongst the greedy – competition_. [After this
paragraph the following sentence is crossed out in the manuscript: “We
now have to examine the nature of this _material_ movement of property.”
– _Ed._]

Precisely because political economy does not grasp the way the movement
is connected, it was possible to oppose, for instance, the doctrine of
competition to the doctrine of monopoly, the doctrine of the freedom of
the crafts to the doctrine of the guild, the doctrine of the division of
landed property to the doctrine of the big estate – for competition,
freedom of the crafts and the division of landed property were explained
and comprehended only as accidental, premeditated and violent
consequences of monopoly, of the guild system, and of feudal property,
not as their necessary, inevitable and natural consequences.

Now, therefore, we have to grasp the intrinsic connection between
private property, greed, the separation of labor, capital and landed
property; the connection of exchange and competition, of value and the
devaluation of man, of monopoly and competition, etc. – the connection
between this whole estrangement and the _money_ system.

Do not let us go back to a fictitious primordial condition as the
political economist does, when he tries to explain. Such a primordial
condition explains nothing; it merely pushes the question away into a
grey nebulous distance. The economist assumes in the form of a fact, of
an event, what he is supposed to deduce – namely, the necessary
relationship between two things – between, for example, division of
labor and exchange. Thus the theologian explains the origin of evil by
the fall of man – that is, he assumes as a fact, in historical form,
what has to be explained.

We proceed from an _actual_ economic fact.

The worker becomes all the poorer the more wealth he produces, the more
his production increases in power and size. The worker becomes an ever
cheaper commodity the more commodities he creates. The _devaluation_ of
the world of men is in direct proportion to the _increasing value_ of
the world of things. Labor produces not only commodities; it produces
itself and the worker as a _commodity_ – and this at the same rate at
which it produces commodities in general.

This fact expresses merely that the object which labor produces –
labor’s product – confronts it as _something alien_, as a _power
independent_ of the producer. The product of labor is labor which has
been embodied in an object, which has become material: it is the
_objectification_ of labor. Labor’s realization is its objectification.
Under these economic conditions this realization of labor appears as
_loss of realization_ for the workers;[18] objectification as _loss of
the object_ _and bondage_ _to it_; appropriation as _estrangement,_ as
_alienation_.[19]

So much does labor’s realization appear as loss of realization that the
worker loses realization to the point of starving to death. So much does
objectification appear as loss of the object that the worker is robbed
of the objects most necessary not only for his life but for his work.
Indeed, labor  itself becomes an object which he can obtain only with
the greatest effort and with the most irregular interruptions. So much
does the appropriation of the object appear as estrangement that the
more objects the worker produces the less he can possess and the more he
falls under the sway of his product, capital.

All these consequences are implied in the statement that the worker is
related to the _product of_ _his labor_ as to an alien object. For on
this premise it is clear that the more the worker spends himself, the
more powerful becomes the alien world of objects which he creates over
and against himself, the poorer he himself  – his inner world – becomes,
the less belongs to him as his own. It is the same in religion. The more
man puts into God, the less he retains in himself. The worker puts his
life into the object; but now his life no longer belongs to him but to
the object. Hence, the greater this activity, the more the worker lacks
objects. Whatever the product of his labor is, he is not. Therefore, the
greater this product, the less is he himself. The _alienation_ of the
worker in his product means not only that his labor becomes an object,
an _external_ existence, but that it exists _outside him_,
independently, as something alien to him, and that it becomes a power on
its own confronting him. It means that the life which he has conferred
on the object confronts him as something hostile and alien.

||XXIII| Let us now look more closely at the _objectification_, at the
production of the worker; and in it at the _estrangement_, the _loss_ of
the object, of his product.

The worker can create nothing without _nature_, without the _sensuous
external world_. It is the material on which his labor is realized, in
which it is active, from which, and by means of which it produces.

But just as nature provides labor with [the] _means of life_ in the
sense that labor cannot _live_ without objects on which to operate, on
the other hand, it also provides the _means of life_ in the more
restricted sense, i.e., the means for the physical subsistence of the
_worker_ himself.

Thus the more the worker by his labor _appropriates_ the external world,
sensuous nature, the more he deprives himself of _means of life_ in two
respects: first, in that the sensuous external world more and more
ceases to be an object belonging to his labor – to be his labor’s _means
of life_; and, second, in that it more and more ceases to be _means of
life_ in the immediate sense, means for the physical subsistence of the
worker.

In both respects, therefore, the worker becomes a servant of his object,
first, in that he receives an _object of labor_, i.e., in that he
receives _work_, and, secondly, in that he receives _means of_
_subsistence_. This enables him to exist, first as a _worker_; and
second, as a _physical subject_. The height of this servitude is that it
is only as a _worker_ that he can maintain himself as a _physical_
_subject_ and that it is only as a _physical subject_ that he is a
worker.

(According to the economic laws the estrangement of the worker in his
object is expressed thus: the more the worker produces, the less he has
to consume; the more values he creates, the more valueless, the more
unworthy he becomes; the better formed his product, the more deformed
becomes the worker; the more civilized his object, the more barbarous
becomes the worker; the more powerful labor becomes, the more powerless
becomes the worker; the more ingenious labor becomes, the less ingenious
becomes the worker and the more he becomes nature’s servant.)

_Political economy conceals the estrangement inherent in the nature of
labor by not considering the _DIRECT_ relationship between the _WORKER
(labor) _and production_. It is true that labor produces for the rich
wonderful things – but for the worker it produces privation. It produces
palaces – but for the worker, hovels. It produces beauty – but for the
worker, deformity. It replaces labor by machines, but it throws one
section of the workers back into barbarous types of labor and it turns
the other section into a machine. It produces intelligence – but for the
worker, stupidity, cretinism.

_The direct relationship of labor to its products is the relationship of
the worker to the objects of his production_. The relationship of the
man of means to the objects of production and to production itself is
only a _consequence_ of this first relationship – and confirms it. We
shall consider this other aspect later. When we ask, then,  what is the
essential relationship of labor we are asking about the relationship of
the _worker_ to production.

Till now we have been considering the estrangement, the alienation of
the worker only in one of its aspects , i.e., the worker’s relationship
to the products of his labor. But the estrangement is manifested not
only in the result but in the act of production, within the producing
activity, itself. How could the worker come to face the product of his
activity as a stranger, were it not that in the very act of production
he was estranging himself from himself? The product is after all but the
summary of the activity, of production. If then the product of labor is
alienation, production itself must be active alienation, the alienation
of activity, the activity of alienation. In the estrangement of the
object of labor is merely summarized the estrangement, the alienation,
in the activity of labor itself.

What, then, constitutes the alienation of labor?

First, the fact that labor is _external_ to the worker, i.e., it does
not belong to his intrinsic nature; that in his work, therefore, he does
not affirm himself but denies himself, does not feel content but
unhappy, does not develop freely his physical and mental energy but
mortifies his body and ruins his mind. The worker therefore only feels
himself outside his work, and in his work feels outside himself. He
feels at home when he is not working, and when he is working he does not
feel at home. His labor is therefore not voluntary, but coerced; it is
_forced_ _labor_. It is therefore not the satisfaction of a need; it is
merely a _means_ to satisfy needs external to it. Its alien character
emerges clearly in the fact that as soon as no physical or other
compulsion exists, labor is shunned like the plague. External labor,
labor in which man alienates himself, is a labor of self-sacrifice, of
mortification. Lastly, the external character of labor for the worker
appears in the fact that it is not his own, but someone else’s, that it
does not belong to him, that in it he belongs, not to himself, but to
another. Just as in religion the spontaneous activity of the human
imagination, of the human brain and the human heart, operates on the
individual independently of him – that is, operates as an alien, divine
or diabolical activity – so is the worker’s activity not his spontaneous
activity. It belongs to another; it is the loss of his self.

As a result, therefore, man (the worker) only feels himself freely
active in his animal functions – eating, drinking, procreating, or at
most in his dwelling and in dressing-up, etc.; and in his human
functions he no longer feels himself to be anything but an animal.  What
is animal becomes human and what is human becomes animal.

Certainly eating, drinking, procreating, etc., are also genuinely human
functions. But taken abstractly, separated from the sphere of all other
human activity and turned into sole and ultimate ends, they are animal
functions.

We have considered the act of estranging practical human activity,
labor, in two of its aspects. (1) The relation of the worker to the
_product of labor_ as an alien object exercising power over him. This
relation is at the same time the relation to the sensuous external
world, to the objects of nature, as an alien world inimically opposed to
him. (2) The relation of labor to the _act of_ _production_ within the
_labor_ process. This relation is the relation of the worker to his own
activity as an alien activity not belonging to him; it is activity as
suffering, strength as weakness, begetting as emasculating, the worker’s
_own_ physical and mental energy, his personal life – for what is life
but activity? – as an activity which is turned against him, independent
of him and not belonging to him. Here we have _self-estrangement_, as
previously we had the estrangement of the _thing_.

||XXIV| We have still a third aspect of _estranged labor_ to deduce from
the two already considered.

Man is a species-being,[20] not only because in practice and in theory
he adopts the species (his own as well as those of other things) as his
object, but – and this is only another way of expressing it – also
because he treats himself as the actual, living species; because he
treats himself as a _universal_ and therefore a free being.

The life of the species, both in man and in animals, consists physically
in the fact that man (like the animal) lives on organic nature; and the
more universal man (or the animal) is, the more universal is the sphere
of inorganic nature on which he lives. Just as plants, animals, stones,
air, light, etc., constitute theoretically a part of human
consciousness, partly as objects of natural science, partly as objects
of art – his spiritual inorganic nature, spiritual nourishment which he
must first prepare to make palatable and digestible – so also in the
realm of practice they constitute a part of human life and human
activity. Physically man lives only on these products of nature, whether
they appear in the form of food, heating, clothes, a dwelling, etc. The
universality of man appears in practice precisely in the universality
which makes all nature his _inorganic_ body – both inasmuch as nature is
(1) his direct means of life, and (2) the material, the object, and the
instrument of his life activity. Nature is man’s _inorganic body_ –
nature, that is, insofar as it is not itself human body. Man _lives_ on
nature – means that nature is his _body_, with which he must remain in
continuous interchange if he is not to die. That man’s physical and
spiritual life is linked to nature means simply that nature is linked to
itself, for man is a part of nature.

In estranging from man (1) nature, and (2) himself, his own active
functions, his life activity, estranged labor estranges the _species_
from man. It changes for him the _life of the species_ into a means of
individual life. First it estranges the life of the species and
individual life, and secondly it makes individual life in its abstract
form the purpose of the life of the species, likewise in its abstract
and estranged form.

For labor, _life activity, productive life_ itself, appears to man in
the first place merely as a _means_ of satisfying a need – the need to
maintain physical existence. Yet the productive life is the life of the
species. It is life-engendering life. The whole character of a species,
its species-character, is contained in the character of its life
activity; and free, conscious activity is man’s species-character. Life
itself appears only as a _means to life_.

The animal is immediately one with its life activity. It does not
distinguish itself from it.  It is _its life activity_. Man makes his
life activity itself the object of his will and of his consciousness. He
has conscious life activity. It is not a determination with which he
directly merges. Conscious life activity distinguishes man immediately
from animal life activity. It is just because of this that he is a
species-being. Or it is only because he is a species-being that he is a
conscious being, i.e., that his own life is an object for him. Only
because of that is his activity free activity. Estranged labor reverses
the relationship, so that it is just because man is a conscious being
that he makes his life activity, his _essential being_, a mere means to
his _existence._

In creating a _world of objects_ by his personal activity, in his _work
upon_ inorganic nature, man proves himself a conscious species-being,
i.e., as a being that treats the species as his own essential being, or
that treats itself as a species-being. Admittedly animals also produce.
They build themselves nests, dwellings, like the bees, beavers, ants,
etc. But an animal only produces what it immediately needs for itself or
its young. It produces one-sidedly, whilst man produces universally. It
produces only under the dominion of immediate physical need, whilst man
produces even when he is free from physical need and only truly produces
in freedom therefrom. An animal produces only itself, whilst man
reproduces the whole of nature.  An animal’s product belongs immediately
to its physical body, whilst man freely confronts his product. An animal
forms only in accordance with the standard and the need of the species
to which it belongs, whilst man knows how to produce in accordance with
the standard of every species, and knows how to apply everywhere the
inherent standard to the object.  Man therefore also forms objects in
accordance with the laws of beauty.

It is just in his work upon the objective world, therefore, that man
really proves himself to be a _species-being_. This production is his
active species-life. Through this production, nature appears as _his_
work and his reality. The object of labor is, therefore, the
_objectification of man’s species-life_: for he duplicates himself not
only, as in consciousness, intellectually, but also actively, in
reality, and therefore he sees himself in a world that he has created.
In tearing away from man the object of his production, therefore,
estranged labor tears from him his _species-life_, his real objectivity
as a member of the species and transforms his advantage over animals
into the disadvantage that his inorganic body, nature, is taken from
him.

Similarly, in degrading spontaneous, free activity to a means, estranged
labor makes man’s species-life a means to his physical existence.

The consciousness which man has of his species is thus transformed by
estrangement in such a way that species [-life]  becomes for him a
means. 

Estranged labor turns thus:

(3) _Man’s species-being_, both nature and his spiritual
species-property, into a being _alien_ to him, into a _means_ of his
_individual existence_. It estranges from man his own body, as well as
external nature and his spiritual aspect, his _human_ aspect.

(4) An immediate consequence of the fact that man is estranged from the
product of his labor, from his life activity, from his species-being, is
the _estrangement of man_ from _man_. When man confronts himself, he
confronts the _other_ man. What applies to a man’s relation to his work,
to the product of his labor and to himself, also holds of a man’s
relation to the other man, and to the other man’s labor and object of
labor.

 In fact, the proposition that man’s species-nature is estranged from
him means that one man is estranged from the other, as each of them is
from man’s essential nature.

The estrangement of man, and in fact every relationship in which man
[stands] to himself, is realized and expressed only in the relationship
in which a man stands to other men.

Hence within the relationship of estranged labor each man views the
other in accordance with the standard and the relationship in which he
finds himself as a worker.

||XXV| We took our departure from a fact of political economy – the
estrangement of the worker and his production. We have formulated this
fact in conceptual terms as _estranged, alienated_ labor. We have
analyzed this concept – hence analyzing merely a fact of political
economy.

Let us now see, further, how the concept of estranged, alienated labor
must express and present itself in real life.

If the product of labor is alien to me, if it confronts me as an alien
power, to whom, then, does it belong?

To a being _other_ than myself.

Who is this being?

The _gods_? To be sure, in the earliest times the principal production
(for example, the building of temples, etc., in Egypt, India and Mexico)
appears to be in the service of the gods, and the product belongs to the
gods. However, the gods on their own were never the lords of labor. No
more was _nature._ And what a contradiction it would be if, the more man
subjugated nature by his labor and the more the miracles of the gods
were rendered superfluous by the miracles of industry, the more man were
to renounce the joy of production and the enjoyment of the product to
please these powers.

The _alien_ being, to whom labor and the product of labor belongs, in
whose service labor is done and for whose benefit the product of labor
is provided, can only be _man_ himself.

If the product of labor does not belong to the worker, if it confronts
him as an alien power, then this can only be because it belongs to some
_other man than the worker_. If the worker’s activity is a torment to
him, to another it must give _satisfaction_ and pleasure. Not the gods,
not nature, but only man himself can be this alien power over man.

We must bear in mind the previous proposition that man’s relation to
himself becomes for him _objective_ and _actual_ through his relation to
the other man. Thus, if the product of his labor, his labor objectified,
is for him an _alien, hostile_, powerful object independent of him, then
his position towards it is such that someone else is master of this
object, someone who is alien, hostile, powerful, and independent of him.
If he treats his own activity as an unfree activity, then he treats it
as an activity performed in the service, under the dominion, the
coercion, and the yoke of another man.

Every self-estrangement of man, from himself and from nature, appears in
the relation in which he places himself and nature to men other than and
differentiated from himself. For this reason religious self-estrangement
necessarily appears in the relationship of the layman to the priest, or
again to a mediator, etc., since we are here dealing with the
intellectual world.  In the real practical world self-estrangement can
only become manifest through the real practical relationship to other
men. The medium through which estrangement takes place is itself
_practical_.  Thus through estranged labor man not only creates his
relationship to the object and to the act of production as to powers [in
the manuscript Menschen (men) instead of Mächte (powers). – Ed.] that
are alien and hostile to him; he also creates the relationship in which
other men stand to his production and to his product, and the
relationship in which he stands to these other men. Just as he creates
his own production as the loss of his reality, as his punishment; his
own product as a loss, as a product not belonging to him; so he creates
the domination of the person who does not produce over production and
over the product. Just as he estranges his own activity from himself, so
he confers upon the stranger an activity which is not his own.

We have until now considered this relationship only from the standpoint
of the worker and later on we shall be considering it also from the
standpoint of the non-worker.

Through _estranged, alienated labor_, then, the worker produces the
relationship to this labor of a man alien to labor and standing outside
it. The relationship of the worker to labor creates the relationship to
it of the capitalist (or whatever one chooses to call the master of
labor). _Private property_ is thus the product, the result, the
necessary consequence, of _alienated labor_, of the external relation of
the worker to nature and to himself.

_Private property_ thus results by analysis from the concept of
_alienated labor_, i.e., of _alienated_ _man_, of estranged labor, of
estranged life, of _estranged_ man.

True, it is as a result of the _movement of private property_ that we
have obtained the concept of _alienated labor (of alienated life)_ in
political economy. But on analysis of this concept it becomes clear that
though private property appears to be the reason, the cause of alienated
labor, it is rather its consequence, just as the gods are _originally_
not the cause but the effect of man’s intellectual confusion.  Later
this relationship becomes reciprocal.

Only at the culmination of the development of private property does
this, its secret, appear again, namely, that on the one hand it is the
_product_ of alienated labor, and that on the other it is the _means_ by
which labor alienates itself, the _realization of this alienation_.

This exposition immediately sheds light on various hitherto unsolved
conflicts.

 (1) Political economy starts from labor as the real soul of production;
yet to labor it gives nothing, and to private property everything.
Confronting this contradiction, Proudhon has decided in favor of labor
against private property[21]. We understand, however, that this apparent
contradiction is the contradiction of _estranged labor_ with itself, and
that political economy has merely formulated the laws of estranged
labor.

We also understand, therefore, that _wages_ and _private property_ are
identical. Indeed, where the product, as the object of labor, pays for
labor itself, there the wage is but a necessary consequence of labor’s
estrangement. Likewise, in the wage of labor, labor does not appear as
an end in itself but as the servant of the wage.  We shall develop this
point later, and meanwhile will only draw some conclusions. ||XXVI| [22]

An enforced _increase of wages_ (disregarding all other difficulties,
including the fact that it would only be by force, too, that such an
increase, being an anomaly, could be maintained) would therefore be
nothing but better _payment for the slave_, and would not win either for
the worker or for labor their human status and dignity.

Indeed, even the _equality of wages_, as demanded by Proudhon, only
transforms the relationship of the present-day worker to his labor into
the relationship of all men to labor. Society is then conceived as an
abstract capitalist.

Wages are a direct consequence of estranged labor, and estranged labor
is the direct cause of private property. The downfall of the one must
therefore involve the downfall of the other.

(2) From the relationship of estranged labor to private property it
follows further that the emancipation of society from private property,
etc., from servitude, is expressed in the _political_ form of the
_emancipation of the workers_; not that _their_ emancipation alone is at
stake, but because the emancipation of the workers contains universal
human emancipation – and it contains this because the whole of human
servitude is involved in the relation of the worker to production, and
all relations of servitude are but modifications and consequences of
this relation.

Just as we have derived the concept of _private property_ from the
concept of _estranged, alienated_ _labor_ by _analysis_, so we can
develop every _category_ of political economy with the help of these two
factors; and we shall find again in each category, e.g., trade,
competition, capital, money only a _particular_ and _developed
expression_ of these first elements.

But before considering this phenomenon, however, let us try to solve two
other problems.

(1) To define the general _nature of private property_, as it has arisen
as a result of estranged labor, in its relation to _truly human_ and
_social property_.

(2) We have accepted the _estrangement of labor_, its _alienation_, as a
fact, and we have analyzed this fact. How, we now ask, does _man_ come
to _alienate_, to estrange, his _labor_? How is this estrangement rooted
in the nature of human development? We have already gone a long way to
the solution of this problem by _transforming_ the question of the
_origin of private property_ into the question of the relation of
_alienated labor_ to the course of humanity’s development. For when one
speaks of _private property_, one thinks of dealing with something
external to man. When one speaks of labor, one is directly dealing with
man himself. This new formulation of the question already contains its
solution.

_As to (1): The general nature of private property and its relation to
truly human property_.

Alienated labor has resolved itself for us into two components which
depend on one another, or which are but different expressions of one and
the same relationship. _Appropriation_ appears as _estrangement_, as
_alienation_; and _alienation_ appears as _appropriation_,
_estrangement_ as truly _becoming a citizen_.[23]

We have considered the one side – _alienated_ labor in relation to the
_worker_ himself, i.e., the _relation of alienated labor to itself_. The
product, the necessary outcome of this relationship, as we have seen, is
the _property relation of the non-worker to the worker and to labor.
Private property_, as the material, summary expression of alienated
labor, embraces both relations – the _relation of the worker to work and
to the product of his labor and to the non-worker_, and the relation of
the _non-worker to the worker and to the product of his labor_.

Having seen that in relation to the worker who _appropriates_ nature by
means of his labor, this appropriation appears as estrangement, his own
spontaneous activity as activity for another and as activity of another,
vitality as a sacrifice of life, production of the object as loss of the
object to an alien power, to an _alien_ person – we shall now consider
the relation to the worker, to labor and its object of this person who
is _alien_ to labor and the worker.

First it has to be noted that everything which appears in the worker as
an _activity of alienation_, _of estrangement_, appears in the
non-worker as a _state of alienation, of estrangement_.

Secondly, that the worker’s _real, practical attitude_ in production and
to the product (as a state of mind) appears in the non-worker who
confronting him as a _theoretical_ attitude.

||XXVII| _Thirdly_, the non-worker does everything against the worker
which the worker does against himself; but he does not do against
himself what he does against the worker.

Let us look more closely at these three relations. |XXVII||

[First Manuscript breaks off here.]

 

 

 


Second Manuscript

Antithesis of Capital and Labor. Landed Property and Capital

[....]  ||XL| forms the interest on his capital. The worker is the
subjective manifestation of the fact that capital is man wholly lost to
himself, just as capital is the objective manifestation of the fact that
labor is man lost to himself. But the worker has the misfortune to be a
living capital, and therefore an indigent capital, one which loses its
interest, and hence its livelihood, every moment it is not working. The
value of the worker as capital rises according to demand and supply, and
physically too his existence, his life, was and is looked upon as a
supply of a commodity like any other. The worker produces capital,
capital produces him – hence he produces himself, and man as worker, as
a commodity, is the product of this entire cycle. To the man who is
nothing more than a worker – and to him as a worker – his human
qualities only exist insofar as they exist for capital alien to him.
Because man and capital are alien, foreign to each other, however, and
thus stand in an indifferent, external and accidental relationship to
each other, it is inevitable that this foreignness should also appear as
something real. As soon, therefore, as it occurs to capital (whether
from necessity or caprice) no longer to be for the worker, he himself is
no longer for himself: he has no work, hence no wages, and since he has
no existence as a human being but only as a worker, he can go and bury
himself, starve to death, etc. The worker exists as a worker only when
he exists for himself as capital; and he exists as capital only when
some capital exists for him. The existence of capital is his existence,
his life; as it determines the tenor of his life in a manner indifferent
to him.

Political economy, therefore, does not recognize the unemployed worker,
the workingman, insofar as he happens to be outside this labor
relationship. The rascal, swindler, beggar, the unemployed, the
starving, wretched and criminal workingman – these are _figures_ who do
not exist _for political economy_ but only for other eyes, those of the
doctor, the judge, the grave-digger, and bum-bailiff, etc.; such figures
are specters outside its domain. For it, therefore, the worker’s needs
are but the one _need_ – to maintain him _whilst he is working_ and
insofar as may be necessary to prevent the _race of laborers_ from
[dying] out. The wages of labor have thus exactly the same significance
as the _maintenance_ and _servicing_ of any other productive instrument,
or as the _consumption of capital_ in general, required for its
reproduction with interest, like the oil which is applied to wheels to
keep them turning. Wages, therefore, belong to capital’s and the
capitalist’s _necessary costs_, and must not exceed the bounds of this
necessity. It was therefore quite logical for the English factory
owners, before the Amendment Bill of 1834, to deduct from the wages of
the worker the public charity which he was receiving out of the Poor
Rate and to consider this to be an integral part of wages.[24]

Production does not simply produce man as a _commodity_, the _human
commodity_, man in the role of _commodity_; it produces him in keeping
with this role as a _mentally_ and physically _dehumanized_ being. –
Immorality, deformity, and dulling of the workers and the capitalists. –
Its product is the _self-conscious and self-acting commodity_ ... the
_human_ commodity.... Great advance of Ricardo, Mill, etc., on Smith and
Say, to declare the _existence_ of the human being – the greater or
lesser human productivity of the commodity – to be _indifferent_ and
even _harmful._ Not how many workers are maintained by a given capital,
but rather how much interest it brings in, the sum-total of the annual
_savings_, is said to be the true purpose of production.

It was likewise a great and consistent advance of modern ||XLI| English
political economy, that, whilst elevating _labor_ to the position of its
_sole_ principle, it should at the same time expound with complete
clarity the _inverse_ relation between wages and interest on capital,
and the fact that the capitalist could normally _only_ gain by pressing
down wages, and vice versa. Not the defrauding of the consumer, but the
capitalist and the worker taking advantage of each other, is shown to be
the _normal_ relationship.

The relations of private property contain latent within them the
relation of private property as _labor_, the relation of private
property as _capital,_ and the _mutual relation_ of these two to one
another. There is the production of human activity as _labor_ – that is,
as an activity quite alien to itself, to man and to nature, and
therefore to consciousness and the expression of life – the _abstract_
existence of man as a mere _workman_ who may therefore daily fall from
his filled void into the absolute void – into his social, and therefore
actual, non-existence. On the other hand, there is the production of the
object of human activity as _capital_ – in which all the natural and
social characteristic of the object is _extinguished_; in which private
property has lost its natural and social quality (and therefore every
political and social illusion, and is not associated with any
_apparently_ human relations); in which the _selfsame_ capital remains
the _same_ in the most diverse natural and social manifestations,
totally indifferent to its _real_ content. This contradiction, driven to
the limit, is of necessity the limit, the culmination, and the downfall
of the whole private-property relationship.

It is therefore another great achievement of modern English political
economy to have declared rent of land to be the difference in the
interest yielded by the worst and the best land under cultivation; to
have [exposed] the landowner’s romantic illusions – his alleged social
importance and the identity of his interest with the interest of
society, a view still maintained by _Adam Smith_ after the Physiocrats;
and to [have] anticipated and prepared the movement of the real world
which will transform the landowner into an ordinary, prosaic capitalist,
and thus simplify and sharpen the contradiction [between capital and
labor] and hasten its resolution. _Land_ as _land_, and _rent_ as
_rent_, have lost their _distinction of rank_ and become insignificant
_capital_ and _interest_ – or rather, _capital_ and _interest_ that
signify only money.

The _distinction_ between capital and land, between profit and rent, and
between both and wages, and _industry_, and _agriculture_, and
_immovable_ and _movable_ private property – this distinction is not
rooted in the nature of things, but is a _historical_ distinction, a
_fixed_ historical moment in the formation and development of the
contradiction between capital and labor. In industry, etc., as opposed
to immovable landed property, is only expressed the way in which
[industry] came into being and the contradiction to agriculture in which
industry developed. This distinction only continues to exist as a
_special_ sort of work – as an _essential, important_ and
_life-embracing_ distinction – so long as industry (town life) develops
_over_ and _against_ landed property (aristocratic feudal life) and
itself continues to bear the feudal character of its opposite in the
form of monopoly, craft, guild, corporation, etc., within which labor
still has a _seemingly social_ significance, still the significance of
the _real_ community, and has not yet reached the stage of
_indifference_ to its content, of complete being-for-self [25], i.e., of
abstraction from all other being, and hence has not yet become
_liberated_ capital.

||XLII| But liberated _industry_, industry constituted for itself as
such, and _liberated capital_, are the necessary _development_ of labor.
The power of industry over its opposite is at once revealed in the
emergence of _agriculture_ as a real industry, while previously it left
most of the work to the soil and to the _slave_ of the soil, through
whom the land cultivated itself. With the transformation of the slave
into a _free_ worker – i.e., into a _hireling_ – the landlord himself is
transformed into a captain of industry, into a capitalist – a
transformation which takes place at first through the intermediacy of
the _tenant farmer_. The _tenant farmer_, however, is the landowner’s
representative – the landowner’s revealed _secret_: it is only through
him that the landowner has his _economic_ existence – his existence as a
private proprietor – for the rent of his land only exists due to the
competition between the farmers.

Thus, in the person of the _tenant farmer_ the landlord _has_ already
become in essence a _common_ capitalist. And this must come to pass,
too, in actual fact: the capitalist engaged in agriculture – the tenant
– must become a landlord, or vice versa. The tenant’s _industrial
hucksterism_ is the _landowner’s_ industrial hucksterism, for the being
of the former postulates the being of the latter.

But mindful of their contrasting origin, of their line of descent, the
landowner knows the capitalist as his insolent, liberated, enriched
slave of yesterday and sees himself as a _capitalist_ who is threatened
by him. The capitalist knows the landowner as the idle, cruel,
egotistical master of yesterday; he knows that he injures him as a
capitalist, but that it is to industry that he owes all his present
social significance, his possessions and his pleasures; he sees in him
[the landowner] a contradiction to _free_ industry and to _free_ capital
– to capital independent of every natural limitation. This contradiction
[between landowner and capitalist] is extremely bitter, and each side
tells the truth about the other. One need only read the attacks of
immovable on movable property and vice versa to obtain a clear picture
of their respective worthlessness. The landowner lays stress on the
noble lineage of his property, on feudal souvenirs or reminiscences, the
poetry of recollection, on his romantic disposition, on his political
importance, etc.; and when he talks economics, it is _only_ agriculture
that he holds to be productive. At the same time he depicts his
adversary as a sly, hawking, carping, deceitful, greedy, mercenary,
rebellious, heart- and soulless person who is estranged from the
community and freely trades it away, who breeds, nourishes and cherishes
competition, and with it pauperism, crime, and the dissolution of all
social bonds, an extorting, pimping, servile, smooth, flattering,
fleecing, dried-up _rogue_ without honor, principles, poetry, substance,
or anything else. (Amongst others see the Physiocrat _Bergasse_, whom
Camille Desmoulins flays in his journal, _Révolutions de France et de
Brabant[26]_; see von Vincke, Lancizolle, Haller, Leo, Kosegarten and
also _Sismondi_.)

[See on the other hand the garrulous, old-Hegelian theologian _Funke_
who tells, after Herr Leo, with tears in his eyes how a slave had
refused, when serfdom was abolished, to cease being the property of the
gentry[27]. See also the _patriotic visions of Justus Möser_, which
distinguish themselves by the fact that they never for a moment [...]
abandon the respectable, petty-bourgeois _"home-baked", ordinary_,
narrow horizon of the philistine, and which nevertheless remain _pure_
fancy. This contradiction has given them such an appeal to the German
heart. - Note by Marx.]

Movable property, for its part, points to the miracles of industry and
progress. It is the child of modern times, whose legitimate, native-born
son it is. It pities its adversary as a simpleton, _unenlightened_ about
his own nature (and in this it is completely right), who wants to
replace moral capital and free labor by brute, immoral violence and
serfdom. It depicts him as a Don Quixote, who under the guise of
_bluntness, respectability_, the _general interest_, and _stability_,
conceals incapacity for progress, greedy self-indulgence, selfishness,
sectional interest, and evil intent. It declares him an artful
_monopolist_; it pours cold water on his reminiscences, his poetry, and
his romanticism by a historical and sarcastic enumeration of the
baseness, cruelty, degradation, prostitution, infamy, anarchy and
rebellion, of which romantic castles were the workshops.

||XLIII| It claims to have obtained political freedom for everybody; to
have loosed the chains which fettered civil society; to have linked
together different worlds; to have created trade promoting friendship
between the peoples; to have created pure morality and a pleasant
culture; to have given the people civilized needs in place of their
crude wants, and the means of satisfying them. Meanwhile, it claims, the
landowner – this idle, parasitic grain-profiteer – raises the price of
the people’s basic necessities and so forces the capitalist to raise
wages without being able to increase productivity, thus impeding [the
growth of] the nation’s annual income, the accumulation of capital, and
therefore the possibility of providing work for the people and wealth
for the country, eventually cancelling it, thus producing a general
decline – whilst he parasitically exploits _every_ advantage of modern
civilization without doing the least thing for it, and without even
abating in the slightest his feudal prejudices. Finally, let him – for
whom the cultivation of the land and the land itself exist only as a
source of money, which comes to him as a present – let him just take a
look at his _tenant farmer_ and say whether he himself is not a
_downright, fantastic_, _sly_ scoundrel who in his heart and in actual
fact has for a long time belonged to _free_ industry and to _lovely_
trade, however much he may protest and prattle about historical memories
and ethical or political goals. Everything which he can really advance
to justify himself is true only of the _cultivator of the land_ (the
capitalist and the laborers), of whom the _landowner_ is rather the
_enemy_. Thus he gives evidence against himself. [Movable property
claims that] _without_ capital landed property is dead, worthless
matter; that its civilized victory has discovered and made human labor
the source of wealth in place of the dead thing. (See Paul Louis
Courier, Saint-Simon, Ganilh, Ricardo, Mill, McCulloch and Destutt de
Tracy and Michel Chevalier.)

The _real_ course of development (to be inserted at this point) results
in the necessary victory of the _capitalist_ over the _landowner_ – that
is to say, of developed over undeveloped, immature private property –
just as in general, movement must triumph over immobility; open,
self-conscious baseness over hidden, unconscious baseness; _cupidity_
over _self-indulgence_; the avowedly restless, adroit self-interest of
_enlightenment_ over the parochial, worldly-wise, respectable, idle and
fantastic _self-interest of superstition_; and _money_ over the other
forms of private property.

Those states which sense something of the danger attaching to fully
developed free industry, to fully developed pure morality and to fully
developed philanthropic trade, try, but in vain, to hold in check the
capitalization of landed property.

_Landed property_ in its distinction from capital is private property –
capital – still afflicted with _local_ and political prejudices; it is
capital which has not yet extricated itself from its entanglement with
the world and found the form proper to itself – capital _not_ yet _fully
developed_. It must achieve its abstract, that is, its _pure_,
expression in the course of its _cosmogony_.

The character of _private property_ is expressed by labor, capital, and
the relations between these two. The movement through which these
constituents have to pass is:

_First. Unmediated_ or _mediated unity of the two_.

Capital and labor are at first still united. Then, though separated and
estranged, they reciprocally develop and promote each other as
_positive_ conditions.

[_Second_.] _The two in opposition_, mutually excluding each other. The
worker knows the capitalist as his own non-existence, and vice versa:
each tries to rob the other of his existence.

[_Third_.] _Opposition_ of each to itself. Capital = stored-up labor =
labor. As such it splits into _capital itself_ and its _interest_, and
this latter again into _interest and profit_. The capitalist is
completely sacrificed. He falls into the working class, whilst the
worker (but only exceptionally) becomes a capitalist. Labor as a moment
of capital – its _costs_. Thus the wages of labor – a sacrifice of
capital.

Splitting of labor into _labor itself_ and the _wages of labor_. The
worker himself a capital, a commodity.

_Clash of mutual contradictions_. |XLIII||


Third Manuscript[28]

[Private Property and Labor. Political Economy as a Product of the Movement of Private Property]

||I| Re. p. XXXVI. The _subjective essence_ of private property –
_private property_ as activity for itself,[29] as _subject_, as _person_
– is _labor._ It is therefore evident that only the political economy
which acknowledged _labor_ as its principle – _Adam Smith_ – and which
therefore no longer looked upon private property as a mere _condition_
external to man – that it is this political economy which has to be
regarded on the one hand as a product of the real _energy_ and the real
_movement_ of private property (it is a movement of private property
become independent for itself in consciousness – the modern industry as
Self) – as a product of modern _industry_ – and on the other hand, as a
force which has quickened and glorified the energy and development of
_modern_ _industry_ and made it a power in the realm of _consciousness_.

To this enlightened political economy, which has discovered – within
private property – the _subjective essence_ of wealth, the adherents of
the Monetary and Mercantile System, who look upon private property _only
as an objective_ substance confronting men, seem therefore to be
_fetishists, Catholics. Engels_ was therefore right to call _Adam Smith_
the _Luther of Political_ _Economy_ [See _Outlines of a Critique of
Political Economy_]. Just as Luther recognized _religion -_ _faith_ - as
the substance of the external _world_ and in consequence stood opposed
to Catholic paganism – just as he superseded _external_ religiosity by
making religiosity the _inner_ substance of man - just as he negated the
priests outside the layman because he transplanted the priest into
laymen’s hearts, just so with wealth: wealth as something outside man
and independent of him, and therefore as something to be maintained and
asserted only in an external fashion, is done away with; that is, this
_external, mindless objectivity_ of wealth is done away with, with
private property being incorporated in man himself and with man himself
being recognized as its essence. But as a result man is brought within
the orbit of private property, just as with Luther he is brought within
the orbit of religion. Under the semblance of recognizing man, the
political economy whose principle is labor rather carries to its logical
conclusion the denial of man, since man himself no longer stands in an
external relation of tension to the external substance of private
property, but has himself become this tense essence of private property.
What was previously _being external to oneself_ – man’s actual
externalization – has merely become the act of externalizing – the
process of alienating.

This political economy begins by seeming to acknowledge man (his
independence, spontaneity, etc.); then, locating private property in
man’s own being, it can no longer be conditioned by the local, national
or other _characteristics of private property_ as of _something existing
outside itself_. This political economy, consequently, displays a
_cosmopolitan_, universal energy which overthrows every restriction and
bond so as to establish itself instead as the _sole_ politics, the sole
universality, the sole limit and sole bond. Hence it must throw aside
this _hypocrisy_ in the course of its further development and come out
in its complete cynicism. And this it does – untroubled by all the
apparent contradictions in which it becomes involved as a result of this
theory – by developing the idea of _labor_ much _more one-sidedly_, and
therefore _more sharply_ and _more_ _consistently_, as the sole _essence
of wealth_; by proving the implications of this theory to be
_anti-human_ in character, in contrast to the other, original approach.
Finally, by dealing the death-blow to rent – that _last, individual,
natural_ mode of private property and source of wealth existing
independently of the movement of labor, that expression of feudal
property, an expression which has already become wholly economic in
character and therefore incapable of resisting political economy. (The
_Ricardo_ school.) There is not merely a relative growth in the
_cynicism_ of political economy from Smith through Say to Ricardo, Mill,
etc., inasmuch as the implications of _industry_ appear more developed
and more contradictory in the eyes of the last-named; these later
economists also advance in a positive sense constantly and consciously
further than their predecessors in their estrangement from man. They do
so, however, _only_ because their science develops more consistently and
truthfully. Because they make private property in its active form the
subject, thus simultaneously turning man into the essence – and at the
same time turning man as non-essentiality into the essence – the
contradiction of reality corresponds completely to the contradictory
being which they accept as their principle. Far from refuting it, the
ruptured ||II| world of industry confirms their _self-ruptured_
principle. Their principle is, after all, the principle of this rupture.

The Physiocratic doctrine of _Dr. Quesnay_ forms the transition from the
Mercantile System to Adam Smith. _Physiocracy_ represents directly the
decomposition of feudal property in _economic_ terms, but it therefore
just as directly represents its _economic metamorphosis_ and
restoration, save that now its language is no longer feudal but
economic. All wealth is resolved into _land_ and _cultivation_
(agriculture). Land is not yet _capital_: it is still a _special_ mode
of its existence, the validity of which is supposed to lie in, and to
_derive from_, its natural peculiarity. Yet land is a general natural
_element,_ whilst the Mercantile System admits the existence of wealth
only in the form of _precious metal_. Thus the _object_ of wealth – its
matter – has straightway obtained the highest degree of universality
within the _bounds of nature_, insofar as even as _nature_, it is
immediate objective wealth. And land only exists for _man_ through
labor, through agriculture.

Thus the subjective essence of wealth has already been transferred to
labor. But at the same time agriculture is the only _productive labor_.
Hence, labor is not yet grasped in its generality and abstraction: it is
still bound to a particular _natural element as its matter_, and it is
therefore only recognized in a _particular mode of existence determined
by nature_. It is therefore still only a _specific, particular_
alienation of man, just as its product is likewise conceived nearly [as]
a specific form of wealth – due more to nature than to labor itself. The
land is here still recognized as a phenomenon of nature independent of
man - not yet as capital, i.e., as an aspect of labor itself. Labor
appears, rather, as an aspect of the _land_. But since the fetishism of
the old external wealth, of wealth existing only as an object, has been
reduced to a very simple natural element, and since its essence – even
if only partially and in a particular form – has been recognized within
its subjective existence, the necessary step forward has been made in
revealing the _general nature_ of wealth and hence in the raising up of
_labor_ in its total absoluteness (i.e., its abstraction) as the
_principle._ It is argued against physiocracy that _agriculture_, from
the economic point of view – that is to say, from the only valid point
of view – does not differ from any other industry; and that the
_essence_ of wealth, therefore, is not a _specific_ form of labor bound
to a particular element - a particular expression of labor – but labor
in general.

Physiocracy denies _particular_, external, merely objective wealth by
declaring labor to be the _essence_ of wealth. But for physiocracy labor
is at first only the _subjective essence_ of landed property. (It takes
its departure from the type of property which historically appears as
the dominant and acknowledged type.) It turns only landed property into
_alienated man._ It annuls its feudal character by declaring _industry_
(agriculture) as its _essence_. But it disavows the world of industry
and acknowledges the feudal system by declaring _agriculture_ to be the
_only_ industry.

It is clear that if the _subjective essence_ of industry is now grasped
(of industry in opposition to landed property, i.e., of industry
constituting itself as industry), this essence includes within itself
its opposite. For just as industry incorporates annulled landed
property, the _subjective_ essence of industry at the same time
incorporates the subjective essence of _landed property_.

Just as landed property is the first form of private property, with
industry at first confronting it historically merely as a special kind
of property – or, rather, as landed property’s liberated slave – so this
process repeats itself in the scientific analysis of the _subjective_
essence of private property, _labor_. Labor appears at first only as
_agricultural labor_, but then asserts itself as _labor_ in general.

||III| All wealth has become _industrial_ wealth, the _wealth_ of labor,
and _industry_ is accomplished labor, just as the _factory system_ is
the perfected essence of _industry_, that is of labor, and just as
_industrial capital_ is the accomplished objective form of private
property.

We can now see how it is only at this point that private property can
complete its dominion over man and become, in its most general form, a
world-historical power.

[Private Property and Communism]

Re p. XXXIX. The antithesis between _lack of property_ and _property_,
so long as it is not comprehended as the antithesis of _labor_ and
_capita_l, still remains an indifferent antithesis, not grasped in its
_active connection_, in its _internal_ relation, not yet grasped as a
_contradiction_. It can find expression in this _first_ form even
without the advanced development of private property (as in ancient
Rome, Turkey, etc.). It does not yet _appear_ as having been established
by private property itself. But labor, the subjective essence of private
property as exclusion of property, and capital, objective labor as
exclusion of labor, constitute _private property_ as its developed state
of contradiction – hence a dynamic relationship driving towards
resolution.

 _Re the same page.  _The transcendence of self-estrangement follows the
same course as self-estrangement. _Private property_ is first considered
only in its objective aspect – but nevertheless with labor as its
essence. Its form of existence is therefore _capital_, which is to be
annulled “as such” (Proudhon). Or a _particular form_ of labor – labor
leveled down, fragmented, and therefore unfree – is conceived as the
source of private property’s _perniciousness_ and of its existence in
estrangement from men. For instance, _Fourier_, who, like the
Physiocrats, also conceives _agricultural labor_ to be at least the
_exemplary_ type, whilst _Saint-Simon_ declares in contrast that
_industrial labor_ as such is the essence, and accordingly aspires to
the _exclusive_ rule of the industrialists and the improvement of the
workers’ condition. Finally, _communism_ is the _positive_ expression of
annulled private property – at first as _universal_ private property.

By embracing this relation as a _whole_, communism is:

(1) In its first form only a _generalization_ and _consummation_ of it
[of this relation]. As such it appears in a two-fold form: on the one
hand, the dominion of _material_ property bulks so large that it wants
to destroy _everything_ which is not capable of being possessed by all
as _private property_. It wants to disregard talent, etc., in an
_arbitrary_ manner. For it the sole purpose of life and existence is
direct, physical _possession_. The category of the _worker_ is not done
away with, but extended to all men. The relationship of private property
persists as the relationship of the community to the world of things.
Finally, this movement of opposing universal private property to private
property finds expression in the brutish form of opposing to _marriage_
(certainly a _form of exclusive private property_) the _community of
women_, in which a woman becomes a piece of _communal_ and _common_
property. It may be said that this idea of the _community of women gives
away the secret_ of this as yet completely crude and thoughtless
communism.[30] Just as woman passes from marriage to general
prostitution, [Prostitution is only a specific expression of the general
prostitution of the laborer, and since it is a relationship in which
falls not the prostitute alone, but also the one who prostitutes – and
the latter’s abomination is still greater – the capitalist, etc., also
comes under this head. – Note by Marx][31] so the entire world of wealth
(that is, of man’s objective substance) passes from the relationship of
exclusive marriage with the owner of private property to a state of
universal prostitution with the community. This type of communism –
since it negates the _personality_ of man in every sphere – is but the
logical expression of private property, which is this negation. General
_envy_ constituting itself as a power is the disguise in which _greed_
re-establishes itself and satisfies itself, only in _another_ way. The
thought of every piece of private property as such is _at least_ turned
against _wealthier_ private property in the form of envy and the urge to
reduce things to a common level, so that this envy and urge even
constitute the essence of competition. Crude communism [The manuscript
has: Kommunist. – _Ed._] is only the culmination of this envy and of
this leveling-down proceeding from the _preconceived_ minimum. It has a
_definite, limited_ standard. How little this annulment of private
property is really an appropriation is in fact proved by the abstract
negation of the entire world of culture and civilization, the regression
to the _unnatural_ ||IV| simplicity of the _poor_ and crude man who has
few needs and who has not only failed to go beyond private property, but
has not yet even reached it.

The community is only a community of _labor,_ and of equality of _wages_
paid out by communal capital – by the _community_ as the universal
capitalist. Both sides of the relationship are raised to an _imagined_
universality – _labor_ as the category in which every person is placed,
and _capital_ as the acknowledged universality and power of the
community.

In the approach to _woman_ as the _spoil_ and handmaid of communal lust
is expressed the infinite degradation in which man exists for himself,
for the secret of this approach has its _unambiguous_, decisive, _plain_
and undisguised expression in the relation of _man_ to _woman_ and in
the manner in which the _direct_ and _natural_ species-relationship is
conceived. The direct, natural, and necessary relation of person to
person is the _relation of man to woman_. In this _natural_
species-relationship man’s relation to nature is immediately his
relation to man, just as his relation to man is immediately his relation
to nature – his own _natural_ destination. In this relationship,
therefore, is _sensuously manifested_, reduced to an observable _fact,_
the extent to which the human essence has become nature to man, or to
which nature to him has become the human essence of man. From this
relationship one can therefore judge man’s whole level of development.
From the character of this relationship follows how much _man_ as a
_species-being_, as _man_, has come to be himself and to comprehend
himself; the relation of man to woman is the _most natural_ relation of
human being to human being. It therefore reveals the extent to which
man’s _natural_ behavior has become _human,_ or the extent to which the
_human_ essence in him has become a _natural_ essence – the extent to
which his _human nature_ has come to be _natural_ to him. This
relationship also reveals the extent to which man’s _need_ has become a
_human_ need; the extent to which, therefore, the _other_ person as a
person has become for him a need – the extent to which he in his
individual existence is at the same time a social being.

The first positive annulment of private property – _crude_ communism –
is thus merely one _form_ in which the vileness of private property,
which wants to set itself up as the _positive community_ _system, comes
to the surface._

 (2) Communism (a) still political in nature – democratic or despotic;
(ß) with the abolition of the state, yet still incomplete, and being
still affected by private property, i.e., by the estrangement of man. In
both forms communism already is aware of being reintegration or return
of man to himself, the transcendence of human self-estrangement; but
since it has not yet grasped the positive essence of private property,
and just as little the _human_ nature of need, it remains captive to it
and infected by it. It has, indeed, grasped its concept, but not its
essence.

 (3) _Communism_ as the _positive_ transcendence of _private property_
as _human self-estrangement_, and therefore as the real _appropriation_
of the _human_ essence by and for man; communism therefore as the
complete return of man to himself as a _social_ (i.e., human) being – a
return accomplished consciously and embracing the entire wealth of
previous development. This communism, as fully developed naturalism,
equals humanism, and as fully developed humanism equals naturalism; it
is the _genuine_ resolution of the conflict between man and nature and
between man and man – the true resolution of the strife between
existence and essence, between objectification and self-confirmation,
between freedom and necessity, between the individual and the species.
Communism is the riddle of history solved, and it knows itself to be
this solution.

||V| The entire movement of history, just as its _actual_ act of genesis
– the birth act of its empirical existence – is, therefore, for its
thinking consciousness the _comprehended_ and _known_ process of its
_becoming_. Whereas the still immature communism seeks an _historical_
proof for itself – a proof in the realm of what already exists – among
disconnected historical phenomena opposed to private property, tearing
single phases from the historical process and focusing attention on them
as proofs of its historical pedigree (a hobby-horse ridden hard
especially by Cabet, Villegardelle, etc.).  By so doing it simply makes
clear that by far the greater part of this process contradicts its own
claim, and that, if it has ever existed, precisely its being in the
_past_ refutes its pretension to _reality._

It is easy to see that the entire revolutionary movement necessarily
finds both its empirical and its theoretical basis in the movement of
_private property_ – more precisely, in that of the economy.

This _material_, immediately _perceptible_ private property is the
material perceptible expression of _estranged human_ life. Its movement
– production and consumption – is the _perceptible_ revelation of the
movement of all production until now, i.e., the realization or the
reality of man. Religion, family, state, law, morality, science, art,
etc., are only _particular_ modes of production, and fall under its
general law. The positive transcendence of _private property_ as the
appropriation of _human_ life, is therefore the positive transcendence
of all estrangement – that is to say, the return of man from religion,
family, state, etc., to his _human,_ i.e., _social_, existence.
Religious estrangement as such occurs only in the realm of
_consciousness_, of man’s inner life, but economic estrangement is that
of _real life_; its transcendence therefore embraces both aspects. It is
evident that the _initial_ stage of the movement amongst the various
peoples depends on whether the true _recognized_ life of the people
manifests itself more in consciousness or in the external world – is
more ideal or real. Communism begins from the outset _(Owen)_ with
atheism; but atheism is at first far from being _communism;_ indeed,
that atheism is still mostly an abstraction.

The philanthropy of atheism is therefore at first only _philosophical,_
abstract philanthropy, and that of communism is at once _real_ and
directly bent on _action_.

We have seen how on the assumption of positively annulled private
property man produces man – himself and the other man; how the object,
being the direct manifestation of his individuality, is simultaneously
his own existence for the other man, the existence of the other man, and
that existence for him. Likewise, however, both the material of labor
and man as the subject, are the point of departure as well as the result
of the movement (and precisely in this fact, that they must constitute
the _point of departure_, lies the historical _necessity_ of private
property). Thus the _social_ character is the general character of the
whole movement: _just as_ society itself produces _man as_ _man_, so is
society _produced_ by him. Activity and enjoyment, both in their content
and in their _mode of existence_, are _social_: _social_ [This word is
crossed out in the manuscript. – _Ed._] activity and _social_ enjoyment.
The _human_ aspect of nature exists only for _social_ man; for only then
does nature exist for him as a _bond_ with _man_ – as his existence for
the other and the other’s existence for him – and as the life-element of
human reality. Only then does nature exist as the _foundation_ of his
own _human_ existence. Only here has what is to him his _natural_
existence become his _human_ existence, and nature become man for him.
Thus _society_ is the complete unity of man with nature – the true
resurrection of nature – the consistent naturalism of man and the
consistent humanism of nature.

||VI| Social activity and social enjoyment exist by no means _only_ in
the form of some _directly_ communal activity and directly _communal_
enjoyment, although _communal_ activity and _communal_ enjoyment – i.e.,
activity and enjoyment which are manifested and directly revealed in
_real_ _association_ with other men – will occur wherever such a
_direct_ expression of sociability stems from the true character of the
activity’s content and is appropriate to the nature of the enjoyment.

But also when I am active _scientifically_, etc. – an activity which I
can seldom perform in direct community with others – then my activity is
_social_, because I perform it as a _man_. Not only is the material of
my activity given to me as a social product (as is even the language in
which the thinker is active): my _own_ existence _is_ social activity,
and therefore that which I make of myself, I make of myself for society
and with the consciousness of myself as a social being.

My _general_ consciousness is only the _theoretical_ shape of that of
which the _living_ shape is the _real_ community, the social fabric,
although at the present day _general_ consciousness is an abstraction
from real life and as such confronts it with hostility. The _activity_
of my general consciousness, as an activity, is therefore also my
_theoretical_ existence as a social being.

Above all we must avoid postulating “society” again as an abstraction
vis-à-vis the individual. The individual _is the social being_. His
manifestations of life – even if they may not appear in the direct form
of _communal_ manifestations of life carried out in association with
others – are therefore an expression and confirmation of _social life_.
Man’s individual and species-life are not _different,_ however much –
and this is inevitable – the mode of existence of the individual is a
more _particular_ or more _general_ mode of the life of the species, or
the life of the species is a more _particular_ or more _general_
individual life.

In his _consciousness of species_ man confirms his real _social life_
and simply repeats his real existence in thought, just as conversely the
being of the species confirms itself in species- consciousness and
exists for itself in its generality as a thinking being.

Man, much as he may therefore be a _particular_ individual (and it is
precisely his particularity which makes him an individual, and a real
_individual_ social being), is just as much the _totality_ – the ideal
totality – the subjective existence of imagined and experienced society
for itself; just as he exists also in the real world both as awareness
and real enjoyment of social existence, and as a totality of human
manifestation of life.

Thinking and being are thus certainly _distinct_, but at the same time
they are in _unity_ with each other.

_Death_ seems to be a harsh victory of the species over the _particular_
individual and to contradict their unity. But the particular individual
is only a _particular species-being_, and as such mortal.

 <(4) [In the manuscript: “5”. – _Ed._] Just as _private property_ is
only the perceptible expression of the fact that man becomes _objective_
for himself and at the same time becomes to himself a strange and
inhuman object; just as it expresses the fact that the manifestation of
his life is the alienation of his life, that his realization is his loss
of reality, is an _alien_ reality: so, the positive transcendence of
private property – i.e., the _perceptible_ appropriation for and by man
of the human essence and of human life, of objective man, of human
_achievements_ – should not be conceived merely in the sense of
_immediate_, one-sided _enjoyment_, merely in the sense of _possessing_,
of _having_. Man appropriates his total essence in a total manner, that
is to say, as a whole man. Each of his _human_ relations to the world –
seeing, hearing, smelling, tasting, feeling, thinking, observing,
experiencing, wanting, acting, loving – in short, all the organs of his
individual being, like those organs which are directly social in their
form, ||VII| are in their _objective_ orientation, or in their
_orientation to the object_, the appropriation of the object, the
appropriation of _human_ reality. Their orientation to the object is the
_manifestation of the human reality,_ [For this reason it is just as
highly varied as the determinations of human essence and activities. –
_Note by Marx._] it is human _activity_ and human _suffering_, for
suffering, humanly considered, is a kind of self-enjoyment of man.

Private property has made us so stupid and one-sided that an object is
only _ours_ when we have it – when it exists for us as capital, or when
it is directly possessed, eaten, drunk, worn, inhabited, etc., – in
short, when it is _used_ by us. Although private property itself again
conceives all these direct realizations of possession only as _means of
life_, and the life which they serve as means is the _life of private
property_ – labor and conversion into capital.

In the place of _all_ physical and mental senses there has therefore
come the sheer estrangement of _all_ these senses, the sense of
_having_. The human being had to be reduced to this absolute poverty in
order that he might yield his inner wealth to the outer world. [On the
category of “having”, see Hess, in the Philosophy of the Deed].

The transcendence of private property is therefore the complete
_emancipation_ of all human _senses_ and qualities, but it is this
emancipation precisely because these senses and attributes have become,
subjectively and objectively, _human._ The eye has become a _human_ eye,
just as its _object_ has become a social, _human_ object – an object
made by man for man. The _senses_ have therefore become directly in
their practice _theoreticians_. They relate themselves to the _thing_
for the sake of the thing, but the thing itself is an _objective human_
relation to itself and to man, [In practice I can relate myself to a
thing humanly only if the thing relates itself humanly to the human
being. – _Note by Marx._] and vice versa. Need or enjoyment have
consequently lost their _egotistical_ nature, and nature has lost its
mere _utility_ by use becoming _human_ use.

In the same way, the senses and enjoyment of other men have become my
_own_ appropriation. Besides these direct organs, therefore, _social_
organs develop in the _form_ of society; thus, for instance, activity in
direct association with others, etc., has become an organ for
_expressing_ my own _life_, and a mode of appropriating _human_ life.

It is obvious that the _human_ eye enjoys things in a way different from
the crude, non-human eye; the human _ear_ different from the crude ear,
etc.

We have seen that man does not lose himself in his object only when the
object becomes for him a _human_ object or objective man. This is
possible only when the object becomes for him a _social_ object, he
himself for himself a social being, just as society becomes a being for
him in this object.

On the one hand, therefore, it is only when the objective world becomes
everywhere for man in society the world of man’s essential powers –
human reality, and for that reason the reality of his _own_ essential
powers – that all _objects_ become for him the _objectification_ of
himself, become objects which confirm and realize his individuality,
become _his_ objects: that is, _man himself_ becomes the object. The
_manner_ in which they become _his_ depends on the _nature of the
objects_ and on the nature of the _essential power corresponding to it_;
for it is precisely the _determinate nature_ of this relationship which
shapes the particular, _real_ mode of affirmation. To the _eye_ an
object comes to be other than it is to the _ear_, and the object of the
eye _is_ another object than the object of the _ear_. The specific
character of each essential power is precisely its _specific essence,_
and therefore also the specific mode of its objectification, of its
_objectively actual_, living _being_. Thus man is affirmed in the
objective world not only in the act of thinking, ||VIII| but with _all_
his senses.

On the other hand, let us look at this in its subjective aspect. Just as
only music awakens in man the sense of music, and just as the most
beautiful music has _no_ sense for the unmusical ear – is [no] object
for it, because my object can only be the confirmation of one of my
essential powers, therefore can only exist for me insofar as my
essential power exists for itself as a subjective capacity because the
meaning of an object for me goes only so far as _my_ sense goes (has
only a meaning for a sense corresponding to that object) – for this
reason the _senses_ of the social man _differ_ from those of the
non-social man. Only through the objectively unfolded richness of man’s
essential being is the richness of subjective _human_ sensibility (a
musical ear, an eye for beauty of form – in short, _senses_ capable of
human gratification, senses affirming themselves as essential powers of
_man_) either cultivated or brought into being. For not only the five
senses but also the so-called mental senses, the practical senses (will,
love, etc.), in a word, _human_ sense, the human nature of the senses,
comes to be by virtue of _its_ object, by virtue of _humanized_ nature.
The _forming_ of the five senses is a labor of the entire history of the
world down to the present. The _sense_ caught up in crude practical need
has only a _restricted sense_.> For the starving man, it is not the
human form of food that exists, but only its abstract existence as food.
It could just as well be there in its crudest form, and it would be
impossible to say wherein this feeding activity differs from that of
_animals._ The care-burdened, poverty-stricken man has no _sense_ for
the finest play; the dealer in minerals sees only the commercial value
but not the beauty and the specific character of the mineral: he has no
mineralogical sense. Thus, the objectification of the human essence,
both in its theoretical and practical aspects, is required to make man’s
_sense human_, as well as to create the _human sense_ corresponding to
the entire wealth of human and natural substance.

<Just as through the movement of _private property_, of its wealth as
well as its misery– of its material and spiritual wealth and misery –
the budding society finds at hand all the material for this
_development,_ so _established_ society produces man in this entire
richness of his being produces the _rich_ man _profoundly endowed with
all the senses_ – as its enduring reality.>

We see how subjectivism and objectivism, spiritualism and materialism,
activity and suffering, only lose their antithetical character, and –
thus their existence as such antitheses only within the framework of
society; <we see how the resolution of the _theoretical_ antitheses is
_only_ possible in a _practical_ way, by virtue of the practical energy
of man. Their resolution is therefore by no means merely a problem of
understanding, but a _real_ problem of life, which _philosophy_ could
not solve precisely because it conceived this problem as _merely_ a
theoretical one.

We see how the history of _industry_ and the established _objective_
existence of industry are the _open_ book of _man’s_ _essential powers_,
the perceptibly existing human _psychology_. Hitherto this was not
conceived in its connection with man’s _essential being_, but only in an
external relation of utility, because, moving in the realm of
estrangement, people could only think of man’s general mode of being –
religion or history in its abstract–general character as politics, art,
literature, etc. – ||XI| as the reality of man’s essential powers and
_man’s species-activity_. We have before us the _objectified essential_
_powers_ of man in the form of _sensuous, alien, useful objects_, in the
form of estrangement, displayed in _ordinary material industry_ (which
can be conceived either as a part of that general movement, or that
movement can be conceived as a _particular_ part of industry, since all
human activity hitherto has been labor – that is, industry – activity
estranged from itself).

A _psychology_ for which this, the part of history existing in the most
perceptible and accessible form, remains a closed book, cannot become a
genuine, comprehensive and _real_ science.> What indeed are we to think
of a science which _airily_ abstracts from this large part of human
labor and which fails to feel its own incompleteness, while such a
wealth of human Endeavour, unfolded before it, means nothing more to it
than, perhaps, what can be expressed in one word – “need”, “_vulgar
need_”?

The _natural sciences_ have developed an enormous activity and have
accumulated an ever-growing mass of material. Philosophy, however, has
remained just as alien to them as they remain to philosophy. Their
momentary unity was only a _chimerical illusion_. The will was there,
but the power was lacking. Historiography itself pays regard to natural
science only occasionally, as a factor of enlightenment, utility, and of
some special great discoveries. But natural science has invaded and
transformed human life all the more _practically_ through the medium of
industry; and has prepared human emancipation, although its immediate
effect had to be the furthering of the dehumanization of man. _Industry_
is the _actual_, historical relationship of nature, and therefore of
natural science, to man. If, therefore, industry is conceived as the
_exoteric_ revelation of man’s _essential_ _powers_, we also gain an
understanding of the human essence of nature or the natural essence of
man. In consequence, natural science will lose its abstractly material –
or rather, its idealistic – tendency, and will become the basis of
_human_ science, as it has already become – albeit in an estranged form
– the basis of actual human life, and to assume _one_ basis for life and
a different basis for _science_ is as a matter of course a lie. <The
nature which develops in human history – the genesis of human society –
is man’s _real_ nature; hence nature as it develops through industry,
even though in an _estranged_ form, is true _anthropological_ nature.>

_Sense-perception_ (see Feuerbach) must be the basis of all science.
Only when it proceeds from sense-perception in the twofold form of
_sensuous_ consciousness and _sensuous_ need – is it _true_ science. All
history is the history of preparing and developing “man” to become the
object of _sensuous_ consciousness, and turning the requirements of “man
as man” into his needs. History itself is a _real_ part of _natural
history –_ of nature developing into man. Natural science will in time
incorporate into itself the science of man, just as the science of man
will incorporate into itself natural science: there will be _one_
science.

||X| _Man_ is the immediate object of natural science; for immediate,
_sensuous nature_ for man is, immediately, human sensuousness (the
expressions are identical) – presented immediately in the form of the
_other_ man sensuously present for him. Indeed, his own sensuousness
first exists as human sensuousness for himself through the _other_ man.
But _nature_ is the immediate object of the _science of man_: the first
– object of man – man – is nature, sensuousness; and the particular
human sensuous essential powers can only find their self-understanding
in the science of the natural world in general, just as they can find
their objective realization only in _natural_ objects. The element of
thought itself – the element of thought’s living expression – _language_
– is of a sensuous nature. The _social_ reality of nature, and _human_
natural science, or the _natural science of man_, are identical terms.

<It will be seen how in place of the _wealth and poverty_ of political
economy come the _rich human_ _being_ and the rich _human_ need. The
_rich_ human being is simultaneously the human being _in need of_ a
totality of human manifestations of life – the man in whom his own
realization exists as an inner necessity, as _need_. Not only _wealth_,
but likewise the _poverty_ of man – under the assumption of
socialism[32] – receives in equal measure a human and therefore social
significance. Poverty is the passive bond which causes the human being
to experience the need of the greatest wealth – the _other_ human being.
The dominion of the objective being in me, the sensuous outburst of my
life activity, is _passion_, which thus becomes here the _activity_ of
my being.>

(5) A _being_ only considers himself independent when he stands on his
own feet; and he only stands on his own feet when he owes his
_existence_ to himself. A man who lives by the grace of another regards
himself as a dependent being. But I live completely by the grace of
another if I owe him not only the maintenance of my life, but if he has,
moreover, _created_ my _life_ – if he is the _source_ of my life. When
it is not of my own creation, my life has necessarily a source of this
kind outside of it. The _Creation_ is therefore an idea very difficult
to dislodge from popular consciousness. The fact that nature and man
exist on their own account is _incomprehensible_ to it, because it
contradicts everything _tangible_ in practical life.

The creation of the earth has received a mighty blow from _geognosy_ –
i.e., from the science which presents the formation of the earth, the
development of the earth, as a process, as a self-generation. _Generatio
aequivoca_ is the only practical refutation of the theory of
creation.[33]

Now it is certainly easy to say to the single individual what Aristotle
has already said: You have been begotten by your father and your mother;
therefore in you the mating of two human beings – a species-act of human
beings – has produced the human being. You see, therefore, that even
physically man owes his existence to man. Therefore you must not only
keep sight of the _one_ aspect – the _infinite_ progression which leads
you further to inquire: Who begot my father? Who his grandfather? etc.
You must also hold on to the _circular movement_ sensuously perceptible
in that progress by which man repeats himself in procreation, _man_ thus
always remaining the subject. You will reply, however: I grant you this
circular movement; now grant me the progress which drives me ever
further until I ask: Who begot the first man, and nature as a whole? I
can only answer you: Your question is itself a product of abstraction.
Ask yourself how you arrived at that question. Ask yourself whether your
question is not posed from a standpoint to which I cannot reply, because
it is wrongly put. Ask yourself whether that progress as such exists for
a reasonable mind. When you ask about the creation of nature and man,
you are abstracting, in so doing, from man and nature. You postulate
them as _non-existent_, and yet you want me to prove them to you as
_existing_. Now I say to you: Give up your abstraction and you will also
give up your question. Or if you want to hold on to your abstraction,
then be consistent, and if you think of man and nature as
_non-existent_, ||XI| then think of yourself as non-existent, for you
too are surely nature and man. Don’t think, don’t ask me, for as soon as
you think and ask, your _abstraction_ from the existence of nature and
man has no meaning. Or are you such an egotist that you conceive
everything as nothing, and yet want yourself to exist?

You can reply: I do not want to postulate the nothingness of nature,
etc. I ask you about its _genesis_, just as I ask the anatomist about
the formation of bones, etc.

But since for the socialist man _the entire so-called history of the
world_ is nothing but the creation of man through human labor, nothing
but the emergence of nature for man, so he has the visible, irrefutable
proof of his _birth_ through himself, of his _genesis_. Since the _real
existence_ of man and nature has become evident in practice, through
sense experience, because man has thus become evident for man as the
being of nature, and nature for man as the being of man, the question
about an _alien_ being, about a being above nature and man – a question
which implies the admission of the unreality of nature and of man – has
become impossible in practice. _Atheism_, as the denial of this
unreality, has no longer any meaning, for atheism is a _negation of
God_, and postulates _the existence of man_ through this negation; but
socialism as socialism no longer stands in any need of such a mediation.
It proceeds from the _theoretically and practically_ _sensuous
consciousness_ of man and of nature as the _essence_. Socialism is man’s
_positive self-consciousness_, no longer mediated through the abolition
of religion, just as _real life_ is man’s positive reality, no longer
mediated through the abolition of private property, through _communism_.
Communism is the positive mode as the negation of the negation, and is
hence the _actual_ phase necessary for the next stage of historical
development in the process of human emancipation and rehabilitation.
_Communism_ is the necessary form and the dynamic principle of the
immediate future, but communism as such is not the goal of human
development, the form of human society.  |XI||[34]

[Human Requirements and Division of Labor Under the Rule of Private Property and Under Socialism. Division of Labor in Bourgeois Society]

||XIV| [35] (7) We have seen what significance, given socialism, the
_wealth_ of human needs acquires, and what significance, therefore, both
a _new mode of production_ and a new _object_ of production obtain: a
new manifestation of the forces of _human_ nature and a new enrichment
of _human_ nature. Under private property their significance is
reversed: every person speculates on creating a _new_ need in another,
so as to drive him to fresh sacrifice, to place him in a new dependence
and to seduce him into a new mode of _enjoyment_ and therefore economic
ruin. Each tries to establish over the other an _alien_ power, so as
thereby to find satisfaction of his own selfish need. The increase in
the quantity of objects is therefore accompanied by an extension of the
realm of the alien powers to which man is subjected, and every new
product represents a new _potentiality_ of mutual swindling and mutual
plundering. Man becomes ever poorer as man, his need for _money_ becomes
ever greater if he wants to master the hostile power. The power of his
_money_ declines in inverse proportion to the increase in the volume of
production: that is, his neediness grows as the _power_ of money
increases.

The need for money is therefore the true need produced by the economic
system, and it is the only need which the latter produces. The
_quantity_ of money becomes to an ever greater degree its sole
_effective_ quality. Just as it reduces everything to its abstract form,
so it reduces itself in the course of its own movement to _quantitative_
being. _Excess_ and _intemperance_ come to be its true norm.

Subjectively, this appears partly in the fact that the extension of
products and needs becomes a _contriving_ and ever-_calculating_
subservience to inhuman, sophisticated, unnatural and _imaginary_
appetites. Private property does not know how to change crude need into
_human_ need. Its _idealism_ is _fantasy_, _caprice_ and _whim_; and no
eunuch flatters his despot more basely or uses more despicable means to
stimulate his dulled capacity for pleasure in order to sneak a favor for
himself than does the industrial eunuch – the producer – in order to
sneak for himself a few pieces of silver, in order to charm the golden
birds out of the pockets of his dearly beloved neighbors in Christ. He
puts himself at the service of the other’s most depraved fancies, plays
the pimp between him and his need, excites in him morbid appetites, lies
in wait for each of his weaknesses – all so that he can then demand the
cash for this service of love. (Every product is a bait with which to
seduce away the other’s very being, his money; every real and possible
need is a weakness which will lead the fly to the glue-pot. General
exploitation of communal human nature, just as every imperfection in
man, is a bond with heaven – an avenue giving the priest access to his
heart; every need is an opportunity to approach one’s neighbor under the
guise of the utmost amiability and to say to him: Dear friend, I give
you what you need, but you know the _conditio sine qua non_; you know
the ink in which you have to sign yourself over to me; in providing for
your pleasure, I fleece you.)

This estrangement manifests itself in part in that the sophistication of
needs and of the means [of their satisfaction] on one side produces a
bestial barbarization, a complete, crude, abstract simplicity of need,
on the other; or rather in that it merely reproduces itself in its
opposite. Even the need for fresh air ceases to be a need for the
worker. Man returns to a cave dwelling, which is now, however,
contaminated with the pestilential breath of civilization, and which he
continues to occupy only _precariously_, it being for him an alien
habitation which can be withdrawn from him any day – a place from which,
if he does ||XV| not pay, he can be thrown out any day. For this
mortuary he has to _pay_. A dwelling in the _light_, which Prometheus in
Aeschylus designated as one of the greatest boons, by means of which he
made the savage into a human being, ceases to exist for the worker.
Light, air, etc. – the simplest _animal_ cleanliness – ceases to be a
need for man. _Filth,_ this stagnation and putrefaction of man – the
_sewage_ of civilization (speaking quite literally) – comes to be the
_element of life_ for him. Utter, _unnatural_ depravation, putrefied
nature, comes to be his _life-element_. None of his senses exist any
longer, and not only in its human fashion, but in an _inhuman_ fashion,
and therefore not even in an animal fashion. The crudest _methods_ (and
_instruments_) of human labor are coming back: the _treadmill_ of the
Roman slaves, for instance, is the means of production, the means of
existence, of many English workers. It is not only that man has no human
needs – even his _animal_ needs cease to exist. The Irishman no longer
knows any need now but the need to _eat,_ and indeed only the need to
eat _potatoes_ – and _scabby potatoes_ at that, the worst kind of
potatoes. But in each of their industrial towns England and France have
already a _little_ Ireland. The savage and the animal have at least the
need to hunt, to roam, etc. – the need of companionship. The
simplification of the machine, of labor is used to make a worker out of
the human being still in the making, the completely immature human
being, the _child_ – whilst the worker has become a neglected child. The
machine accommodates itself to the _weakness_ of the human being in
order to make the _weak_ human being into a machine.

<How the multiplication of needs and of the means [of their
satisfaction] breeds the absence of needs and of means is demonstrated
by the political economist (and the capitalist: in general it is always
_empirical_ businessmen we are talking about when we refer to political
economists, who are their _scientific_ confession and aspect). This he
shows:

(1) By reducing the worker’s need to the barest and most miserable level
of physical subsistence, and by reducing his activity to the most
abstract mechanical movement; thus he says: Man has no other need either
of activity or of enjoyment. For he call this life, _too_, _human_ life
and existence.

(2) By _counting_ the _most meager_ form of life (existence) as the
standard, indeed, as the general standard – general because it is
applicable to the mass of men. He changes the worker into an insensible
being lacking all needs, just as he changes his activity into a pure
abstraction from all activity. To him, therefore, every _luxury_ of the
worker seems to be reprehensible, and everything that goes beyond the
most abstract need – be it in the realm of passive enjoyment, or a
manifestation of activity – seems to him a luxury. Political economy,
this science of _wealth_, is therefore simultaneously the science of
renunciation, of want, of _saving_ – and it actually reaches the point
where it _spares_ man the _need_ of either fresh _air_ or physical
_exercise_. This science of marvelous industry is simultaneously the
science of _asceticism_, and its true ideal is the _ascetic_ but
_extortionate_ miser and the _ascetic_ but _productive_ slave. Its moral
ideal is the _worker_ who takes part of his wages to the savings-bank,
and it has even found ready-made a servile _art_ which embodies this pet
idea: it has been presented, bathed in sentimentality, on the stage.
Thus political economy – despite its worldly and voluptuous appearance –
is a true moral science, the most moral of all the sciences.
Self-renunciation, the renunciation of life and of all human needs, is
its principal thesis. The less you eat, drink and buy books; the less
you go to the theater, the dance hall, the public house; the less you
think, love, theorize, sing, paint, fence, etc., the more you _save_ –
the _greater_ becomes your treasure which neither moths nor rust will
devour – your _capital._ The less you _are_, the less you express your
own life, the more you _have_, i.e., the greater is your _alienated_
life, the greater is the store of your estranged being. Everything
||XVI| which the political economist takes from you in life and in
humanity, he replaces for you in _money_ and in _wealth_; and all the
things which you cannot do, your money can do. It can eat and, drink, go
to the dance hall and the theater; it can travel, it can appropriate
art, learning, the treasures of the past, political power – all this it
_can_ appropriate for you – it can buy all this: it is true _endowment._
Yet being all this, it _wants_ to do nothing but create itself, buy
itself; for everything else is after all its servant, and when I have
the master I have the servant and do not need his servant. All passions
and all activity must therefore be submerged in _avarice_. The worker
may only have enough for him to want to live, and may only want to live
in order to have that.>

It is true that a controversy now arises in the field of political
economy. The one side (Lauderdale, Malthus, etc.) recommends _luxury_
and execrates thrift. The other (Say, Ricardo, etc.) recommends thrift
and execrates luxury. But the former admits that it wants luxury in
order to produce _labor_ (i.e., absolute thrift); and the latter admits
that it recommends thrift in order to produce _wealth_ (i.e., luxury).
The Lauderdale-Malthus school has the _romantic_ notion that avarice
alone ought not to determine the consumption of the rich, and it
contradicts its own laws in advancing _extravagance_ as a direct means
of enrichment. Against it, therefore, the other side very earnestly and
circumstantially proves that I do not increase but reduce my
_possessions_ by being extravagant. The Say-Ricardo school is
hypocritical in not admitting that it is precisely whim and caprice
which determine production. It forgets the “refined needs”; it forgets
that there would be no production without consumption; it forgets that
as a result of competition production can only become more extensive and
luxurious. It forgets that, according to its views, a thing’s value is
determined by use, and that use is determined by fashion. It wishes to
see only “useful things” produced, but it forgets that production of too
many useful things produces too large a _useless_ population. Both sides
forget that extravagance and thrift, luxury and privation, wealth and
poverty are equal.

And you must not only stint the gratification of your immediate senses,
as by stinting yourself on food, etc.: you must also spare yourself all
sharing of general interests, all sympathy, all trust, etc., if you want
to be economical, if you do not want to be ruined by illusions.

<You must make everything that is yours _saleable_, i.e., useful. If I
ask the political economist: Do I obey economic laws if I extract money
by offering my body for sale, by surrendering it to another’s lust? (The
factory workers in France call the prostitution of their wives and
daughters the nth working hour, which is literally correct.) – Or am I
not acting in keeping with political economy if I sell my friend to the
Moroccans? (And the direct sale of men in the form of a trade in
conscripts, etc., takes place in all civilized countries.) – Then the
political economist replies to me: You do not transgress my laws; but
see what Cousin Ethics and Cousin Religion have to say about it. My
_political economic_ ethics and religion have nothing to reproach you
with, but – But whom am I now to believe, political economy or ethics? –
The ethics of political economy is _acquisition,_ work, thrift, sobriety
– but political economy promises to satisfy my needs. – The political
economy of ethics is the opulence of a good conscience, of virtue, etc.;
but how can I live virtuously if I do not live? And how can I have a
good conscience if I do not know anything? It stems from the very nature
of estrangement that each sphere applies to me a different and opposite
yardstick – ethics one and political economy another; for each is a
specific estrangement of man and> ||XVII| focuses attention on a
particular field of estranged essential activity, and each stands in an
estranged relation to the other. Thus M. _Michel Chevalier_ reproaches
Ricardo with having ignored ethics. But Ricardo is allowing political
economy to speak its own language, and if it does not speak ethically,
this is not Ricardo’s fault. M. Chevalier abstracts from political
economy insofar as he moralizes, but he really and necessarily ignores
ethics insofar as he practices political economy. The relationship of
political economy to ethics, if it is other than an arbitrary,
contingent and therefore unfounded and unscientific relationship, if it
is not being posited for the sake of _appearance_ but is meant to be
_essential_, can only be the relationship of the laws of political
economy to ethics. If there is no such connection, or if the contrary is
rather the case, can Ricardo help it? Moreover, the opposition between
political economy and ethics is only an _apparent_ opposition and just
as much no opposition _as it is_ an opposition. All that happens is that
political economy expresses moral laws _in its own way_.

<Frugality as the principle of political economy is _most brilliantly_
shown in its _theory of_ _population_. There are too _many_ people. Even
the existence of men is a pure luxury; and if the worker is “_ethical_”,
he will be _sparing_ in procreation. (Mill suggests public acclaim for
those who prove themselves continent in their sexual relations, and
public rebuke for those who sin against such barrenness of marriage....
Is this not ethics, the teaching of asceticism?) The production of
people appears as public misery.>

The meaning which production has in relation to the rich is seen
_revealed_ in the meaning which it has for the poor. Looking upwards the
manifestation is always refined, veiled, ambiguous – outward appearance;
downwards, it is rough, straightforward, frank – the real thing. The
worker’s _crude_ need is a far greater source of gain than the _refined_
need of the rich. The cellar dwellings in London bring more to those who
let them than do the palaces; that is to say, with reference to the
landlord they constitute _greater wealth_, and thus (to speak the
language of political economy) greater _social_ wealth.

Industry speculates on the refinement of needs, it speculates however
just as much on their _crudeness_, but on their artificially produced
crudeness, whose true enjoyment, therefore, is _self-stupefaction_ –
this _illusory_ satisfaction of need this civilization contained
_within_ the crude barbarism of need. The English gin shops are
therefore the _symbolical_ representations of private property. Their
_luxury_ reveals the true relation of industrial luxury and wealth to
man. They are therefore rightly the only Sunday pleasures of the people
which the English police treats at least mildly. |XVII||

||XVIII| [36] We have already seen how the political economist
establishes the unity of labor and capital in a variety of ways: (1)
Capital is _accumulated labor_. (2) The purpose of capital within
production – partly, reproduction of capital with profit, partly,
capital as raw material (material of labor), and partly, as an
automatically _working_ _instrument_ (the machine is capital directly
equated with labor) – is _productive labor_. (3) The worker is a
capital. (4) Wages belong to costs of capital. (5) In relation to the
worker, labor is the reproduction of his life-capital. (6) In relation
to the capitalist, labor is an aspect of his capital’s activity.

Finally, (7) the political economist postulates the original unity of
capital and labor as the unity of the capitalist and the worker; this is
the original state of paradise. The way in which these two aspects,
||XIX| as two persons, confront each other is for the political
economist an _accidental_ event, and hence only to be explained by
reference to external factors. (See Mill.)

 

The nations which are still dazzled by the _sensuous_ glitter of
precious metals, and are therefore still fetish-worshipers of metal
money, are not yet fully developed money-nations. Contrast of France and
England.

The extent to which the solution of theoretical riddles is the task of
practice and effected through practice, the extent to which true
practice is the condition of a real and positive theory, is shown, for
example, in _fetishism._ The sensuous consciousness of the
fetish-worshipper is different from that of the Greek, because his
sensuous existence is different. The abstract enmity between sense and
spirit is necessary so long as the human feeling for nature, the human
sense of nature, and therefore also the _natural_ sense of _man_, are
not yet produced by man’s own labor.

_Equality_ is nothing but a translation of the German “Ich = Ich”[37]
into the French, i.e., political form. Equality as the _basis_ of
_communism_ is its _political_ justification, and it is the same as when
the German justifies it by conceiving man as _universal
self-consciousness_. Naturally, the transcendence of the estrangement
always proceeds from that form of the estrangement which is the
_dominant_ power: in Germany, _self-consciousness_; in France,
_equality_, because it is politics; in England, real, material,
_practical_ need taking only itself as its standard. It is from this
standpoint that Proudhon is to be criticized and appreciated.

If we characterize _communism_ itself because of its character as
negation of the negation, as the appropriation of the human essence
through the intermediary of the negation of private property – as being
not yet the _true,_ self-originating position but rather a position
originating from private property [...] in old-German fashion – in the
way of Hegel’s phenomenology – [...] finished as a _conquered_ _moment_
and […] one might be satisfied by it, in his consciousness [...] of the
human being only by _real_ [...] transcendence of his thought now as
before […], since with him therefore the real estrangement of the life
of man remains, and remains all the more, the more one is conscious of
it as such, hence it [the negation of this estrangement] can be
accomplished solely by bringing about communism.

In order to abolish the _idea_ of private property, the _idea_ of
communism is quite sufficient. It takes _actual_ communist action to
abolish actual private property. History will lead to it; and this
movement, _which in theory_ we already know to be a self-transcending
movement, will constitute in actual fact a very rough and protracted
process. But we must regard it as a real advance to have at the outset
gained a consciousness of the limited character as well as of the goal
of this historical movement – and a consciousness which reaches out
beyond it.

When communist _artisans_ associate with one another, theory,
propaganda, etc., is their first end. But at the same time, as a result
of this association, they acquire a new need – the need for society –
and what appears as a means becomes an end. In this practical process
the most splendid results are to be observed whenever French socialist
workers are seen together. Such things as smoking, drinking, eating,
etc., are no longer means of contact or means that bring them together.
Company, association, and conversation, which again has society as its
end, are enough for them; the brotherhood of man is no mere phrase with
them, but a fact of life, and the nobility of man shines upon us from
their work-hardened bodies.

||XX| <When political economy claims that demand and supply always
balance each other, it immediately forgets that according to its own
claim (theory of population) the supply of _people_ always exceeds the
demand, and that, therefore, in the essential result of the whole
production process – the existence of man – the disparity between demand
and supply gets its most striking expression.

The extent to which money, which appears as a means, constitutes true
_power_ and the sole _end_ – the extent to which in general _the_ means
which turns me into a being, which gives me possession of the alien
objective being, is an _end in itself_ ... can be clearly seen from the
fact that landed property, wherever land is the source of life, and
_horse_ and _sword_, wherever these are the _true means of life_, are
also acknowledged as the true political powers in life. In the Middle
Ages a social estate is emancipated as soon as it is allowed to carry
the _sword._ Amongst nomadic peoples it is the _horse_ which makes me a
free man and a participant in the life of the community.

We have said above that man is regressing to the _cave dwelling_, etc. –
but he is regressing to it in an estranged, malignant form. The savage
in his cave – a natural element which freely offers itself for his use
and protection – feels himself no more a stranger, or rather feels as
much at home as a _fish_ in water. But the cellar dwelling of the poor
man is a hostile element, "a dwelling which remains an alien power and
only gives itself up to him insofar as he gives up to it his own blood
and sweat" – a dwelling which he cannot regard as his own hearth – where
he might at last exclaim: "Here I am at home" – but where instead he
finds himself in _someone else’s_ house, in the house of a _stranger_
who always watches him and throws him out if he does not pay his rent.
He is also aware of the contrast in quality between his dwelling and a
human dwelling that stands in the _other_ world, in the heaven of
wealth.

Estrangement is manifested not only in the fact that _my_ means of life
belong to _someone else_, that my desire is the inaccessible possession
of _another_, but also in the fact that everything is itself something
_different_ from itself – that my activity is _something else_ and that,
finally (and this applies also to the capitalist), all is under [the
sway] of _inhuman_ power.

There is a form of inactive, extravagant wealth given over wholly to
pleasure, the enjoyer of which on the one hand _behaves_ as a mere
_ephemeral_ individual frantically spending himself to no purpose, and
also regards the slave-labor of others (human _sweat and blood_) as the
prey of his cupidity. He therefore knows man himself, and hence also his
own self, as a sacrificed and futile being. With such wealth contempt of
man makes its appearance, partly as arrogance and as squandering of what
can give sustenance to a hundred human lives, and partly as the infamous
illusion that his own unbridled extravagance and ceaseless, unproductive
consumption is the condition of the other’s _labor_ and therefore of his
_subsistence_. He regards the realization of the _essential powers_ of
man only as the realization of his own excesses, his whims and
capricious, bizarre notions. This wealth which, on the other hand, again
knows wealth as a mere means, as something that is good for nothing but
to be annihilated and which is therefore at once slave and master, at
once magnanimous and base, capricious, presumptuous, conceited, refined,
cultured and witty – this wealth has not yet experienced _wealth_ as an
utterly _alien power_ over itself: it sees in it, rather, only its own
power, and [not] wealth but _enjoyment_ [is its final] aim.

This [...][38] ||XXI| and the glittering illusion about the nature of
wealth, blinded by sensuous appearances, is confronted by the _working,
sober, prosaic, economical_ industrialist who is quite enlightened about
the nature of wealth, and who, while providing a wider sphere for the
other’s self–indulgence and paying fulsome flatteries to him in his
products (for his products are just so many base compliments to the
appetites of the spendthrift), knows how to appropriate for himself in
the only _useful_ way the other’s waning power. If, therefore,
industrial wealth appears at first to be the result of extravagant,
fantastic wealth, yet its motion, the motion inherent in it, ousts the
latter also in an active way. For the fall in the _rate of interest_ is
a necessary consequence and result of industrial development. The
extravagant rentier’s means therefore dwindle day by day in _inverse_
proportion to the increasing possibilities and pitfalls of pleasure.
Consequently, he must either consume his capital, thus ruining himself,
or must become an industrial capitalist.... On the other hand, there is
a direct, constant rise in the _rent of land_ as a result of the course
of industrial development; nevertheless, as we have already seen, there
must come a time when landed property, like every other kind of
property, is bound to fall within the category of profitably
self-reproducing capital[39] – and this in fact results from the same
industrial development. Thus the squandering landowner, too, must either
consume his capital, and thus be ruined, or himself become the farmer of
his own estate – an agricultural industrialist.

The diminution in the interest on money, which Proudhon regards as the
annulling of capital and as a tendency to socialize capital, is
therefore directly rather only a symptom of the total victory of working
capital over squandering wealth – i.e., the transformation of all
private property into industrial capital. It is a total victory of
private property over all those of its qualities which are still in
_appearance_ human, and the complete subjection of the owner of private
property to the essence of private property – _labor_. To be sure, the
industrial capitalist also takes his pleasures. He does not by any means
return to the unnatural simplicity of need; but his pleasure is only a
side-issue – recreation – something subordinated to production; at the
same time it is a _calculated_ and, therefore, itself an _economical_
pleasure. For he debits it to his capital’s expense account, and what is
squandered on his pleasure must therefore amount to no more than will be
replaced with profit through the reproduction of capital. Pleasure is
therefore subsumed under capital, and the pleasure-taking individual
under the capital-accumulating individual, whilst formerly the contrary
was the case. The decrease in the interest rate is therefore a symptom
of the annulment of capital only inasmuch as it is a symptom of the
growing domination of capital – of the estrangement which is growing and
therefore hastening to its annulment. This is indeed the only way in
which that which exists affirms its opposite.>

The quarrel between the political economists about luxury and thrift is,
therefore, only the quarrel between that political economy which has
achieved clarity about the nature of wealth, and that political economy
which is still afflicted with romantic, anti-industrial memories.
Neither side, however, knows how to reduce the subject of the
controversy to its simple terms, and neither therefore can make short
work of the other. |XXI||

 

||XXXIV| [40] Moreover, _rent of land_ qua rent of land has been
overthrown, since, contrary to the argument of the Physiocrats which
maintains that the landowner is the only true producer, modern political
economy has proved that the landowner as such is rather the only
completely unproductive rentier. According to this theory, agriculture
is the business of the capitalist, who invests his capital in it
provided he can expect the usual profit. The claim of the Physiocrats –
that landed property, as the sole productive property, should alone pay
state taxes and therefore should alone approve them and participate in
the affairs of state – is transformed into the opposite position that
the tax on the rent of land is the only tax on unproductive income, and
is therefore the only tax not detrimental to national production. It
goes without saying that from this point of view also the political
privilege of landowners no longer follows from their position as
principal tax-payers.

Everything which Proudhon conceives as a movement of labor against
capital is only the movement of labor in the determination of capital,
of _industrial capital_, against capital not consumed _as_ capital,
i.e., not consumed industrially. And this movement is proceeding along
its triumphant road – the road to the victory of _industrial_ capital.
It is clear, therefore, that only when _labor_ is grasped as the essence
of private property, can the economic process as such be analyzed in its
real concreteness.

_Society_, as it appears to the political economist, is _civil
society_[41] in which every individual is a totality of needs and only
||XXXV| exists for the other person, as the other exists for him,
insofar as each becomes a means for the other. The political economist
reduces everything (just as does politics in its _Rights of Man_) to
man, i.e., to the individual whom he strips of all determinateness so as
to class him as capitalist or worker.

The _division of labor_ is the economic expression of the _social
character of labor_ within the estrangement. Or, since _labor_ is only
an expression of human activity within alienation, of the manifestation
of life as the alienation of life, the _division of labor_, too, is
therefore nothing else but the _estranged, alienated_ positing of human
activity as a _real activity of the species_ or as _activity of man as a
species-being_.

As for the _essence of the division of labor_ – and of course the
division of labor had to be conceived as a major driving force in the
production of wealth as soon as _labor_ was recognized as the _essence
of private property_ – i.e., as for the _estranged and alienated_ _form
of human activity_ _as_ _an activity of the species_ – the political
economists are very vague and self-contradictory about it.

_Adam_ _Smith_: “This _division of labor_ [...] is not originally the
effect of any human wisdom [...]. It is the necessary, [...] slow and
gradual consequence of [...] the propensity to truck, barter, and
exchange one thing for another. [...] This propensity” to trade is
probably a “necessary consequence of the use of reason and of speech
[...]. It is common to all men, and to be found in no other race of
animals.” The animal, when it is grown up, is entirely independent. “Man
has almost constant occasion for the help of others, and it is in vain
for him to expect it from their benevolence only. He will be more likely
to prevail if he can appeal to their personal interest, and show them
that it is for their own advantage to do for him what he requires of
them. [...] We address ourselves, not to their _humanity_ but to their
_self-love_, and never talk to them of _our own necessities_ but of
_their_ _advantages._ [...]

“As it is by treaty, by barter, and by purchase that we obtain from one
another the greater part of those mutual good offices which we stand in
need of, so it is this same _trucking_ disposition which originally
gives occasion to the _division of labor_. In a tribe of hunters or
shepherds a particular person makes bows and arrows, for example, with
more readiness and dexterity than any other. He frequently exchanges
them for cattle or for venison with his companions; and he finds at last
that he can in this manner get more cattle and venison than if he
himself went to the field to catch them. From a regard to his own
interest, therefore, the making of bows, etc., grows to be his chief
business [...]

“The difference of _natural talents_ in different men […] is not [...]
so much the _cause_ as the _effect_ of the division of labor.... Without
the disposition to truck [...] and exchange, every man must have
procured to himself every necessary and conveniency of life [....] All
must have had [...] the _same work_ to do, and there could have been no
such _difference of employment_ as could alone give occasion to any
great difference of talents.

“As it is this disposition which forms that difference of talents among
men so it is this same disposition which renders that difference useful.
Many tribes of animals [... ] of the same species derive from nature a
much more remarkable distinction of genius, than what, antecedent to
custom and education, appears to take place among men. By nature a
philosopher is not in talent and in intelligence half so different from
a street porter, as a mastiff is from a greyhound, or a greyhound from a
spaniel, or this last from a shepherd’s dog. Those different tribes of
animals, however, though all of the same species, are of scarce any use
to one another. The mastiff cannot add to the advantages of his strength
||XXXVI| by making use of the swiftness of the greyhound, etc. The
effects of these different talents or grades of intelligence, for want
of the power or disposition to barter and exchange, cannot be brought
into a common stock, and do not in the least contribute to the better
_accommodation_ and _conveniency_ of the species. Each animal is still
obliged to support and defend itself, separately and independently, and
derives no sort of advantage from that variety of talents with which
nature has distinguished its fellows. Among men, on the contrary, the
most dissimilar geniuses are of use to one another; the _different
produces_ of their respective talents, by the general disposition to
truck, barter, and exchange, being brought, as it were, into a common
stock, where every man may purchase whatever part of the produce of
other men’s industry he has occasion for. [...]

“As it is the power of _exchanging_ that gives occasion to the _division
of labor_, so the _extent of this division_ must always be limited by
the _extent of that power_, or, in other words, by the _extent of the
market_. When the market is very small, no person can have any
encouragement to dedicate himself entirely to one employment, for want
of the power to exchange all that surplus part of the produce of his own
labor, which is over and above his own consumption, for such parts of
the produce of other men’s labor as he has occasion for ...”

In an _advanced_ state of society “every man thus lives by exchanging
and becomes in some measure a _merchant_, and the _society itself_ grows
to be what is properly a _commercial_ society.” (See Destutt de Tracy [,
_Élémens d’idéologie_, Paris, 1826, pp. 68 and 78]: “Society is a series
of reciprocal exchanges; _commerce_ contains the whole essence of
society.”) ... The accumulation of capitals mounts with the division of
labor, and vice versa.”

So much for _Adam Smith_.

“If every family produced all that it consumed, society could keep going
although no exchange of any sort took place; _without_ being
_fundamental_, exchange is indispensable in our advanced state of
society. The division of labor is a skillful deployment of man’s powers;
it increases society’s production – its power and its pleasures – but it
curtails, reduces the ability of every person taken individually.
Production cannot take place without exchange.”

Thus J. B. _Say_.

“The powers inherent in man are his intelligence and his physical
capacity for work. Those which arise from the condition of society
consist of the capacity to _divide up labor_ and _to distribute
different jobs amongst different people_ ... and the _power_ to exchange
_mutual services_ and the products which constitute these means. The
motive which impels a man to give his services to another is self-
interest – he requires a reward for the services rendered. The right of
exclusive private property is indispensable to the establishment of
exchange amongst men.” “Exchange and division of labor reciprocally
condition each other.”

Thus Skarbek.

_Mill_ presents developed exchange – _trade_ – as a _consequence of the
division of labor_.

“The agency of man can be traced to very simple elements. He can, in
fact, do nothing more than produce motion. He can move things towards
one another, and he can separate them from one another: ||XXXVII| the
properties of matter perform all the rest.” “In the employment of labor
and machinery, it is often found that the effects can be increased by
skillful distribution, by separating all those operations which have any
tendency to impede one another, and by bringing together all those
operations which can be made in any way to aid one another. As men in
general cannot perform many different operations with the same quickness
and dexterity with which they can by practice learn to perform a few, it
is always an advantage to limit as much as possible the number of
operations imposed upon each. For dividing labor, and distributing the
powers of men and machinery, to the greatest advantage, it is in most
cases necessary to operate upon a large scale; in other words, to
produce the commodities in greater masses. It is this advantage which
gives existence to the great manufactories; a few of which, placed in
the most convenient situations, frequently supply not one country, but
many countries, with as much as they desire of the commodity produced.”

Thus _Mill_. 

The whole of modern political economy agrees, however, that division of
labor and wealth of production, division of labor and accumulation of
capital, mutually determine each other; just as it agrees that only
private property which is _at liberty_ to follow its own course can
produce the most useful and comprehensive division of labor.

_Adam Smith’s_ argument can be summarized as follows: Division of labor
bestows on labor infinite productive capacity. It stems from the
_propensity to exchange_ and _barter_, a specifically human propensity
which is probably not accidental, but is conditioned by the use of
reason and speech. The motive of those who engage in exchange is not
_humanity_ but _egoism_. The diversity of human talents is more the
effect than the cause of the division of labor, i.e., of exchange.
Besides, it is only the latter which makes such diversity useful. The
particular attributes of the different breeds within a species of animal
are by nature much more marked than the degrees of difference in human
aptitude and activity. But because animals are unable to engage in
_exchange,_ no individual animal benefits from the difference in the
attributes of animals of the same species but of different breeds.
Animals are unable to combine the different attributes of their species,
and are unable to contribute anything to the _common_ advantage and
comfort of the species. It is otherwise with _men_, amongst whom the
most dissimilar talents and forms of activity are of use to one another,
_because_ they can bring their _different_ products together into a
common stock, from which each can purchase. As the division of labor
springs from the propensity to _exchange_, so it grows and is limited by
the _extent of exchange_ – by the _extent of the market_. In advanced
conditions, every man is a _merchant,_ and society is a _commercial
society_.

_Say_ regards _exchange_ as accidental and not fundamental. Society
could exist without it. It becomes indispensable in the advanced state
of society. Yet _production_ cannot take place _without_ it. Division of
labor is a _convenient_, _useful_ means – a skillful deployment of human
powers for social wealth; but it reduces the _ability of each person_
taken _individually_. The last remark is a step forward on the part of
Say.

_Skarbek_ distinguishes the _individual_ powers _inherent in man_ –
intelligence and the physical capacity for work – from the powers
_derived_ from society – _exchange_ and _division of labor_, which
mutually condition one another. But the necessary premise of exchange is
_private property_. Skarbek here expresses in an objective form what
Smith, Say, Ricardo, etc., say when they designate _egoism_ and
_self-interest_ as the basis of exchange, and _buying and selling_ as
the _essential_ and _adequate_ form of exchange.

_Mill _presents _trade_ as the consequence of the _division of labor_.
With him _human_ activity is reduced to _mechanical motion_. Division of
labor and use of machinery promote wealth of production. Each person
must be entrusted with as small a sphere of operations as possible.
Division of labor and use of machinery, in their turn, imply large-scale
production of wealth, and hence of products. This is the reason for
large manufactories.

||XXXVIII| The examination of _division of labor_ and _exchange_ is of
extreme interest, because these are _perceptibly alienated_ expressions
of human _activity_ and _essential power_ as a _species-_activity and
-power.

To assert that _division of labor_ and _exchange_ rest on _private
property_ is nothing but asserting that _labor_ is the essence of
private property – an assertion which the political economist cannot
prove and which we wish to prove for him. Precisely in the fact that
_division of labor_ and _exchange_ are aspects of private property lies
the twofold proof, on the one hand that _human_ life required _private
property_ for its realization, and on the other hand that it now
requires the supersession of private property.

_Division of labor_ and _exchange_ are the two _phenomena_ which lead
the political economist to boast of the social character of his science,
while in the same breath he gives unconscious expression to the
contradiction in his science – the motivation of society by unsocial,
particular interests.

The factors we have to consider are: Firstly, the _propensity to
exchange_ – the basis of which is found in egoism – is regarded as the
cause or reciprocal effect of the division of labor. Say regards
exchange as not _fundamental_ to the nature of society. Wealth –
production – is explained by division of labor and exchange. The
impoverishment of individual activity, and its loss of character as a
result of the division of labor, are admitted. Exchange and division of
labor are acknowledged as the sources of the great _diversity of human
talents_ – a diversity which in its turn becomes _useful_ as a result of
exchange. Skarbek divides man’s essential powers of production – or
productive powers – into two parts: (1) those which are individual and
inherent in him – his intelligence and his special disposition, or
capacity, for work; and (2) those _derived_ from society and not from
the actual individual – division of labor and exchange.

Furthermore, the division of labor is limited by the _market_. Human
labor is simple _mechanical motion_: the main work is done by the
material properties of the objects. The fewest possible operations must
be apportioned to any one individual. Splitting-up of labor and
concentration of capital; the insignificance of individual production
and the production of wealth in large quantities. Meaning of free
private property within the division of labor. |XXXVIII||

[The Power of Money in Bourgeois Society]

 ||XL| [42] If man’s _feelings_, passions, etc., are not merely
anthropological phenomena in the [narrower] [This word cannot be clearly
deciphered in the manuscript. – _Ed._] sense, but truly
_ontological_[43] affirmation of being (of nature), and if they are only
really affirmed because their _object_ exists for them as a _sensual_
objec_t_, then it is clear that:

1. They have by no means merely one mode of affirmation, but rather that
the distinct character of their existence, of their life, is constituted
by the distinct mode of their affirmation. In what manner the object
exists for them, is the characteristic mode of their _gratification_.

2. Wherever the sensuous affirmation is the direct annulment of the
object in its independent form (as in eating, drinking, working up of
the object, etc.), this is the affirmation of the object.

3. Insofar as man, and hence also his feeling, etc., is _human,_ the
affirmation of the object by another is likewise his own gratification.

4. Only through developed industry – i.e., through the medium of private
property – does the ontological essence of human passion come into
being, in its totality as well as in its humanity; the science of man is
therefore itself a product of man’s own practical activity.

5. The meaning of private property – apart from its estrangement – is
the _existence of essential objects_ for man, both as objects of
enjoyment and as objects of activity.

By possessing the _property_ of buying everything, by possessing the
property of appropriating all objects, _money_ is thus the _object_ of
eminent possession. The universality of its _property_ is the
omnipotence of its being. It is therefore regarded as an omnipotent
being.  Money is the _procurer_ between man’s need and the object,
between his life and his means of life. But _that which_ mediates _my_
life for me, also _mediates_ the existence of other people for me. For
me it is the _other_ person.

“What, man! confound it, hands and feet
And head and backside, all are yours!

And what we take while life is sweet,

Is that to be declared not ours?

Six stallions, say, I can afford,

Is not their strength my property?

I tear along, a sporting lord,

As if their legs belonged to me.”

Goethe: _Faust_ (Mephistopheles)

Shakespeare in _Timon of Athens_:

“Gold? Yellow, glittering, precious gold? No, Gods,

I am no idle votarist! ... Thus much of this will

make black white, foul fair,

Wrong right, base noble, old young, coward valiant.

... Why, this

Will lug your priests and servants from your sides,

Pluck stout men’s pillows from below their heads:

This yellow slave

Will knit and break religions, bless the accursed;

Make the hoar leprosy adored, place thieves

And give them title, knee and approbation

With senators on the bench: This is it

That makes the wappen’d widow wed again;

She, whom the spital-house and ulcerous sores

Would cast the gorge at, this embalms and spices

To the April day again. Come, damned earth,

Thou common whore of mankind, that putt’s odds

Among the rout of nations.”

And also later:

“O thou sweet king-killer, and dear divorce

Twixt natural son and sire! thou bright defiler

Of Hymen’s purest bed! thou valiant Mars!

Thou ever young, fresh, loved and delicate wooer,

Whose blush doth thaw the consecrated snow

That lies on Dian’s lap! Thou _visible God_!

That solder’s close impossibilities,

And makest them kiss! That speak’st with every tongue,

||XLII| To every purpose! O thou touch of hearts!

Think, thy slave man rebels, and by thy virtue

Set them into confounding odds, that beasts

May have the world in empire!”

Shakespeare excellently depicts the real nature of _money_. To
understand him, let us begin, first of all, by expounding the passage
from Goethe.

That which is for me through the medium of _money_ – that for which I
can pay (i.e., which money can buy) – that am _I myself_, the possessor
of the money. The extent of the power of money is the extent of my
power. Money’s properties are my – the possessor’s – properties and
essential powers. Thus, what I _am_ and _am capable of_ is by no means
determined by my individuality. I _am_ ugly, but I can buy for myself
the _most beautiful_ of women. Therefore I am not ugly, for the effect
of _ugliness_ – its deterrent power – is nullified by money. I,
according to my individual characteristics, am _lame_, but money
furnishes me with twenty-four feet. Therefore I am not lame. I am bad,
dishonest, unscrupulous, stupid; but money is honored, and hence its
possessor. Money is the supreme good, therefore its possessor is good.
Money, besides, saves me the trouble of being dishonest: I am therefore
presumed honest. I am _brainless_, but money is the _real brain_ of all
things and how then should its possessor be brainless? Besides, he can
buy clever people for himself, and is he who has [In the manuscript:
“is”. – _Ed._] power over the clever not more clever than the clever? Do
not I, who thanks to money am capable of _all_ that the human heart
longs for, possess all human capacities? Does not my money, therefore,
transform all my incapacities into their contrary?

If _money_ is the bond binding me to _human_ life, binding society to
me, connecting me with nature and man, is not money the bond of all
_bonds_? Can it not dissolve and bind all ties? Is it not, therefore,
also the universal _agent of separation_? It is the _coin_ that really
_separates_ as well as the real _binding agent_ – the [...] [In the
manuscript one word cannot be deciphered. – _Ed._] _chemical_ power of
society.

Shakespeare stresses especially two properties of money:

1. It is the visible divinity – the transformation of all human and
natural properties into their contraries, the universal confounding and
distorting of things: impossibilities are soldered together by it.

2. It is the common whore, the common procurer of people and nations.

The distorting and confounding of all human and natural qualities, the
fraternization of impossibilities – the _divine power_ of money – lies
in its _character_ as men’s estranged, alienating and self-disposing
_species-nature_. Money is the alienated _ability of mankind_.

That which I am unable to do as a _man_, and of which therefore all my
individual essential powers are incapable, I am able to do by means of
_money_. Money thus turns each of these powers into something which in
itself it is not – turns it, that is, into its _contrary_.

If I long for a particular dish or want to take the mail-coach because I
am not strong enough to go by foot, money fetches me the dish and the
mail-coach: that is, it converts my wishes from something in the realm
of imagination, translates them from their meditated, imagined or
desired existence into their _sensuous, actual_ existence – from
imagination to life, from imagined being into real being. In effecting
this mediation, [money] is the _truly_ _creative_ power.

No doubt the _demand_ also exists for him who has no money, but his
demand is a mere thing of the imagination without effect or existence
for me, for a third party, for the [others], ||XLIII| and which
therefore remains even for me _unreal_ and _objectless_. The difference
between effective demand based on money and ineffective demand based on
my need, my passion, my wish, etc., is the difference between _being_
and _thinking_, between the idea which _exists_ within me merely as an
idea and the idea which exists as a _real object_ outside of me.

If I have no money for travel, I have no _need_ – that is, no real and
realizable need – to travel. If I have the _vocation_ for study but no
money for it, I have _no_ vocation for study – that is, no _effective_,
no _true_ vocation. On the other hand, if I have really _no_ vocation
for study but have the will _and_ the money for it, I have an
_effective_ vocation for it. _Money_ as the external, universal _medium_
and _faculty_ (not springing from man as man or from human society as
society) for turning an _image into reality_ and _reality into a mere
image_, transforms the _real essential powers_ _of man and nature_ into
what are merely abstract notions and therefore _imperfections_ and
tormenting chimeras, just as it transforms _real imperfections and
chimeras_ – essential powers which are really impotent, which exist only
in the imagination of the individual – into _real powers_ and
_faculties_. In the light of this characteristic alone, money is thus
the general distorting of _individualities_ which turns them into their
opposite and confers contradictory attributes upon their attributes.

Money, then, appears as this _distorting_ power both against the
individual and against the bonds of society, etc., which claim to be
_entities_ in themselves. It transforms fidelity into infidelity, love
into hate, hate into love, virtue into vice, vice into virtue, servant
into master, master into servant, idiocy into intelligence, and
intelligence into idiocy.

Since money, as the existing and active concept of value, confounds and
confuses all things, it is the general _confounding_ and _confusing_ of
all things – the world upside-down – the confounding and confusing of
all natural and human qualities.

He who can buy bravery is brave, though he be a coward. As money is not
exchanged for any one specific quality, for any one specific thing, or
for any particular human essential power, but for the entire objective
world of man and nature, from the standpoint of its possessor it
therefore serves to exchange every quality for every other, even
contradictory, quality and object: it is the fraternization of
impossibilities. It makes contradictions embrace.

Assume _man_ to be _man_ and his relationship to the world to be a human
one: then you can exchange love only for love, trust for trust, etc. If
you want to enjoy art, you must be an artistically cultivated person; if
you want to exercise influence over other people, you must be a person
with a stimulating and encouraging effect on other people. Every one of
your relations to man and to nature must be a _specific expression_,
corresponding to the object of your will, of your _real individual_
life. If you love without evoking love in return – that is, if your
loving as loving does not produce reciprocal love; if through a _living
expression_ of yourself as a loving person you do not make yourself a
_beloved one_, then your love is impotent – a misfortune. |XLIII||

 

[Critique of the Hegelian Dialectic and Philosophy as a Whole]

||XI| (6) This is perhaps the place at which, by way of explanation and
justification, we might offer some considerations in regard to the
Hegelian dialectic generally and especially its exposition in the
_Phänomenologie_ and _Logik_ and also, lastly, the relation [to it] of
the modern critical movement.[44]

So powerful was modern German criticism’s preoccupation with the past –
so completely was its development entangled with the subject-matter –
that here prevailed a completely uncritical attitude to the method of
criticizing, together with a complete lack of awareness about the
_apparently formal_, but really _vital_ question: how do we now stand as
regards the Hegelian _dialectic_? This lack of awareness about the
relationship of modern criticism to the Hegelian philosophy as a whole
and especially to the Hegelian dialectic has been so great that critics
like _Strauss_ and _Bruno Bauer_ still remain within the confines of the
Hegelian logic; the former completely so and the latter at least
implicitly so in his _Synoptiker_ (where, in opposition to Strauss, he
replaces the substance of “abstract nature” by the “self-consciousness”
of abstract man), and even in _Das entdeckte Christenthum_. Thus in _Das
entdeckte Christenthum_, for example, you get:

“As though in positing the world, self-consciousness does not posit that
which is different [from itself] and in what it is creating it does not
create itself, since it in turn annuls the difference between what it
has created and itself, since it itself has being only in creating and
in the movement – as though its purpose were not this movement?” etc.;
or again: “They” (the French materialists) “have not yet been able to
see that it is only as the movement of self-consciousness that the
movement of the universe has actually come to be for itself, and
achieved unity with itself.” [Pp. 113, 114-15.]

Such expressions do not even show any verbal divergence from the
Hegelian approach, but on the contrary repeat it word for word.

||XII| How little consciousness there was in relation to the Hegelian
dialectic during the act of criticism (Bauer, the _Synoptiker_), and how
little this consciousness came into being even after the act of material
criticism, is proved by Bauer when, in his _Die gute Sache der
Freiheit_, he dismisses the brash question put by Herr Gruppe – “What
about logic now?” – by referring him to future critics.[45]

But even now – now that _Feuerbach_ both in his _Thesen_ in the
_Anekdota_ and, in detail, in the _Philosophie der Zukunft_ has in
principle overthrown the old dialectic and philosophy; now that that
school of criticism, on the other hand, which was incapable of
accomplishing this, has all the same seen it accomplished and has
proclaimed itself pure, resolute, absolute criticism that has come into
the clear with itself; now that this criticism, in its spiritual pride,
has reduced the whole process of history to the relation between the
rest of the world and itself (the rest of the world, in contrast to
itself, falling under the category of “the masses”) and dissolved all
dogmatic antitheses into the _single_ dogmatic antithesis of its own
cleverness and the stupidity of the world – the antithesis of the
critical Christ and Mankind, the “_rabble_”; now that daily and hourly
it has demonstrated its own excellence against the dullness of the
masses; now, finally, that it has proclaimed the critical _Last
Judgment_ in the shape of an announcement that the day is approaching
when the whole of decadent humanity will assemble before it and be
sorted by it into groups, each particular mob receiving its _testimonium
paupertatis_; now that it has made known in print its superiority to
human feelings as well as its superiority to the world, over which it
sits enthroned in sublime solitude, only letting fall from time to time
from its sarcastic lips the ringing laughter of the Olympian Gods – even
now, after all these delightful antics of idealism (i.e., of Young
Hegelianism) expiring in the guise of criticism – even now it has not
expressed the suspicion that the time was ripe for a critical settling
of accounts with the mother of Young Hegelianism – the Hegelian
dialectic – and even had nothing to say about its critical attitude
towards the Feuerbachian dialectic. This shows a completely uncritical
attitude to itself.

_Feuerbach_ is the only one who has a _serious, critical_ attitude to
the Hegelian dialectic and who has made genuine discoveries in this
field. He is in fact the true conqueror of the old philosophy. The
extent of his achievement, and the unpretentious simplicity with which
he, Feuerbach, gives it to the world, stand in striking contrast to the
opposite attitude (of the others).

Feuerbach’s great achievement is:

(1) The proof that philosophy is nothing else but religion rendered into
thought and expounded by thought, i.e., another form and manner of
existence of the estrangement of the essence of man; hence equally to be
condemned;

(2) The establishment of _true materialism_ and of _real science_, by
making the social relationship of “man to man” the basic principle of
the theory;

(3) His opposing to the negation of the negation, which claims to be the
absolute positive, the self-supporting positive, positively based on
itself.

Feuerbach explains the Hegelian dialectic (and thereby justifies
starting out from the positive facts which we know by the senses) as
follows:

Hegel sets out from the estrangement of substance (in logic, from the
infinite, abstractly universal) – from the absolute and fixed
abstraction; which means, put popularly, that he sets out from religion
and theology.

_Secondly_, he annuls the infinite, and posits the actual, sensuous,
real, finite, particular (philosophy, annulment of religion and
theology).

_Thirdly_, he again annuls the positive and restores the abstraction,
the infinite – restoration of religion and theology.

Feuerbach thus conceives the negation of the negation _only_ as a
contradiction of philosophy with itself – as the philosophy which
affirms theology (the transcendent, etc.) after having denied it, and
which it therefore affirms in opposition to itself.

The positive position or self-affirmation and self-confirmation
contained in the negation of the negation is taken to be a position
which is not yet sure of itself, which is therefore burdened with its
opposite, which is doubtful of itself and therefore in need of proof,
and which, therefore, is not a position demonstrating itself by its
existence – not an acknowledged ||XIII| position; hence it is directly
and immediately confronted by the position of sense-certainty based on
itself. [Feuerbach also defines the negation of the negation, the
definite concept, as thinking surpassing itself in thinking and as
thinking wanting to be directly awareness, nature, reality. – _Note by
Marx_[46]]

But because Hegel has conceived the negation of the negation, from the
point of view of the positive relation inherent in it, as the true and
only positive, and from the point of view of the negative relation
inherent in it as the only true act and spontaneous activity of all
being, he has only found the _abstract, logical, speculative_ expression
for the movement of history, which is not yet the real history of man as
a given subject, but only the act of creation, the _history of the_
_origin_ of man.

We shall explain both the abstract form of this process and the
difference between this process as it is in Hegel in contrast to modern
criticism, in contrast to the same process in Feuerbach’s _Wesen des
Christenthums_, or rather the _critical_ form of this in Hegel still
uncritical process.

 

Let us take a look at the Hegelian system. One must begin with Hegel’s
Phänomenologie, the true point of origin and the secret of the Hegelian
philosophy.

_PHENOMENOLOGY._

A_. SELF-CONSCIOUSNESS_.

I. _Consciousness_. (α) Certainty at the level of sense-experience; or
the “this” and _meaning_. (ß) _Perception_, or the thing with its
properties, and _deception._ (γ) Force and understanding, appearance and
the supersensible world.

II. _Self-consciousness_. The truth of certainty of self. (a)
Independence and dependence of self-consciousness; mastery and
servitude. (b) Freedom of self-consciousness. Stoicism, skepticism, the
unhappy consciousness.

III. _Reason_. Reason’s certainty and reason’s truth. (a) Observation as
a process of reason. Observation of nature and of self-consciousness.
(b) Realization of rational self-consciousness through its own activity.
Pleasure and necessity. The law of the heart and the insanity of
self-conceit. Virtue and the course of the world. (c) The individuality
which is real in and for itself. The spiritual animal kingdom and the
deception or the real fact. Reason as lawgiver. Reason which tests laws.

B_. MIND_.

I. _True_ mind, ethics. II. Mind in self-estrangement, culture. III.
Mind certain of itself, morality.

C_. RELIGION_. _Natural_ religion; _religion of art_; _revealed_
religion.

D. _ABSOLUTE KNOWLEDGE_.

Hegel’s _Encyklopädie_, beginning as it does with logic, with _pure
speculative thought_, and ending with _absolute knowledge_ – with the
self-conscious, self-comprehending philosophic or absolute (i.e.,
superhuman) abstract mind – is in its entirety nothing but the
_display_, the self-objectification, of the _essence_ of the philosophic
mind, and the philosophic mind is nothing but the estranged mind of the
world thinking within its self-estrangement – i.e., comprehending itself
abstractly.

_Logic_ – mind’s _coin of the realm_, the speculative or _mental value_
of man and nature – its essence which has grown totally indifferent to
all real determinateness, and hence unreal – is _alienated thinking_,
and therefore thinking which abstracts from nature and from real man:
_abstract_ thinking.

Then: _The externality of this abstract thinking_ ... _nature_, as it is
for this abstract thinking. Nature is external to it – its self-loss;
and it apprehends nature also in an external fashion, as abstract
thought, but as alienated abstract thinking. Finally, _mind_, this
thinking returning home to its own point of origin – the thinking which
as the anthropological, phenomenological, psychological, ethical,
artistic and religious mind is not valid for itself, until ultimately it
finds itself, and affirms itself, as _absolute_ knowledge and hence
absolute, i.e., abstract, mind, thus receiving its conscious embodiment
in the mode of existence corresponding to it. For its real mode of
existence is _abstraction_.

There is a double error in Hegel.

The FIRST emerges most clearly in the _Phänomenologie_, the birth-place
of the Hegelian philosophy. When, for instance, wealth, state-power,
etc., are understood by Hegel as entities estranged from the human
being, this only happens in their form as thoughts ... They are
thought-entities, and therefore merely an estrangement of _pure_, i.e.,
abstract, philosophical thinking. The whole process therefore ends with
absolute knowledge. It is precisely abstract thought from which these
objects are estranged and which they confront with their presumption of
reality. The _philosopher_ – who is himself an abstract form of
estranged man – takes himself as the _criterion_ of the estranged world.
The whole _history of the alienation_ _process_
[_Entäußerungsgeschichte_] and the whole _process of the retraction_ of
the alienation is therefore nothing but the _history of the_
_production_ of abstract (i.e., absolute) ||XVII| [47] thought – of
logical, speculative thought. The _estrangement_, [_Entfremdung_] which
therefore forms the real interest of the transcendence [_Aufhebung_] of
this alienation [_Entäußerung_], is the opposition of _in itself and_
_for itself_, of _consciousness_ _and self-consciousness_, of _object
and subject_ – that is to say, it is the opposition between abstract
thinking and sensuous reality or real sensuousness within thought
itself. All other oppositions and movements of these oppositions are but
the _semblance_, the _cloak_, the _exoteric_ shape of these oppositions
which alone matter, and which constitute the _meaning_ of these other,
profane oppositions. It is not the fact that the human being
_objectifies himself inhumanly_, in opposition to himself, but the fact
that he _objectifies himself_ [_selbst sich vergegenständlicht_] in
_distinction_ from and in _opposition_ to abstract thinking, that
constitutes the posited essence of the estrangement [_Entfremdung_] and
the thing to be superseded [_aufzuhebende_].

||XVIII| The appropriation of man’s essential powers, which have become
objects – indeed, alien objects – is thus in the _first place_ only an
_appropriation_ occurring in _consciousness_, in _pure thought_, i.e.,
in _abstraction_: it is the appropriation of these objects as _thoughts_
and as _movements of thought_. Consequently, despite its thoroughly
negative and critical appearance and despite the genuine criticism
contained in it, which often anticipates far later development, there is
already latent in the _Phänomenologie_ as a germ, a potentiality, a
secret, the uncritical positivism and the equally uncritical idealism of
Hegel’s later works – that philosophic dissolution and restoration of
the existing empirical world.

_In the SECOND place_: the vindication of the objective world for man –
for example, the realization that _sensuous_ consciousness is not an
_abstractly_ sensuous consciousness but a _humanly_ sensuous
consciousness, that religion, wealth, etc., are but the estranged world
of _human_ objectification, of _man’s_ essential powers put to work and
that they are therefore but the _path_ to the true _human_ world – this
appropriation or the insight into this process appears in Hegel
therefore in this form, that _sense, religion_, state power, etc., are
_spiritual_ entities; for only _mind_ is the _true_ essence of man, and
the true form of mind is thinking mind, theological, speculative mind.

The _human character_ of nature and of the nature created by history –
man’s products – appears in the form that they are _products_ of
abstract mind and as such, therefore, phases of _mind –
thought_-_entities_. The _Phänomenologie_ is, therefore, a hidden,
mystifying and still uncertain criticism; but inasmuch as it depicts
man’s _estrangement_, even though man appears only as mind, there lie
concealed in it _all_ the elements of criticism, already _prepared_ and
_elaborated_ in a manner often rising far above the Hegelian standpoint.
The “unhappy consciousness”, the “honest consciousness”, the struggle of
the “noble and base consciousness”, etc., etc. – these separate sections
contain, but still in an estranged form, the _critical_ elements of
whole spheres such as religion, the state, civil life, etc. Just as
_entities, objects_, appear as thought-entities, so the _subject_ is
always _consciousness_ or _self-consciousness_; or rather the object
appears only as _abstract_ consciousness, man only as
_self-consciousness_: the distinct forms of estrangement which make
their appearance are, therefore, only various forms of consciousness and
self-consciousness. Just as _in itself_ abstract consciousness (the form
in which the object is conceived) is merely a moment of distinction of
self-consciousness, what appears as the result of the movement is the
identity of self-consciousness with consciousness – absolute knowledge –
the movement of abstract thought no longer directed outwards but
proceeding now only within its own self: that is to say, the dialectic
of pure thought is the result. |XVIII||

 

||XXIII| [48] The outstanding achievement of Hegel’s _Phänomenologie_
and of its final outcome, the dialectic of negativity as the moving and
generating principle, is thus first that Hegel conceives the
self-creation of man as a process, conceives objectification as loss of
the object, as alienation and as transcendence of this alienation; that
he thus grasps the essence of _labor_ and comprehends objective man –
true, because real man – as the outcome of man’s _own labor_. The _real,
active_ orientation of man to himself as a species-being, or his
manifestation as a real species-being (i.e., as a human being), is only
possible if he really brings out all his _species-powers_ – something
which in turn is only possible through the cooperative action of all of
mankind, only as the result of history – and treats these powers as
objects: and this, to begin with, is again only possible in the form of
estrangement.

We shall now demonstrate in detail Hegel’s one-sidedness – and
limitations as they are displayed in the final chapter of the
_Phänomenologie_, “Absolute Knowledge” – a chapter which contains the
condensed spirit of the _Phänomenologie_, the relationship of the
_Phänomenologie_ to speculative dialectic, and also Hegel’s
_consciousness_ concerning both and their relationship to one another.

Let us provisionally say just this much in advance: Hegel’s standpoint
is that of modern political economy.[49] He grasps _labor_ as the
_essence_ of man – as man’s essence which stands the test: he sees only
the positive, not the negative side of labor. Labor is man’s
_coming-to-be_ for _himself_ within _alienation,_ or as _alienated_ man.
The only labor which Hegel knows and recognizes is _abstractly mental_
labor. Therefore, that which constitutes the essence of philosophy – the
_alienation of man who knows himself_, or _alienated_ science _thinking
itself_ - Hegel grasps as its essence; and in contradistinction to
previous philosophy he is therefore able to combine its separate
aspects, and to present his philosophy as _the_ philosophy. What the
other philosophers did – that they grasped separate phases of nature and
of human life as phases of self-consciousness, namely, of abstract
self-consciousness – is _known_ to Hegel as the _doings_ of philosophy.
Hence his science is absolute.

 Let us now turn to our subject.

_“Absolute Knowledge”. The last chapter of the “Phänomenologie”._

The main point is that the _object of consciousness_ is nothing else but
_self-consciousness_, or that the object is only _objectified
self-consciousness_ – self-consciousness as object. (Positing of man =
self-consciousness).

The issue, therefore, is to surmount the _object of consciousness_.
_Objectivity_ as such is regarded as an _estranged_ human relationship
which does not correspond to the _essence of man_, to
self-consciousness. The _reappropriation_ of the objective essence of
man, produced within the orbit of estrangement as something alien,
therefore denotes not only the annulment of _estrangement_, but of
_objectivity_ as well. Man, that is to say, is regarded as a
_non-objective, spiritual_ being.

The movement of _surmounting the object of consciousness_ is now
described by Hegel in the following way:

The _object_ reveals itself not merely as _returning_ into the _self_ –
this is according to Hegel the _one-sided_ way of apprehending this
movement, the grasping of only one side. Man is equated with self. The
self, however, is only the _abstractly_ conceived man – man created by
abstraction. Man _is_ selfish. His eye, his ear, etc., are _selfish_. In
him every one of his essential powers has the quality of _selfhood_. But
it is quite false to say on that account “_self-consciousness_ has eyes,
ears, essential powers”. _Self-consciousness_ is rather a quality of
human nature, of the human eye, etc.; it is not human nature that is a
quality of ||XXIV| self-consciousness.

The self-abstracted entity, fixed for itself, is man as _abstract
egoist_ – _egoism_ raised in its pure abstraction to the level of
thought. (We shall return to this point later.)

For Hegel the _human being – man_ – equals _self-consciousness_. All
estrangement of the human being is therefore _nothing_ but _estrangement
of self-consciousness_. The estrangement of self-consciousness is not
regarded as an _expression_ – reflected in the realm of knowledge and
thought – of the _real_ estrangement of the human being. Instead, the
_actual_ estrangement – that which appears real – is according to its
_innermost_, hidden nature (which is only brought to light by
philosophy) nothing but the _manifestation_ of the estrangement of the
real human essence, of _self-consciousness._ The science which
comprehends this is therefore called _phenomenology_. All
reappropriation of the estranged objective essence appears therefore, as
incorporation into self-consciousness: The man who takes hold of his
essential being is _merely_ the self-consciousness which takes hold of
objective essences. Return of the object into the self is therefore the
reappropriation of the object.

Expressed in _all its aspects_, the _surmounting of the object of
consciousness_ means:

(1) That the object as such presents itself to consciousness as
something vanishing.

(2) That it is the alienation of self-consciousness which posits
thinghood.[50]

(3) That this alienation has, not merely a _negative_ but a _positive_
significance

(4) That it has this meaning not merely _for us_ or intrinsically, but
_for self-consciousness itself_.

(5) _For self-consciousness_, the negative of the object, or its
annulling of itself, has _positive_ significance – or it _knows_ this
futility of the object – because of the fact that it alienates itself,
for in this alienation it posits _itself_ as object, or, for the sake of
the indivisible unity of _being-for-itself,_ posits the object as
itself.

(6) On the other hand, this contains likewise the other moment, that
self-consciousness has also just as much superseded this alienation and
objectivity and resumed them into itself, being thus _at home_ in _its_
other-being _as such_.

(7) This is the movement of consciousness and this is therefore the
totality of its moments.

(8) Consciousness must similarly be related to the object in the
totality of its determinations and have comprehended it in terms of each
of them. This totality of its determinations makes the object
_intrinsically a spiritual being_; and it becomes so in truth for
consciousness through the apprehending of each one of the determinations
as _self_, or through what was called above the _spiritual_ attitude to
them.[51]

 As to (1): That the object as such presents itself to consciousness as
something vanishing – this is the above-mentioned _return of the object
into the self_.

As to (2): The _alienation of self-consciousness_ posits _thinghood_.
Because man equals self-consciousness, his alienated, objective essence,
or _thinghood_, equals _alienated self-consciousness_, and _thinghood_
is thus posited through this alienation (thinghood being _that_ which is
an _object for_ _man_ and an object for him is really only that which is
to him an essential object, therefore his _objective_ essence. And since
it is not _real man_, nor therefore _nature_ – man being _human nature_
– who as such is made the subject, but only the abstraction of man –
self-consciousness, so thinghood cannot be anything but alienated
self-consciousness). It is only to be expected that a living, natural
being equipped and endowed with objective (i.e., material) essential
powers should have _real natural objects_ of his essence; and that his
self-alienation should lead to the positing of a _real_, objective
world, but within the framework of _externality_, and, therefore, an
overwhelming world not belonging to his own essential being. There is
nothing incomprehensible or mysterious in this. It would be mysterious,
rather, if it were otherwise. But it is equally clear that a
_self-consciousness_ by its alienation can posit only _thinghood,_ i.e.,
only an abstract thing, a thing of abstraction and not a _real_
thing.[52] It is ||XXVI| clear, further, that thinghood is therefore
utterly without any _independence_, any _essentiality_ vis-à-vis
self-consciousness; that on the contrary it is a mere creature –
something _posited_ by self-consciousness. And what is posited, instead
of confirming itself, is but confirmation of the act of positing which
for a moment fixes its energy as the product, and gives it the
_semblance_ – but only for a moment – of an independent, real substance.

Whenever real, corporeal _man,_ man with his feet firmly on the solid
ground, man exhaling and inhaling all the forces of nature, _posits_ his
real, objective _essential powers_ as alien objects by his
externalisation, it is not the _act of positing_ which is the subject in
this process: it is the subjectivity of _objective_ essential powers,
whose action, therefore, must also be something objective. An objective
being acts objectively, and he would not act objectively if the
objective did not reside in the very nature of his being. He only
creates or posits objects, because he is posited by objects – because at
bottom he is nature. In the act of positing, therefore, this objective
being does not fall from his state of “pure activity” into a _creating
of the object_; on the contrary, his _objective_ product only confirms
his _objective_ activity, his activity as the activity of an objective,
natural being.

Here we see how consistent naturalism or humanism is distinct from both
idealism and materialism, and constitutes at the same time the unifying
truth of both. We see also how only naturalism is capable of
comprehending the action of world history.

<_Man_ is directly a _natural being_. As a natural being and as a living
natural being he is on the one hand endowed with _natural powers, vital
powers_ – he is an _active_ natural being. These forces exist in him as
tendencies and abilities – as _instincts_. On the other hand, as a
natural, corporeal, sensuous objective being he is a _suffering_,
conditioned and limited creature, like animals and plants. That is to
say, the _objects_ of his instincts exist outside him, as _objects_
independent of him; yet these objects are _objects_ that he _needs_ –
essential objects, indispensable to the manifestation and confirmation
of his essential powers. To say that man is a _corporeal_, living, real,
sensuous, objective being full of natural vigor is to say that he has
_real, sensuous objects_ as the object of his being or of his life, or
that he can only _express_ his life in real, sensuous objects. _To be_
objective, natural and sensuous, and at the same time to have object,
nature and sense outside oneself, or oneself to be object, nature and
sense for a third party, is one and the same thing.>

_Hunger_ is a natural _need_; it therefore needs a _nature_ outside
itself, an _object_ outside itself, in order to satisfy itself, to be
stilled. Hunger is an acknowledged need of my body for an _object_
existing outside it, indispensable to its integration and to the
expression of its essential being. The sun is the _object_ of the plant
– an indispensable object to it, confirming its life – just as the plant
is an object of the sun, being an _expression_ of the life-awakening
power of the sun, of the sun’s _objective_ essential power.

A being which does not have its nature outside itself is not a _natural_
being, and plays no part in the system of nature. A being which has no
object outside itself is not an objective being. A being which is not
itself an object for some third being has no being for its _object_;
i.e., it is not objectively related. Its being is not objective.

||XXVII| A non-objective being is a _non-being_.

Suppose a being which is neither an object itself, nor has an object.
Such a being, in the first place, would be the _unique_ being: there
would exist no being outside it – it would exist solitary and alone. For
as soon as there are objects outside me, as soon as I am not _alone_, I
am _another_ – _another reality_ than the object outside me. For this
third object I am thus a _different reality_ than itself; that is, I am
_its_ object. Thus, to suppose a being which is not the object of
another being is to presuppose that _no_ objective being exists. As soon
as I have an object, this object has me for an object. But a
_non-objective_ being is an unreal, non-sensuous thing – a product of
mere thought (i.e., of mere imagination) – an abstraction. To be
_sensuous_, that is, to be really existing, means to be an object of
sense, to be a _sensuous_ object, to have sensuous objects outside
oneself – objects of one’s sensuousness. To be sensuous is to _suffer_.

Man as an objective, sensuous being is therefore a _suffering_ being –
and because he feels that he suffers, a _passionate_ being. Passion is
the essential power of man energetically bent on its object.

<But man is not merely a natural being: he is a _human_ natural being.
That is to say, he is a being for himself. Therefore he is a
_species-being_, and has to confirm and manifest himself as such both in
his being and in his knowing. Therefore, _human_ objects are not natural
objects as they immediately present themselves, and neither is _human
sense_ as it immediately _is_ – as it is objectively – _human_
sensibility, human objectivity. Neither nature objectively nor nature
subjectively is directly given in a form adequate to the human being.>
And as everything natural has to _come into being, man_ too has his act
of origin – _history_ – which, however, is for him a known history, and
hence as an act of origin it is a conscious self-transcending act of
origin. History is the true natural history of man (on which more
later).

Thirdly, because this positing of thinghood is itself only an illusion,
an act contradicting the nature of pure activity, it has to be canceled
again and thinghood denied.

_Re 3, 4, 5 and 6_. (3) This externalization [_Entäußerung_] of
consciousness has not merely a _negative_ but a _positive_ significance,
and (4) it has this meaning not merely _for us_ or intrinsically, but
for consciousness itself. _For consciousness_ the negative of the
object, its annulling of itself, has _positive_ significance – i.e.,
consciousness _knows_ this nullity of the object – because it alienates
_itself_; for, in this alienation it _knows_ itself as object, or, for
the sake of the indivisible unity of _being-for-itself_, the object as
itself. (6) On the other hand, there is also this other moment in the
process, that consciousness has also just as much superseded this
alienation and objectivity and resumed them into itself, being thus _at
home_ in its _other-being as such_.

 As we have already seen, the appropriation of what is estranged and
objective, or the annulling of objectivity in the form of _estrangement_
(which has to advance from indifferent strangeness to real, antagonistic
estrangement), means likewise or even primarily for Hegel that it is
_objectivity_ which is to be annulled, because it is not the
_determinate_ character of the object, but rather its _objective_
character that is offensive and constitutes estrangement for
self-consciousness. The object is therefore something negative,
self-annulling – a _nullity_. This nullity of the object has not only a
negative but a _positive_ meaning for consciousness, since this nullity
of the object is precisely the _self-confirmation_ of the
non-objectivity, of the ||XXVIII| _abstraction_ of itself. For
_consciousness itself_ the nullity of the object has a positive meaning
because it _knows_ this nullity, the objective being, as _its
self-alienation_; because it knows that it exists only as a result of
its own self-alienation....

The way in which consciousness is, and in which something is for it, is
_knowing_. Knowing is its sole act. Something therefore comes to be for
consciousness insofar as the latter _knows_ this _something_. Knowing is
its sole objective relation.

It, consciousness, then, knows the nullity of the object (i.e., knows
the non-existence of the distinction between the object and itself, the
non-existence of the object for it) because it knows the object as its
_self-alienation_; that is, it knows itself – knows knowing as object –
because the object is only the _semblance_ of an object, a piece of
mystification, which in its essence, however, is nothing else but
knowing itself, which has confronted itself with itself and hence has
confronted itself with a _nullity_ – a something which has _no_
objectivity outside the knowing. Or: knowing knows that in relating
itself to an object it is only _outside_ itself – that it only
externalizes itself; that _it itself_ only _appears_ to itself as an
object – or that that which appears to it as an object is only itself.

On the other hand, says Hegel, there is here at the same time this other
moment, that consciousness has just as much annulled and reabsorbed this
externalisation and objectivity, being thus _at home_ in its
_other-being as such_.

In this discussion all the illusions of speculation are brought
together.

First of _all_: consciousness, self-consciousness, is _at home_ in _its
other-being as such_. It is therefore – or if we here abstract from the
Hegelian abstraction and put the self-consciousness of man instead of
self-consciousness – it is _at home_ in _its other being as such_. This
implies, for one thing, that consciousness (knowing as knowing, thinking
as thinking) pretends to be directly the _other_ of itself – to be the
world of sense, the real world, life – thought surpassing itself in
thought (Feuerbach).[53] This aspect is contained herein, inasmuch as
consciousness as mere consciousness takes offence not at estranged
objectivity, but at _objectivity as such_.

Secondly, this implies that self-conscious man, insofar as he has
recognized and superseded the spiritual world (or his world’s spiritual,
general mode of being) as self-alienation, nevertheless again confirms
it in this alienated shape and passes it off as his true mode of being –
re-establishes it, and pretends to be _at home in his other-being as
such_. Thus, for instance, after superseding religion, after recognizing
religion to be a product of self-alienation he yet finds confirmation of
himself in _religion as religion_. Here _is_ the root of Hegel’s _false_
positivism, or of his merely _apparent_ criticism: this is what
Feuerbach designated as the positing, negating and re-establishing of
religion or theology – but it has to be expressed in more general terms.
Thus reason is at home in unreason as unreason. The man who has
recognized that he is leading an alienated life in law, politics, etc.,
is leading his true human life in this alienated life as such.
Self-affirmation, self-confirmation _in contradiction_ with itself – in
contradiction both with the knowledge of and with the essential being of
the object – is thus true _knowledge_ and _life_.

There can therefore no longer be any question about an act of
accommodation on Hegel’s part vis-à-vis religion, the state, etc., since
this lie is the lie of his principle.

||XXIX| If I _know_ religion as _alienated_ human self-consciousness,
then what I know in it as religion is not my self-consciousness, but my
alienated self-consciousness confirmed in it. I therefore know my
self-consciousness that belongs to itself, to its very nature, confirmed
not in _religion_ but rather in _annihilated_ and _superseded_ religion.

In Hegel, therefore, the negation of the negation is not the
confirmation of the true essence, effected precisely through negation of
the pseudo-essence. With him the negation of the negation is the
confirmation of the pseudo-essence, or of the self-estranged essence in
its denial; or it is the denial of this pseudo-essence as an objective
being dwelling outside man and independent of him, and its
transformation into the subject.

A peculiar role, therefore, is played by the act of _superseding_ in
which denial and preservation, i.e., affirmation, are bound together.

Thus, for example, in Hegel’s philosophy of law, _civil law_ superseded
equals _morality_, morality superseded equals the _family_, the family
superseded equals _civil society_, civil society superseded equals the
_state_, the state superseded equals _world history_. In the _actual
world_ civil law, morality, the family, civil society, the state, etc.,
remain in existence, only they have become _moments_ – states of the
existence and being of man – which have no validity in isolation, but
dissolve and engender one another, etc. They have become _moments of
motion_.

In their actual existence this _mobile_ nature of theirs is hidden. It
appears and is made manifest only in thought, in philosophy. Hence my
true religious existence is my existence in the _philosophy of
religion_; my true political existence is my existence in the
_philosophy of law_; my true natural existence, existence in the
_philosophy of nature_; my true artistic existence, existence in the
_philosophy of art_; my true _human_ existence, my _existence_ in
_philosophy_. Likewise the true existence of religion, the state,
nature, art, is the _philosophy_ of religion, of nature, of the state
and of art. If, however, the philosophy of religion, etc., is for me the
sole true existence of religion then, too, it is only as a _philosopher
of religion_ that I am truly religious, and so I deny _real_ religious
sentiment and the really _religious_ man. But at the same time I
_assert_ them, in part within my own existence or within the alien
existence which I oppose to them – for this _is_ only their
_philosophic_ expression – and in part I assert them in their distinct
original shape, since for me they represent merely the _apparent_
other-being, allegories, forms of their own true existence (i.e., of my
_philosophical_ existence) hidden under sensuous disguises.

In just the same way, _quality_ superseded equals _quantity_, quantity
superseded equals _measure_, measure superseded equals _essence_,
essence superseded equals _appearance_, appearance superseded equals
_actuality_, actuality superseded equals the _concept_, the concept
superseded equals _objectivity_, objectivity superseded equals the
_absolute idea_, the absolute idea superseded equals _nature_, nature
superseded equals _subjective_ mind, subjective mind superseded equals
_ethical_ objective mind, ethical mind superseded equals _art_, art
superseded equals _religion_, religion superseded equals _absolute
knowledge_.[54]

On the one hand, this act of superseding is a transcending of a
conceptual entity; thus, private property _as a concept_ is transcended
in the _concept_ of morality. And because thought imagines itself to be
directly the other of itself, to be _sensuous reality_ – and therefore
takes its own action for _sensuous, real_ action – this superseding in
thought, which leaves its object in existence in the real world,
believes that it has really overcome it. On the other hand, because the
object has now become for it a moment of thought, thought takes it in
its reality too to be self-confirmation of itself – of
self-consciousness, of abstraction.

||XXX| From the one point of view the entity which Hegel _supersedes_ in
philosophy is therefore not _real_ religion, the _real_ state, or _real_
nature, but religion itself already as an object of knowledge, i.e.,
_dogmatics_; the same with _jurisprudence_, _political science_ and
_natural science_. From the one point of view, therefore, he stands in
opposition both to the _real_ thing and to immediate, unphilosophic
_science_ or the unphilosophic _conceptions_ of this thing. He therefore
contradicts their conventional conceptions. [The conventional conception
of theology, jurisprudence, political science, natural science, etc. –
_Ed._]

On the other hand, the religious, etc., man can find in Hegel his final
confirmation.

It is now time to formulate the _positive_ aspects of the Hegelian
dialectic within the realm of estrangement.

(a) _Supersession_ as an objective movement of _retracting_ the
alienation _into self_. This is the insight, expressed within the
estrangement, concerning the _appropriation_ of the objective essence
through the supersession of its estrangement; it is the estranged
insight into the _real objectification_ of man, into the real
appropriation of his objective essence through the annihilation of the
estranged character of the objective world, through the supersession of
the objective world in its estranged mode of being. In the same way
atheism, being the supersession of God, is the advent of theoretic
humanism, and communism, as the supersession of private property, is the
vindication of real human life as man’s possession and thus the advent
of practical humanism, or atheism is humanism mediated with itself
through the supersession of religion, whilst communism is humanism
mediated with itself through the supersession of private property. Only
through the supersession of this mediation – which is itself, however, a
necessary premise – does positively self-deriving humanism, _positive_
humanism, come into being.

But atheism and communism are no flight, no abstraction, no loss of the
objective world created by man – of man’s essential powers born to the
realm of objectivity; they are not a returning in poverty to unnatural,
primitive simplicity. On the contrary, they are but the first real
emergence, the actual realization for man of man’s essence and of his
essence as something real.

Thus, by grasping the _positive_ meaning of self-referred negation
(although again in estranged fashion) Hegel grasps man’s
self-estrangement, the alienation of man’s essence, man’s loss of
objectivity and his loss of realness as self-discovery, manifestation of
his nature, objectification and realization. <In short, within the
sphere of abstraction, Hegel conceives labor as man’s act of
_self-genesis_ – conceives man’s relation to himself as an alien being
and the manifestation of himself as an alien being to be the emergence
of _species-consciousness_ and _species-life_.>

(b) However, apart from, or rather in consequence of, the referral
already described, this act appears in Hegel:

First as a _merely formal_, because abstract, act, because the human
being itself is taken to be only an _abstract, thinking being_,
conceived merely as self-consciousness. And,

_Secondly_, because the exposition is _formal_ and _abstract_, the
supersession of the alienation becomes a confirmation of the alienation;
or, for Hegel this movement of _self-genesis_ and _self-objectification_
in the form of _self-alienation and self-estrangement_ is the absolute,
and hence final, _expression of human life_ – of life with itself as its
aim, of life at peace with itself, and in unity with its essence.

This movement, in its abstract ||XXXI| form as dialectic, is therefore
regarded as _truly human life_, and because it is nevertheless an
abstraction – an estrangement of human life – it is regarded as a divine
process, but as the _divine process_ of man, a process traversed by
man’s abstract, pure, absolute essence that is distinct from himself.

_Thirdly_, this process must have a bearer, a subject. But the subject
only comes into being as a result. This result – the subject knowing
itself as absolute self-consciousness – is therefore _God, absolute
Spirit, the self-knowing and self-manifesting idea._ Real man and real
nature become mere predicates – symbols of this hidden, unreal man and
of this unreal nature. Subject and predicate are therefore related to
each other in absolute reversal – a _mystical subject-object_ or a
_subjectivity reaching_ _beyond the object_ – the _absolute subject_ as
a _process_, as _subject alienating_ itself and returning from
alienation into itself, but at the same time retracting this alienation
into itself, and the subject as this process; a pure, _incessant_
revolving within itself.

_First. Formal and abstract_ conception of man’s act of self-creation or
self-objectification.

Hegel having posited man as equivalent to self-consciousness, the
estranged object – the estranged essential reality of man – is nothing
but _consciousness,_ the thought of estrangement merely – estrangement’s
_abstract_ and therefore empty and unreal expression, _negation_. The
supersession of the alienation is therefore likewise nothing but an
abstract, empty supersession of that empty abstraction – the _negation
of the negation_. The rich, living, sensuous, concrete activity of
self-objectification is therefore reduced to its mere abstraction,
_absolute negativity_ – an abstraction which is again fixed as such and
considered as an independent activity – as sheer activity. Because this
so-called negativity is nothing but the _abstract, empty_ form of that
real living act, its content can in consequence be merely a _formal_
content produced by abstraction from all content. As a result therefore
one gets general, abstract _forms of abstraction_ pertaining to every
content and on that account indifferent to, and, consequently, valid
for, all content – the thought-forms or logical categories torn from
_real_ mind and from _real_ nature. (We shall unfold the _logical_
content of absolute negativity further on.)

Hegel’s positive achievement here, in his speculative logic, is that the
_definite concepts_, the universal _fixed thought-forms_ in their
independence _vis-à-vis_ nature and mind are a necessary result of the
general estrangement of the human being and therefore also of a human
thought, and that Hegel has therefore brought these together and
presented them as moments of the abstraction-process. For example,
superseded being is essence, superseded essence is concept, the concept
superseded is ... absolute idea. But what, then, is the absolute idea?
It supersedes its own self again, if it does not want to traverse once
more from the beginning the whole act of abstraction, and to satisfy
itself with being a totality of abstractions or the self-comprehending
abstraction. But abstraction comprehending itself as abstraction knows
itself to be nothing: it must abandon itself – abandon abstraction – and
so it arrives at an entity which is its exact opposite – at _nature._
Thus, the entire logic is the demonstration that abstract thought is
nothing in itself; that the absolute idea is nothing for itself; that
only _nature is_ something.

||XXXII|  The absolute idea, the abstract idea, which

“_considered_ with regard to its unity with itself is intuiting (Logic §
244), and which (_loc. cit_.) “in its own absolute truth _resolves_ to
let the moment of its particularity or of initial characterization and
other-being, the _immediate idea_, as its reflection, _go forth_ freely
_from itself as nature_” (_loc. cit_.),

this whole idea which behaves in such a strange and bizarre way, and
which has given the Hegelians such terrible headaches, is from beginning
to end nothing else but _abstraction_ (i.e., the abstract thinker),
which, made wise by experience and enlightened concerning its truth,
resolves under various (false and themselves still abstract) conditions
to _abandon itself_ and to replace its self-absorption, nothingness,
generality and indeterminateness by its other-being, the particular, and
the determinate; resolves to let _nature_, which it held hidden in
itself only as an abstraction, as a thought-entity, _go forth freely
from itself_; that is to say, this idea resolves to forsake abstraction
and to have a look at nature _free_ of abstraction. The abstract idea,
which without mediation becomes _intuiting_, is indeed nothing else but
abstract thinking that gives itself up and resolves on _intuition._ This
entire transition from logic to natural philosophy is nothing else but
the transition – so difficult to effect for the abstract thinker, who
therefore describes it in such an adventurous way – from _abstracting_
to _intuiting_. The _mystical_ feeling which drives the philosopher
forward from abstract thinking to intuiting is _boredom_ – the longing
for content.

(The man estranged from himself is also the thinker estranged from his
_essence_ – that is, from the natural and human essence. His thoughts
are therefore fixed mental forms dwelling outside nature and man. Hegel
has locked up all these fixed mental forms together in his logic,
interpreting each of them first as negation – that is, as an
_alienation_ of _human_ thought – and then as negation of the negation –
that is, as a superseding of this alienation, as a _real_ expression of
human thought. But as this still takes place within the confines of the
estrangement, this negation of the negation is in part the restoring of
these fixed forms in their estrangement; in part a stopping at the last
act – the act of self-reference in alienation – as the true mode of
being of these fixed mental forms; * –

[* (This means that what Hegel does is to put in place of these fixed
abstractions the act of abstraction which revolves in its own circle. We
must therefore give him the credit for having indicated the source of
all these inappropriate concepts which originally appertained to
particular philosophers; for having brought them together; and for
having created the entire compass of abstraction as the object of
criticism, instead of some specific abstraction.) (Why Hegel separates
thought from the _subject_ we shall see later; at this stage it is
already clear, however, that when man is not, his characteristic
expression cannot be human either, and so neither could thought be
grasped as an expression of man as a human and natural subject endowed
with eyes, ears, etc., and living in society, in the world, and in
nature.) – Note by Marx]

– and in part, to the extent that this abstraction apprehends itself and
experiences an infinite weariness with itself, there makes its
appearance in Hegel, in the form of the resolution to recognize _nature_
as the essential being and to go over to intuition, the abandonment of
abstract thought – the abandonment of thought revolving solely within
the orbit of thought, of thought _sans_ eyes, _sans_ teeth, _sans_ ears,
_sans_ everything.)

||XXXIII| But nature too, taken abstractly, for itself – nature fixed in
isolation from man – is _nothing_ for man. It goes without saying that
the abstract thinker who has committed himself to intuiting, intuits
nature abstractly. Just as nature lay enclosed in the thinker in the
form of the absolute idea, in the form of a thought-entity – in a shape
which was obscure and enigmatic even to him – so by letting it emerge
from himself he has really let emerge only this _abstract nature_, only
nature as a _thought-entity_ – but now with the significance that it is
the other-being of thought, that it is real, intuited nature – nature
distinguished from abstract thought. Or, to talk in human language, the
abstract thinker learns in his intuition of nature that the entities
which he thought to create from nothing, from pure abstraction – the
entities he believed he was producing in the divine dialectic as pure
products of the labor of thought, for ever shuttling back and forth in
itself and never looking outward into reality – are nothing else but
_abstractions_ from _characteristics of nature_. To him, therefore, the
whole of nature merely repeats the logical abstractions in a sensuous,
external form. He once more _resolves_ nature into these abstractions.
Thus, his intuition of nature is only the act of confirming his
abstraction from the intuition of nature [~~Let us consider for a moment
Hegel’s characteristics of nature and the transition from nature to the
mind. Nature has resulted as the idea in the form of the other-being.
Since the id~~ .. ] – is only the conscious repetition by him of the
process of creating his abstraction. Thus, for example, time equals
negativity referred to itself (Hegel, _Encyclopädie der philosophischen_
_Wissenschaften im Grundrisse_, p. 238). To the superseded becoming as
being there corresponds, in natural form, superseded movement as matter.
Light is _reflection-in-itself_, the _natural_ form. Body as _moon_ and
_comet_ is the _natural_ form of the _antithesis_ which according to
logic is on the one side the _positive resting on itself_ and on the
other side the _negative_ resting on itself. The earth is the _natural_
form of the logical _ground_, as the negative unity of the antithesis,
etc.

_Nature as nature_ – that is to say, insofar as it is still sensuously
distinguished from that secret sense hidden within it – nature isolated,
distinguished from these abstractions is _nothing_ – a _nothing proving
itself to be nothing_ – is _devoid of sense_, or has only the sense of
being an externality which has to be annulled.

“In the finite-_teleological_ position is to be found the correct
premise that nature does not contain within itself the absolute
purpose.” [§ 245.]

Its purpose is the confirmation of abstraction.

“Nature has shown itself to be the idea in the _form of other-being_.
Since the _idea_ is in this form the negative of itself or _external to
itself_, nature is not just relatively external _vis-à-vis_ this idea,
but _externality_ constitutes the form in which it exists as nature.” [§
247.]

_Externality_ here is not to be understood as the _world of sense_ which
_manifests itself_ and is accessible to the light, to the man endowed
with senses. It is to be taken here in the sense of alienation, of a
mistake, a defect, which ought not to be. For what is true is still the
idea. Nature is only the _form_ of the idea’s _other-being_. And since
abstract thought is the _essence_, that which is external to it is by
its essence something merely _external_. The abstract thinker recognizes
at the same time that _sensuousness – externality_ in contrast to
thought shuttling back and forth _within itself_ – is the essence of
nature. But he expresses this contrast in such a way as to make this
_externality of nature_, its _contrast_ to thought, its _defect_, so
that inasmuch as it is distinguished from abstraction, nature is
something defective.

||XXXIV| An entity which is defective not merely for me or in my eyes
but in itself – intrinsically – has something outside itself which it
lacks. That is, its essence is different from it itself. Nature has
therefore to supersede itself for the abstract thinker, for it is
already posited by him as a potentially _superseded_ being.

“_For us_, mind has _nature_ for its _premise_, being nature’s _truth_
and for that reason its _absolute prius_. In this truth nature _has
vanished_, and mind has resulted as the idea arrived at
being-for-itself, the _object_ of which, as well as the _subject_, is
the _concept_. This identity is _absolute negativity_, for whereas in
nature the concept has its perfect external objectivity, this its
alienation has been superseded, and in this alienation the concept has
become identical with itself. But it is this identity therefore, only in
being a return out of nature.” [§ 381.]

“As the _abstract_ idea, _revelation_ is unmediated transition to, the
_coming-to-be_ of, nature; as the revelation of the mind, which is free,
it is the _positing_ of nature as the _mind’s_ world – a positing which,
being reflection, is at the same time, a _presupposing_ of the world as
independently existing nature. Revelation in conception is the creation
of nature as the mind’s being, in which the mind procures the
_affirmation_ and the _truth_ of its freedom.” “_The absolute is mind_.
This is the highest definition of the absolute.” [§ 384.] |XXXIV||


Notes

------------------------------------------------------------------------

[1]. The _Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ is the first
work in which Marx tried to systematically elaborate problems of
political economy from the standpoint of his maturing
dialectical-materialist and communist views and also to synthesize the
results of his critical review of prevailing philosophic and economic
theories. Apparently, Marx began to write it in order to clarify the
problems for himself. But in the process of working on it he conceived
the idea of publishing a work analysing the economic system of bourgeois
society in his time and its ideological trends. Towards the end of his
stay in Paris, on February 1, 1845, Marx signed a contract with Carl
Leske, a Darmstadt publisher, concerning the publication of his work
entitled _A Critique of Politics and of Political Economy_. It was to be
based on his _Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ and perhaps
also on his earlier manuscript _Contribution to the Critique of Hegel’s
Philosophy of Law_. This plan did not materialize in the 1840s because
Marx was busy writing other works and, to some extent, because the
contract with the publisher was cancelled in September 1846, the latter
being afraid to have transactions with such a revolutionary-minded
author. However, in the early 1850s Marx returned to the idea of writing
a book on economics. Thus, the manuscripts of 1844 are connected with
the conception of a plan which led many years later to the writing of
_Capital._

The _Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts_ is an unfinished work and in
part a rough draft. A considerable part of the text has not been
preserved. What remains comprises three manuscripts, each of which has
its own pagination (in Roman figures). The first manuscript contains 27
pages, of which pages I-XII and XVII-XXVII are divided by two vertical
lines into three columns supplied with headings written in beforehand:
“Wages of Labor,” “Profit of Capital” (this section has also subheadings
supplied by the author) and “Rent of Land.” It is difficult to tell the
order in which Marx filled these columns. All the three columns on p.
VII contain the text relating to the section “Wages of Labor.” Pages
XIII to XVI are divided into two columns and contain texts of the
sections “Wages of Labor” (pp. XIII-XV), “Profit of Capital” (pp.
XIII-XVI) and “Rent of Land” (p. XVI). On pages XVII to XXI, only the
column headed “Rent of Land” is filled in. From page XXII to page XXVII,
on which the first manuscript breaks off, Marx wrote across the three
columns disregarding the headings. The text of these pages is published
as a separate section entitled by the editors according to its content
“Estranged Labor.”

Of the second manuscript only the last four pages have survived (pp.
XL-XLIII).

The third manuscript contains 41 pages (not counting blank ones) divided
into two columns and numbered by Marx himself from I to XLIII (in doing
so he omitted two numbers, XXII and XXV). Like the extant part of the
second manuscript, the third manuscript has no author’s headings; the
text has been arranged and supplied with the headings by the editors.

Sometimes Marx departed from the subject matter and interrupted his
elucidation of one question to analyze another. Pages XXXIX-XL contain
the Preface to the whole work which is given before the text of the
first manuscript. The text of the section dealing with the critical
analysis of Hegel’s dialectic, to which Marx referred in the Preface as
the concluding chapter and which was scattered on various pages, is
arranged in one section and put at the end in accordance with Marx’s
indications.

In order to give the reader a better visual idea of the structure of the
work, the text reproduces in vertical lines the Roman numbers of the
sheets of the manuscripts, and the Arabic numbers of the columns in the
first manuscript. The notes indicate where the text has been rearranged.
Passages crossed out by Marx with a vertical line are enclosed in
pointed brackets; separate words or phrases crossed out by the author
are given in footnotes only when they supplement the text. The general
title and the headings of the various parts of the manuscripts enclosed
in square brackets are supplied by the editors on the basis of the
author’s formulations. In some places the text has been broken up into
paragraphs by the editors. Quotations from the French sources cited by
Marx in French or in his own translation into German, are given in
English in both cases and the French texts as quoted by Marx are given
in the footnotes. Here and elsewhere Marx’s rendering of the quotations
or free translation is given in small type but without quotation marks.
Emphasis in quotations, belonging, as a rule, to Marx, as well as that
of the quoted authors, is indicated everywhere by italics.

The _Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ was first published
by the Institute of Marxism-Leninism in Moscow in the language of the
original: Marx/Engels_, Gesamtausgabe, Abt_. 1, Bd. 3, 1932.

In English this work was first published in 1959 by the Foreign
Languages Publishing House (now Progress Publishers), Moscow, translated
by Martin Milligan.

[2]. This refers to Bruno Bauer’s reviews of books, articles and
pamphlets on the Jewish question, including Marx’s article on the
subject in the _Deutsch-Französische_ _Jahrbücher_, which were published
in the monthly _Allgemeine Literatur-Zeitung_ (issue No. 1, December
1843, and issue No. IV, March 1844) under the title “_Von den_ _neuesten
Schriften über die Judenfrage_.” Most of the expressions quoted are
taken from these reviews. The expressions “utopian phrase” and “compact
mass” can he found in Bruno Bauer’s unsigned article, “_Was ist jetzt
der Gegenstand der Kritik_?” published in the _Allgemeine
Literatur-Zeitung_, issue No. VIII, July 1844. A detailed critical
appraisal of this monthly was later on given by Marx and Engels in the
book _Die heilige Familie, oder Kritik der kritischen Kritik_ (see this
edition, Vol. 4, _The Holy Family, or Critique of Critical Criticism_).

[3]. Marx apparently refers to Weitling’s works: _Die Menschheit, wie
sie ist und wie sie sein sollte,_ 1838, and _Garantien der Harmonic und
Freiheit,_ Vivis, 1842.

Moses Hess published three articles in the collection _Ein-und-zwanzig
Bogen aus der Schweiz_ (Twenty-One Sheets from Switzerland_), Erster
Teil_ (_Zürich und Winterthur_, 1843), issued by Georg Herwegh. These
articles, entitled “_Sozialismus und Kommunismus,_” “_Philosophie der
Tat_” and “_Die Eine und die ganze Freiheit_,” were published
anonymously. The first two of them had a note – “Written by the author
of _‘Europäische Triarchie’_.”

[4]. The term “element” in the Hegelian philosophy means a vital element
of thought. It is used to stress that thought is a process, and that
therefore elements in a system of thought are also phases in a movement.
The term “feeling” (_Empfindung_) denotes relatively low forms of mental
life in which no distinction is made between the subjective and
objective.

[5]. Shortly after writing this Preface Marx fulfilled his intention in
_The Holy Family_, _or Critique of Critical Criticism_, written in
collaboration with Engels (see Karl Marx and Frederick Engels,
_Collected Works_, Vol. 4).

[6]. The expression “common humanity” (in the manuscript in French,
“simple humanity”) was borrowed by Marx from the first volume (Chapter
VIII) of Adam Smith’s _Wealth of Nations_, which he used in Garnier’s
French translation (_Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la
richesse des nations_, Paris, 1802, t. I, p. 138). All the subsequent
references were given by Marx to this publication, the synopsis of which
is contained in his Paris Notebooks with excerpts on political economy.
This edition is reproduced on the MIA and Marx’s citations are linked to
the text.

[7]. Marx uses the German term “Nationalökonomie” to denote both the
economic system in the sense of science or theory, and the economic
system itself.

[8]. Loudon’s work was a translation into French of an English
manuscript apparently never published in the original. The author did
publish in English a short pamphlet - _The Equilibrium of Population and
Sustenance Demonstrated_, Leamington, 1836.

[9]. Unlike the quotations from a number of other French writers such as
Constantin Pecqueur and Eugéne Buret, which Marx gives in French in this
work, the excerpts from J. B. Say’s book are given in his German
translation.

[10]. From this page of the manuscript quotations from Adam Smith’s book
(in the French translation), which Marx cited so far sometimes in French
and sometimes in German, are, as a rule, given in German. In this book
the corresponding pages of the English edition are substituted for the
French by the editors and Marx’s references are given in square brackets
(see Note 6).

[11]. The text published in small type here and below is not an exact
quotation from Smith but a summary of the corresponding passages from
his work. Such passages are subsequently given in small type but without
quotation marks.

[12]. The preceding page (VII) of the first manuscript does not contain
any text relating to the sections “Profit of Capital” and “Rent of Land”
(see Note 1).

[13]. The whole paragraph, including the quotation from Ricardo’s book
in the French translation by Francisco Solano Constancio_: Des principes
de l’économie politique, et de 1’impôt_, 2-e éd., Paris, 1835, T. II,
pp. 194-95 (see the corresponding English edition _On the Principles of
Political Economy, and Taxation_, London, 1817), and from Sismondi’s
_Nouveaux principes d’économie politique_..., Paris, 1819, T. II., p.
331, is an excerpt from Eugéne Buret’s book _De la misère des classes
laborieuses en Angleterre et en France_.... Paris, 1840, T. I, pp. 6-7,
note.

[14]. The allusion is to the following passage: “In a perfectly fair
lottery, those who draw the prizes ought to gain all that is lost by
those who draw the blanks. In a profession where twenty fail for one
that succeeds, that one ought to gain all that should have been gained
by the unsuccessful twenty.” (Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. 1, Bk. 1,
p. 94.)

[15]. See Note 12.

[16]. The Corn Laws – a series of laws in England (the first of which
dated back to the 15th century) which imposed high duties on imported
corn with the aim of maintaining high prices on it in the home market.
In the first third of the 19th century several laws were passed (in
1815, 1822 and so on) changing the conditions of corn imports, and in
1828 a sliding scale was introduced, which raised import duties on corn
while lowering prices on the home market and, on the contrary, lowered
import duties while raising prices.

In 1838 the Manchester factory owners Cobden and Bright founded the
Anti-Corn Law League, which widely exploited the popular discontent at
rising corn prices. While agitating for the abolition of the corn duties
and demanding complete freedom of trade, the League strove to weaken the
economic and political positions of the landed aristocracy and to lower
workers’ wages.

The struggle between the industrial bourgeoisie and the landed
aristocracy over the Corn Laws ended in their repeal in 1846.

[17]. Pages XIII to XV are divided into two columns and not three like
the other pages of the first manuscript; they contain no text relating
to the section “Rent of Land.” On page XVI, which also has two columns,
this text is in the first column, while on the following pages it is in
the second.

[18]. Marx, still using Hegel’s terminology and his approach to the
unity of the opposites, counterposes the term “Verwirklichung”
(realization) to “Entwirklichung” (loss of realization).

[19]. In this manuscript Marx frequently uses two similar German terms,
“_Entäusserung_” and “_Entfremdung_,” to express the notion of
“alienation.” In the present edition the former is generally translated
as “alienation,” the latter as “estrangement,” because in the later
economic works (_Theories of Surplus-Value_) Marx himself used the word
“alienation” as the English equivalent of the term “_Entäusserung_.”

[20]. The term “species-being” (_Gattungswesen_) is derived from Ludwig
Feuerbach’s philosophy where it is applied to man and mankind as a
whole.

[21]. Apparently Marx refers to Proudhon’s book _Qu’est-ce que la
propriété?_, Paris, 1841.

[22]. This passage shows that Marx here uses the category of wages in a
broad sense, as an expression of antagonistic relations between the
classes of capitalists and of wage-workers. Under “the wages” he
understands “the wage-labor,” the capitalist system as such. This idea
was apparently elaborated in detail in that part of the manuscript which
is now extant.

[23]. This apparently refers to the conversion of individuals into
members of civil society which is considered as the sphere of property,
of material relations that determine all other relations. In this case
Marx refers to the material relations of society based on private
property and the antagonism of different classes.

[24]. The Poor Law Amendment Act of 1834 deprived poor people considered
able to work (including children) of any public relief except a place in
the workhouse, where they were compelled to work.

[25]. In the manuscript “sein für sich selbst,” which is an expression
of Hegel’s term “für sich’ (for itself) as opposed to “an sich” (in
itself). In the Hegelian philosophy the former means roughly explicit,
conscious or defined in contrast to “an sich,” a synonym for immature,
implicit or unconscious.

[26]. This refers to _Revolutions de France et de Brabant, par Camille
Desmoulins. Second Trimestre, contenant mars, avril et mai, Paris, l’an
1ier_, 1790, N. 16, p. 139 sq.; N. 23, p. 425 sqq.; N. 26, p. 580 sqq.

[27]. This refers to Georg Ludwig Wilhelm Funke, _Die aus der
unbeschrdnklen Theilbarkeit des Grundeigenthums hervorgehenden
Nachtheile,_ _Hamburg und Gotha_, 1839, p. 56, in which there is a
reference to Heinrich Leo, _Studien und Skizzen zu einer Vaturlehre des
Slaates_, Halle, 1833, p. 102.

[28]. The third manuscript is a thick notebook the last few pages of
which are blank. The pages are divided into two columns by a vertical
line, not for the purpose of dividing the text according to the headings
but for purely technical reasons. The text of the first three sections
comprises pp. I-XI, XIV-XXI, XXXIV-XXXVIII and was written as a
supplement to the missing pages of the second manuscript. Pages XI-XIII,
XVII, XVIII, XXIII, XXIV, XXVI, XXXIV contain the text of the concluding
chapter dealing with the criticism of Hegel’s dialectic (on some pages
it is written alongside the text of other sections). In some places the
manuscript contains the author’s remarks testifying to his intention to
unite into a single whole various passages of this section separated
from each other by the text of other sections. Pages XXIX-XL comprise
the draft Preface. Finally, the text on the last pages (XLI-XLIII) is a
self-contained essay on the power of money in bourgeois society.

[29]. The manuscript has “als für sich seiende Tätigkeit.” For the
meaning of the terms “für sich” and “an sich” in Hegel’s philosophy see
Note 25.

[30]. Marx refers to the rise of the primitive, crude equalitarian
tendencies among the representatives of utopian communism at the early
stages of its development. Among the medieval religious communistic
communities, in particular, there was current a notion of the common
possession of women as a feature of the future society depicted in the
spirit of consumer communism ideals. In 1534-35 the German Anabaptists,
who seized power in Münster, tried to introduce polygamy in accordance
with this view. Tommaso Campanella, the author of _Civitas Solis_ (early
17th century), rejected monogamy in his ideal society. The primitive
communistic communities were also characterized by asceticism and a
hostile attitude to science and works of art. Some of these primitive
equalitarian features, the negative attitude to the arts in particular,
were inherited by the communist trends of the first half of the 19th
century, for example, by the members of the French secret societies of
the 1830s and 1840s (“worker-egalitarians,” “humanitarians,” and so on)
comprising the followers of Babeuf (for a characterization of these see
Engels, “Progress of Social Reform on the Continent” (Karl Marx and
Frederick Engels, _Collected Works,_ Volume 3, pp. 396-97)).

[31]. This note is given by Marx on page V of the manuscript where it is
separated by a horizontal line from the main text, but according to its
meaning it refers to this sentence.

[32]. This part of the manuscript shows clearly the peculiarity of the
terminology used by Marx in his works. At the time he had not worked out
terms adequately expressing the conceptions of scientific communism he
was then evolving and was still under the influence of Feuerbach in that
respect. Hence the difference in the use of words in his early and
subsequent, mature writings. In the _Economic and_ _Philosophic
Manuscripts of 1844_ the word “socialism” is used to denote the stage of
society at which it has carried out a revolutionary transformation,
abolished private property, class antagonisms, alienation and so on. In
the same sense Marx used the expression “communism equals humanism.” At
that time he understood the term “communism as such” not as the final
goal of revolutionary transformation but as the process of this
transformation, development leading up to that goal, a lower stage of
the process.

[33]. This expression apparently refers to the theory of the English
geologist Sir Charles Lyell who, in his three-volume work _The
Principles of Geology_ (1830-33), proved the evolution of the earth’s
crust and refuted the popular theory of cataclysms. Lyell used the term
“historical geology” for his theory. The term “geognosy” was introduced
by the 18th-century German scientist Abraham Werner, a specialist in
mineralogy, and it was used also by Alexander Humboldt.

[34]. This statement is interpreted differently by researchers. Many of
them maintain that Marx here meant crude equalitarian communism, such as
that propounded by Babeuf and his followers. While recognizing the
historic role of that communism, he thought it impossible to ignore its
weak points. It seems more justifiable, however, to interpret this
passage proceeding from the peculiarity of terms used in the manuscript
(see Note 32). Marx here used the term “communism” to mean not the
higher phase of classless society (which he at the time denoted as
“socialism” or “communism equalling humanism”) but movement (in various
forms, including primitive forms of equalitarian communism at the early
stage) directed at its achievement, a revolutionary transformation
process of transition to it. Marx emphasized that this process should
not be considered as an end in itself, but that it is a necessary,
though a transitional, stage in attaining the future social system,
which will be characterized by new features distinct from those proper
to this stage.

[35]. Page XI (in part) and pages XII and XIII are taken up by a text
relating to the concluding chapter (see Note 28).

[36]. The greater part of this page as well as part of the preceding
page (XVII) comprises a text relating to the concluding chapter (see
Note 28).

[37]. Apparently Marx refers to a formula of the German philosopher
Johann Fichte, an adherent of subjective idealism.

[38]. A part of this page of the manuscript is ripped off, about three
lines are missing. – _Ed._

[39]. See this work, pp. 20-23. – _Ed._

[40]. The preceding pages starting from p. XXI, which is partly taken up
by a text relating to this section, contain the text of the concluding
chapter.

[41]. In some of his early writings Marx already uses the term
“_bürgerliche Gesellschaft_” to mean two things: (1) in a broader sense,
the economic system of society regardless of the historical stage of its
development, the sum total of material relations which determine
political institutions and ideology, and (2) in the narrow sense, the
material relations of bourgeois society (later on, that society as a
whole), of capitalism. Hence, the term has been translated according to
its concrete meaning in the context as “civil society” in the first case
and “bourgeois society” in the second.

[42]. The two previous pages of the manuscript contain the draft Preface
to the whole work, which is published on pages 1-2.

[43]. Ontology – in some philosophic systems a theory about being, about
the nature of things.

[44]. Originally the section on the Hegelian dialectic was apparently
conceived by Marx as a philosophical digression in the section of the
third manuscript which is published under the heading “Private Property
and Communism” and was written together with other sections as an
addition to separate pages of the second manuscript. Therefore Marx
marked the beginning of this section (p. XI in the manuscript) as point
6, considering it to be the continuation of the five points of the
preceding section. He marked as point 7 the beginning of the following
section, headed “Human Requirements and Division of Labor Under the Rule
of Private Property,” on page XIV of the manuscript. However, when
dealing with this subject on subsequent pages of his manuscript, Marx
decided to collect the whole material into a separate, concluding
chapter and mentioned this in his draft Preface. The chapter, like a
number of other sections of the manuscript, was not finished. While
writing it, Marx made special excerpts from the last chapter (“Absolute
Knowledge”) of Hegel’s _Phänomenologie des Geistes_, which are in the
same notebook as the third manuscript (these excerpts are not reproduced
in this edition).

[45]. The reference is not quite accurate. On page 193 of the work
mentioned, Bruno Bauer polemicises not against the anti-Hegelian Herr
Gruppe but against the Right Hegelian Marheineke.

[46]. Marx here refers to Feuerbach’s critical observations on Hegel in
§§ 29-30 of his _Grundsätze der Philosophie der Zukunft_.

This note is given at the bottom of page XIII of the third manuscript
without any indication what it refers to. The asterisk after the
sentence to which it seems to refer is given by the editors.

[47]. Here on page XVII of the third manuscript (part of which comprises
a text relating to the section “Human Requirements and Division of Labor
Under the Rule of Private Property”) Marx gave the note: “see p. XIII,”
which proves that this text is the continuation of the section dealing
with the critical analysis of the Hegelian dialectic begun on pp.
XI-XII.

[48]. At the end of page XVIII of the third manuscript there is a note
by Marx: “continued on p. XXII.” However number XXII was omitted by Marx
in paging. The text of the given chapter is continued on the page marked
by the author as XXIII, which is also confirmed by his remark on it:
“see p. XVIII.”

[49]. Marx apparently refers here not only to the identity of Hegel’s
views on labor and some other categories of political economy with those
of the English classical economists but also to his profound knowledge
of economic writings. In lectures he delivered at Jena University in
1803-04 Hegel cited Adam Smith’s work. In his _Philosophie des Rechts_
(§ 189) he mentions Smith, Say and Ricardo and notes the rapid
development of economic thought.

[50]. Hegel uses the term “thinghood” (_Dingheit_) in his work
_Phänomenologie des Geistes_ to denote an abstract, universal, mediating
link in the process of cognition; “_thinghood_” reveals the generality
of the specific properties of individual things. The synonym for it is
“pure essence” (_das reine Wesen_).

[51]. These eight points of the “surmounting of the object of
consciousness,” expressed “in all its aspects,” are copied nearly word
for word from §§ 1 and 3 of the last chapter (“Absolute Knowledge”) of
Hegel’s _Phänomenologie des Geistes_.

[52]. Number XXV was omitted by Marx in paging the third manuscript.

[53]. Marx refers to § 30 of Feuerbach’s _Grundsätze der Philosophie der
Zukunft_, which says: “Hegel is a thinker who _surpasses_ himself in
thinking.”

[54]. This enumeration gives the major categories of Hegel’s
_Encyclopädie der philosophischen Wissenschaften_ in the order in which
they are examined by Hegel. Similarly, the categories reproduced by Marx
above (on p. 65), from “civil law” to “world history,” are given in the
order in which they appear in Hegel’s _Philosophie des Rechts._
